THE SEA LIONS.
CHAPTER I.
A sculler's notch in the stern he made,
An oar he shaped of the bottle blade;
Then sprung to his seat with a lightsome leap
And launched afar on the calm, blue deep.
The Culprit Fay
.
Roswell
was hardly on the ice before a sound of a most
portentous sort reached his ear. He knew at once that the
field had been rent in twain by outward pressure, and that
some new change was to occur that might release or might
destroy the schooner. He was on the point of springing
forward in order to join Daggett, when a call from the boat
arrested his steps.
These here fields are coming together, Captain Gar'ner,
and our boat will soon be crushed unless we get it out of
the water.
Sure enough, a single glance behind him sufficed to
assure
the young master of the truth of this statement. The
field he was on was slowly swinging, bringing its western
margin in closer contact with the eastern edge of the floe
that lay within it. The movement could be seen merely
by the closing of the channel through which the boat had
come, and by the cracking and crushing of the ice on the
edges of the two fields. So tremendous was the pressure,
however, that cakes as large as a small house were broken
off, and forced upward on the surface of the field, or ground
into small fragments, as it might be under the vice of a
power hitherto unknown to the spectators. Slow as was
the movement of the floe, it was too fast to allow of delay;
and, finding a suitable place, the boat was hauled up, and
put in security on the floe that lay nearest the schooner.
This may give us a long drag to get back into the
water
,
Stimson, and a night out of our banks, said Roswell,
looking about him, as soon as the task was achieved.
I do not know that, sir, was the answer. It seems
to me that the floe has parted alongside of them rocks, and
if-so-be that should turn out to be the case, the whull on
us, schooner, boat, and all hands, may drift into the bay;
for that there is a current setting from this quarter up
towards
our island, I'm sartain of, by the feel of my oar, as
we come along.
It may be so  the currents run all manner of ways,
and field-ice may pass the shoals, though a berg never can.
I do not remember, nevertheless, to have ever seen even a
floe within the group  nothing beyond large cakes that
have got adrift by some means or other.
I have, sir, though only once. A few days a'ter we got
in, when I was ship-keeper, and all hands was down under
the rocks of the north eend, a field come in at the northern
entrance of the bay, and went out at the southern. It
might have been a league athwart it, and it drifted, as a
body might say, as if it had some one aboard to give it the
right sheer. Touch it did at the south cape, but just
winding
as handy as a craft could have done it, in a good tide's
way, out to sea it went ag'in, bound to the south pole
for-ti-'now.
Well, this is good news, and may be the means of
saving the Vineyard craft in the end. We do seem to be
setting bodily into the bay, and if we can only get clear of
that island, I do not see what is to hinder it. Here is a
famous fellow of a mountain to the northward, coming
down before the wind, as one might say, and giving us a
cant into the passage. I should think that chap must
produce
some sort of a change, whether it be for better or
worse.
Ay, ay, sir, put in Thompson, who acted as a
boat-steerer
at need, he may do just that, but it is all he can
do. Mr. Green and I sounded out from the cove for a
league or more, a few days since, and we found less than
twenty fathoms, as far as we went. That chap up to the
1*
nor'ard there, draws something like a hundred fathoms, if
he draws an inch. He shows more above water than a
first-rate's
truck.
That does he, and a good deal to spare. Thompson,
do you and Todd remain here, and look after the boat,
while the rest of us will shape our course for the schooner.
She seems to be in a wicked berth, and 'twill be no more
than neighbourly to try to get her out of it.
Truly enough might Roswell call the berth of the Sea
Lion, of the Vineyard, by any expressive name that implied
danger. When the party reached her, they found the
situation
of that vessel to be as follows. She had been
endeavouring
to work her way through a passage between two
large fields, when she found the ice closing, and that she
was in great danger of being `nipped.' Daggett was a
man of fertile resources, and great decision of character.
Perceiving that escape was impossible, all means of getting
clear being rendered useless by the floes soon touching,
both before and behind him, he set about adopting the
means most likely to save his vessel. Selecting a spot
where a curve, in the margin of the field to leeward,
promised
temporary security, at least, he got his vessel into it,
anchored fast to the floe. Then he commenced cutting
away the ice, by means of axes first, and of saws afterwards,
in the hope that he might make such a cavity as, by its
size and shape, would receive the schooner's hull, and
prevent
her destruction. For several hours had he and his
people been at this work, when, to their joy, as well as to
their great astonishment, they were suddenly joined by
Roswell and his party. The fact was, that so intently had
every one of the Vineyard men's faculties been absorbed
by their own danger, and so much was each individual
occupied by his own duty, that not a man among them had
seen the boat, or even any of the crew, until Gardiner called
out to Daggett as he approached, announcing his presence
by his voice.
This is good fortune, truly, Captain Gar'ner, said
Daggett, shaking his brother master most cordially by the
hand; good fortune, do I call it! I was satisfied that I
should fall in with you, somewhere about this group of
islands, for they lie just about where my late uncle had
given us reason to suppose some good sealing ground
might be met with; but I did not hope to see you this
morning. You observe our position, Captain Gar'ner;
there is every prospect of a most awful nip!
There is, indeed, though I see you have been making
some provision for it. What luck have you had in digging
a slip to let the schooner into?
Well, we might have had worse, though better would
have been more agreeable. It's plain sailing, so long as
we can work above water, and you see we've cleared a fine
berth for the craft, down to the water's edge; but, below
that, 't is blind work and slow. The field is some thirty
feet thick, and sawing through it is out of the question.
The most we can do is to get off pieces diagonally. I am
not without hopes that we have done enough of this to make
a wedge, on which the schooner will rise, if pressed hard
on her off-side. I have heard of such things, Captain
Gar'ner
,
though I cannot say I ever saw it.
It's a ticklish business to trust to such a protector;
still, a great deal must be gained by cutting away so much
of this upper ice, and it is possible your schooner may be
lifted, as you seem to expect. Has anything been done to
strengthen the craft in-board?
Not as yet; though I've thought of that, too. But
what is the stoutest ship that ever floated, against the
pressure
of such an enormous field of ice? Had we not better
keep cutting away?
You can continue to work the saw and the axes, but I
will give an eye to strengthening the craft in-board. Just
point out the spars and plank you can spare, and we'll see
what can be done. At any rate, my lads, you can now
work with the certainty that your lives are safe. My
schooner
lies about six leagues from you, as safely moored as if
she lay in a dock. Come, Captain Daggett, let me see
your spare spars and plank.
Great encouragement it certainly was to these mariners,
so far from home, and in their imminently perilous condition,
to know that a countryman and a friend was so near them, to
afford shelter and protection. The American sailor is not
a cheering animal, like his English relative, but he quite as
clearly understands what ought to be received with
congratulation
,
as those who are apt to make more noise. The
Vineyard men, in particular, were habitually quiet and
thoughtful, there being but one seaman in the craft who
did not husband his lay, and look forward to meet the wants
of a future day. This is the result of education, men
usually
becoming quiet as they gain ideas, and feel that the
tongue has been given to us in order to communicate them
to our fellows. Still, the joy at receiving this unlooked-for
assistance was great among the Vineyard men, and each
party went to work with activity and zeal.
The task of Roswell Gardiner was in-board, while that
of Daggett and his men continued to be on the ice. The
latter resumed the labour of cutting and sawing the field,
and of getting up fenders, or skids, to protect the inner side
of their vessel from the effects of a `nip.' As for Gardiner,
he set about his self-assumed duty with great readiness and
intelligence. His business was to strengthen the craft, by
getting supports up in her hold. This was done without
much difficulty, all the upper part of the hold being clear
and easily come at. Spars were cut to the proper length,
plank were placed in the broadest part of the vessel,
opposite
to each other, and the spars were wedged in carefully,
extending from side to side, so as to form a great additional
support to the regular construction of the schooner. In
little more than an hour, Roswell had his task accomplished,
while Daggett did not see that he could achieve much more
himself. They met on the ice to consult, and to survey
the condition of things around them.
The outer field had been steadily encroaching upon the
inner, breaking the edges of both, until the points of
junction
were to be traced by a long line of fragments forced
upward, and piled high in the air. Open spaces, however,
still existed, owing to irregularities in the outlines of the
two floes; and Daggett hoped that the little bay into which
he had got his schooner might not be entirely closed, ere a
shift of wind, or a change in the tides, might carry away
the causes of the tremendous pressure that menaced his
security. It is not easy for those who are accustomed to
look at natural objects in their more familiar aspects, fully
to appreciate the vast momentum of the weight that was
now drifting slowly down upon the schooner. The only
ray of hope was to be found in the deficiency in one of the
two great requisites of such a force. Momentum being
weight
, multiplied into
velocity
, there were some glimpses
visible, of a nature to produce a slight degree of expectation
that the last might yet be resisted. The movement was
slow, but it was absolutely grand, by its steadiness and
power. Any one who has ever stood on a lake or river
shore, and beheld the undeviating force with which a small
cake of ice crumbles and advances before a breeze, or in a
current, may form some idea of the majesty of the
movement
of a field of leagues in diameter, and which was borne
upon by a gale of the ocean, as well as by currents, and by
the weight of drifting ice-bergs from without. It is true
that the impetus came principally from a great distance,
and could scarcely be detected or observed by those around
the schooner; still, these last were fully aware of the whole
character of the danger, which each minute appeared to
render more and more imminent and imposing. The two
fields were obviously closing still, and that with a resistless
power that boded destruction to the unfortunate vessel.
The open water near her was already narrowed to a space
that half an hour might suffice to close entirely.
Have you set that nearest island by compass, Daggett?
asked Roswell Gardiner, as soon as he had taken a good
look around him. To me it seems that it bears more to
the eastward than it did an hour since. If this should be
true, our inner field here must have a very considerable
westerly set.
In which case we may still hope to drift clear, returned
Daggett, springing on board the schooner, and running aft
to the binnacle, Roswell keeping close at his side. By
George! it is as you say; the bearings of that island are
altered at least two points!
In which case our drift has exceeded a leagueHa!
what noise is that? Can it be an eruption of the volcano?
Daggett, at first, was inclined to believe it was a sound
produced by some of the internal convulsions of the earth,
which within, as if in mockery of the chill scene that
prevailed
without, was a raging volcano, the fierce heats of
which found vent at the natural chimneys produced by its
own efforts. This opinion, however, did not last long, and
he gave expression to his new thoughts in his answer.
'T is the ice, he said. I do believe the pressure has
caused the fields to part on the rocks of that island. If so,
our leeward floe may float away, as fast as the weather field
approaches.
Hardly, said Roswell, gazing intently towards the
nearest island; hardly; for the most weatherly of the two
will necessarily get the force of the wind and the impetus
of those bergs first, and make the fastest drift. It may
lessen the violence of the nip, but I do not think it will
avert it altogether.
This opinion of Gardiner's fully described all that
subsequently
occurred. The outer floe continued its inroads
on the inner, breaking up the margins of both, until the
channel was so nearly closed as to bring the field from
which the danger was most apprehended in absolute
contact
with the side of the schooner. When the margin of
the outer floe first touched the bilge of the schooner, it was
at the precise spot where the vessel had just been fortified
within. Fenders had also been provided without, and there
was just a quarter of a minute, during which the two
captains
hoped that these united means of defence might
enable
the craft to withstand the pressure. This delusion
lasted but a moment, however, the cracking of timbers
letting
it be plainly seen that the force was too great to be
resisted. For another quarter of a minute, the two masters
held their breath, expecting to see the deck rise beneath
their feet, as the ice rose along the points of contact
between
the floes. Such, in all probability, would have been
the result, had not the pressure brought about another
change, that was quite as much within the influence of the
laws of mechanical forces, though not so much expected.
Owing to the wedge-like form of the vessel's bottom, as
well as to the circumstance that the ice of the outer floe
had a similar shape, projecting beneath the schooner's keel,
the craft was lifted bodily, with an upward jerk, as if she
were suddenly released from some imprisoning power.
Released she was, indeed, and that most opportunely, for
another half-minute would have seen her ribs broken in,
and the schooner a mangled wreck. As she now rose,
Roswell gave vent to his delight in a loud cry, and all
hands felt that the occurrence might possibly save them.
The surge upward was fearful, and several of the men were
thrown off their feet; but it effectually released the
schooner
from the nip, laying her gradually up in the sort of
dock that her people had been so many hours preparing for
her reception. There she lay, inclining a little, partly on
her bilge, or sewed, as seamen term it, when a vessel gets
a list from touching the ground and being left by the tide,
neither quite upright, nor absolutely on her beam-ends.
No sooner was the vessel thus docked, than all
apprehension
of receiving further injury from the outer floe ceased.
It might force the schooner altogether on the inner field,
driving the vessel before it, as an avalanche of mud in the
Alps is known to force cottages and hamlets in its front;
but it could no longer `nip' it. It did not appear probable
to the two masters, however, that the vessel would be forced
from its present berth, the rending and cracking of the ice
sensibly diminishing, as the two floes came closer and closer
together. Nor was this all: it was soon very obvious that
the inner field was drifting, with an increased motion, into
the bay, while the larger, or outer floe, seemed to hang,
from some cause or other. Of the fact there was soon no
doubt, the fissure beginning to open, as slowly and steadily
as it had closed, but noiselessly, and without any rending
of the ice.
We shall get you clear, Daggett! we shall get you
clear! cried Roswell, with hearty good-will, forgetting, in
that moment of generous effort, all feelings of competition
and rivalry. I know what you are after, my good fellow
have understood it from the first. Yonder high land is
the spot you seek; and along the north shore of that island
are elephants, lions, dogs, bears, and other animals, to fill
up all the craft that ever came out of the Vineyard!
This is hearty, Gar'ner, returned the other, giving
his brother master a most cordial shake of the hand, and
it's just what I like. Sealing is a sociable business, and a
craft should never come alone into these high latitudes.
Accidents will happen to the most prudent man living, as
you see by what has just befallen me; for, to own the truth,
we've had a narrow chance of it!
The reader will remember that all which Daggett now
said, was uttered by a man who saw his vessel lying on the
ice, with a list that rendered it somewhat difficult to move
about on her deck, and still in circumstances that would
have caused half the navigators of this world to despair.
Such was not the fact with Daggett, however. Seven
thousand miles from home, alone, in an unknown sea, and
uncertain of ever finding the place he sought, this man had
picked his way among mountains and fields of ice, with
perhaps less hesitation and reluctance than a dandy would
encounter the perils of a crossing, when the streets were a
little moistened by rain. Even then, with his vessel
literally
shelfed on the ice, certain that she had been violently
nipped, he was congratulating himself on reaching a
sealing
ground, from which he could never return without
encountering
all the same dangers over again. As for
Roswell
,
he laughed a little at the other's opinion of the sealing
business, for he was morally certain the Vineyard-man
would have kept the secret, had it been in his possession
alone.
Well, well, we'll forget the past, he said, all but
what we've done to help one another. You stood by me
off Hatteras, and I've been of some service to you here.
You know how it is in our calling, Daggett; first come,
first served. I got here first, and have had the cream of
the business for this season; though I do not by any means
wish to be understood as saying that you are too late.
I hope not, Gar'ner. 'T would be vexatious to have
all this risk and trouble for nothing. How much ile have
you stowed?
All my ground-tier, and a few riders. It is with the
skins that we are doing the best business.
Daggett's eyes fairly snapped at this announcement,
which aroused all his professional ambition, to say nothing
of that propensity to the root of all evil, which had
become
pretty thoroughly incorporated with his moral being,
by dint of example, theory, and association. We have
frequently
had occasion to remark how much more `enjoyable,'
for the intellectual and independent, is a country on the
decline, than a country on the advance. The one is
accumulating
that wealth which the other has already possessed
and improved; and men cease to dwell so much on riches
in their inmost souls, when the means of obtaining them
would seem to have got beyond their reach. This is one
of the secrets of the universal popularity of Italy with the
idle and educated; though the climate, and the monuments,
and the recollections, out of doubt, contribute largely to its
charms. Nevertheless, man, as a rule, is far more removed
from the money-getting mania in Italy, than in almost any
other portion of the Christian world; and this merely
because
the time of her wealth and power has gone by,
leaving
in its train a thousand fruits, that would seem to be the
most savoury, as the stem on which they grew would appear
to be approaching its decay. On Martha's Vineyard,
however
,
aud in no part of the Great Republic, indeed, has this
waning season yet commenced, and the heart of man is still
engrossed with those desires that are to produce the means
which are to lay the foundations for the enjoyment of
generations
to come.
That's luck, indeed, for a craft so early in the season,
returned Daggett, when his eyes had done snapping. Are
the critturs getting to be wild and skeary?
Not more so than the day we began upon them. I
have taken the greatest care to send none but my most
experienced
hands out to kill and skin, and their orders have
been rigid to give as little alarm as possible. If you wish
to fill up, I would advise you to take the same precautions,
for the heel of the season is beginning to show itself.
I will winter here, but I get a full craft, said Daggett,
with a resolute manner, if not absolutely serious in what
he said. Trouble enough have I had to find the group,
and we Vineyard-men don't relish the idee of being
outdone
.
You would be done up, my fine fellow, answered
Roswell, laughing, did you attempt to pass a winter here.
The Sea Lion of Humse's Hull would not herself keep you
in fuel, and you would have to raft it off next summer on
your casks, or remain here for ever.
I suppose a body might expect to see you back again,
another season, observed Daggett, glancing meaningly
towards
his companion, as if he had seriously revolved so
desperate a plan in his mind. 'Tis n't often that a sealer
Vol. II.  2
lets a station like that you've described drop out of his
recollection
in a single v'y'ge.
I may be back or I may notsaid Roswell, just then
remembering Mary, and wondering if she would continue
to keep him any longer in suspense, should he return
successful
from his present adventureThat will depend on
others more than on myself. I wish, however, now we are
both here, and there can no longer be any `hide and go
seek' between us, that you would tell me how you came to
know anything about this cluster of islands, or of the seals
then and there to be found?
You forget my uncle, who died on Oyster Pond, and
whose effects I crossed over to claim?
I remember him very wellsaw him often while living,
and helped to bury him when dead.
Well, our information came from him. He threw out
several hints consarning sealing-grounds aboard the brig
in which he came home; and you needn't be told, Gar'ner,
that a hint of that kind is sartain to find its way through
all the ports down east. But hearing that there was new
sealing-ground wasn't knowing where to find it. I should
have been at a loss, wasn't it for the spot on my uncle's
chart that had been rubbed over lately, as I concluded, to
get rid of some of his notes. You know, as well as I do,
that the spot was in this very latitude and longitude, and
so I came here to look for the much-desired land.
And you have undertaken such an outfit, and come this
long distance into an icy sea, on information as slight as
this! exclaimed Roswell, astonished at this proof of
sagacity
and enterprise, even in men who are renowned for
scenting dollars from pole to pole.
On this, with a few hints picked up, here and there,
among some of the old gentleman's papers. He was fond
of scribbling, and I have got a sort of a chart that he
scratched on a leaf of his bible, that was made to represent
this very group, as I can now see.
Then you could have had no occasion for the printed
chart, with the mark of obliteration on it, and did not come
here on that authority after all.
There you're wrong, Captain Gar'ner. The chart of
the group had no latitude or longitude, but just placed each
island with its bearings and distances from the other islands.
It was no help in finding the place, which might be in one
hemisphere as well as in the other.
It was, then, the mark of the obliteration_____
Marks
, if you please, Captain Gar'ner, interrupted
the other, significantly. My uncle talked a good deal
aboard of that brig about other matters besides sealing.
We think several matters have been obliterated from the
old chart, and we intend to look 'em all up. It's our right,
you know, seeing that the old man was Vineyard-born, and
we are his nearest of kin.
Certainly  rejoined Roswell, laughing again, but
somewhat more faintly than before. Every man for
himself
in this world is a good maxim; it being pretty certain
if we do not take care of ourselves, no one will take care
of us.
Yes, sir, said Stimson, who was standing near; there
is one to care for every hair of our heads, however forgetful
and careless we may be ourselves. Wasn't it for this,
Captain
Gar'ner, there's many a craft that comes into these
seas that would never find its way out of 'em; and many a
bold sailor, with a heart boiling over with fun and frolic,
that would be frozen to an ice-cicle every year!
Gardiner felt the justice of this remark, and easily
pardoned
its familiarity for its truth. In these sealers the
discipline
is by no means of that distant and military or naval
character that is found in even an ordinary merchantman.
As every seaman has an interest in the result of the voyage,
some excuse was made for this departure from the more
general usage; and this familiarity itself never exceeded
the bounds that were necessary to the observance of duty.
Ay, ay, returned Roswell, smilingin one sense you
are right enough; but Captain Daggett and myself were
speaking of human affairs, as human affairs are carried on.
Is not this inner field drifting fast away from the outer,
Daggett? If so, we shall go directly into the bay!
It was as Gardiner thought. By some means that were
not apparent, the floes were now actually separating, and at
a rate of movement which much exceeded that of their
junction. All idea of further danger from the outer field
disappeared, as a matter of course.
It's so, Captain Gar'ner, said Stimson, respectfully,
but with point; and who and what brought it about for
our safety and the preservation of this craft?I just ventur'
to ask that question, sir.
It may be the hand of Providence, my good fellow; for
I very frankly own I can see no direct physical cause.
Nevertheless, I fancy it would be found that the tides or
currents have something to do with it, if the truth could be
come at.
Well, sir, and who causes the tides and currents to
run, this-a-way and that-a-way?
There you have me, Stephen; for I never could get
hold of the clew to their movements at all, answered
Roswell
,
laughing. There is a reason for it all, I dare say, if
one could only find it out. Captain Daggett, it is high time
to look after the safety of your schooner. She ought to be
in the cove before night sets in, since the ice has found its
way into the bay.
This appeal produced a general movement. By this time
the two fields were a hundred fathoms asunder; the smaller,
or that on which the vessel lay, drifting quite fast into the
bay, under the joint influences of wind and current; while
the larger floe had clearly been arrested by the islands.
This smaller field was much lessened in surface, in
consequence
of having been broken at the rocks, though the
fragment that was thus cut off was of more than a league
in diameter, and of a thickness that exceeded many
yards.
As for the Sea Lion of the Vineyard, she was literally
shelfed, as has been said. So irresistible had been the
momentum of the great floe, that it lifted her out of the
water as two or three hands would run up a bark canoe on
a gravelly beach. This lifting process had, very fortunately
for the craft, been effected by an application of force from
below, in a wedge-like manner, and by bringing the strongest
defences of the vessel to meet the power. Consequently, no
essential injury had been done the vessel in thus laying her
on her screw-dock.
If a body could get the craft
off
as easily as she was
got
on
, observed Daggett, as he and Roswell Gardiner
stood looking at the schooner's situation, it would be but
a light job. But, as it is, she lies on ice at least twenty feet
thick, and ice that seems as solid as flint!
We know it is not quite as hard as that, Daggett, was
Roswell's reply; for our saws and axes make great havoc
in it, when we can fairly get at it.
If one
could
get fairly at it! But here you see,
Gar'ner
,
everything is under water, and an axe is next to
useless
.
Nor can the saws be used with much advantage on
ice so thick.
There is no help for it but hard work and great
perseverance
.
I would advise that a saw be set at work at each
end of the schooner, allowing a little room in case of
accidents
,
and that we weaken the foundation by two deep cuts.
The weight of the vessel will help us, and in time she will
settle back into her native element,' as the newspapers
have it.
There was, indeed, no other process that promised
success
,
and the advice of Gardiner was followed. In the
course of the next two hours deep cuts were made with the
saws, which were pushed so low as to reach quite to the
bottom of the cake. This could be done only by what the
sailors called jury-handles, or spars secured to the plates.
The water offered the principal obstacle, for that lay on the
shelf at least five feet deep. Perseverance and ingenuity,
however, finally achieved their aim. A cracking was heard,
the schooner slowly righted, and settled off into the sea
again, as easily and harmlessly as if scientifically launched.
The fenders protected her sides and copper, though the
movement was little more than slowly sinking on the
fragment
of the cake, which, by means of the cuts, had been
gradually so much reduced as to be unable to uphold so
great a weight. It was merely reversing the process of
breaking the camel's back, by laying the last feather on
his load.
This happy conclusion to several hours of severe toil,
occurred just as the field had drifted abreast of the cove,
and was about the centre of the bay. Hazard came up also
at that point, on his return from the volcano, altering his
course a little to speak the strangers. The report of the
mate concerning his discoveries was simple and brief.
There was a volcano, and one in activity; but it had
nothing
2*
remarkable about it. No seal were seen, and there
was little to reward one for crossing the bay. Sterility, and
a chill grandeur, were the characteristics of all that region;
and these were not wanting to any part of the group. Just
as the sun was setting, Gardiner piloted his companion into
the cove; and the two Sea Lions were moored amicably
side by side, and that too at a spot where thousands of the
real animals were to be found within a league.
CHAPTER II.
The morning air blows fresh on him;
The waves dance gladly in his sight;
The sea-birds call, and wheel, and skim
O, blessed morning light!
Dana
.
The
very day succeeding the arrival of the Sea Lion of
the Vineyard, even while his mate was clearing the vessel,
Daggett had a gang on the north shore, killing and
skinning
.
As Roswell's rules were rigidly observed, no other
change was produced by this accession to the force of the
sealers, than additional slaughter. Many more seals were
killed, certainly, but all was done so quietly that no great
alarm was awakened among the doomed animals
themselves
.
One great advantage was obtained by the arrival
of the new party that occasioned a good deal of mirth at
first, but which, in the end, was found to be of great
importance
to the progress of the work. Daggett had taken
to pieces and brought with him the running part of a
common
country wagon, which was soon found of vast service
in transporting the skins and blubber across the rocks.
The wheels were separated, leaving them in pairs, and
each axle was loaded with a freight that a dozen men
would hardly have carried, when two or three hands would
drag in the load, with an occasional lift from other gangs,
to get them up a height, or over a cleft. This portion of
the operation was found to work admirably, owing, in a
great measure, to the smooth surfaces of the rocks; and
unquestionably these wheels advanced the business of the
season at least a fortnight;  Gardiner thought a month.
It rendered the crews better natured, too, much
diminishing
their toil, and sending them to their bunks at night in
a far better condition for rest than they otherwise could
have been.
Just one month, or four weeks to a day, after the second
schooner got in, it being Sunday of course, Gardiner and
Daggett met on the platform of a perfectly even rock that
lay stretched for two hundred yards directly beneath the
house. It was in the early morning. Notwithstanding
there was a strong disposition to work night and day on
the part of the new-comers, Roswell's rule of keeping the
Sabbath as a day of rest had prevailed, and the business
of washing, scrubbing and shaving, had just commenced.
As for the two masters, they required fewer ablutions than
their men, had risen earlier, and were already dressed for
the day.
To-morrow will be the first day of February, said
Daggett, when the salutations of the morning were passed,
and I was calculating my chances of getting full this
season
.
You will be full this week, I conclude, Gar'ner?
We hope to be so, by the middle of it, was the
answer
.
I think the seal are getting to be much shyer than
they were, and am afraid we shall demonstrate that `the
more haste is the worse speed.'
What is that to you? returned Daggett quickly. Of
course you will sail for home as soon as you can get off.
Gardiner did not like the of course, which was
indirectly
saying what the other would do himself under similar
circumstances. Still, it caused no difference in his own
decision, which had been made up under the influence of
much reflection, and of a great deal of good feeling.
I shall do no such thing, Captain Daggett, was the
answer. I do not fancy the idea of leaving a
fellow-creature
,
a countryman  nay, I might say, a neighbour,
on this lone spot, with the uncertainty of his ever getting
out of it. If you can come to some understanding with
my officers and crew, I will keep the schooner here until
we are both full, and ready to sail in company.
In which case you would nat'rally ask a lay for
yourself
?
Naturally, perhaps, I might, returned Roswell,
smiling
,
though positively, I shall not. Not one of us in the
cabin will look for any othe advantage than your good
company. I have talked this matter over with my mates,
and they say that the advantage of having a consort in
getting through the ice is sufficient to justify us in holding
on two or three weeks longer. With the men, it will be a
little different, perhaps; and they will require some pay.
The poor fellows live by their hands, and what their hands
do they will expect to be compensated for.
They shall have good lays, depend on it. As for
yourself
,
Captain Gar'ner, I trust my owners will not forget to
do what is right, if we ever get home, and meet with luck
in the market.
Never fear for me, Daggett. I look for my reward in
the bright eyes and pleasant smiles of as excellent a girl as
Long Island can produce. Mary never fails to reward me
in that way whenever I do right. It
is
right to stand by
you just nowto do as I would be done by; and I'll do it.
Set the thing down as decided, but make your bargain with
my men. And now, Daggett, what say you to climbing
yonder mountain to-day, by way of getting a good survey
of our territories, as well as to take a look at the state of
the ice?
Daggett assented very cheerfully, his mind being greatly
relieved by this assurance of standing by him, on the part
of Roswell; for he had been undecided whether to remain
after the departure of the other schooner or not. All was
now clear to him, however, and the two masters made their
preparations to ascend the mountain as soon as they had
breakfasted. Stimson was summoned to be of the party,
his officer having got to be accustomed to, and desirous of,
his company.
For the first two hours after quitting the house,
Gardiner
,
Daggett, and the boat-steerer, were busily employed
in working their way across the broken surface of the
island, to the base of the cone-like pinnacle that formed
the apex of all. There they rested, and took a little
refreshment
,
conversing the while on the state of the ice in
the offing, so far as the last could be seen from their
present
elevation.
We shall have a sharp hill to climb, should we succeed
in getting up here, observed Roswell, though the rocks
appear to be quite clear of snow just now.
Just now, or never. This is the antarctic dog-days,
Gar'ner, answered Daggett, laughing, and we must make
the most of them. A man can move about without his
pee-jacket
at noon-day, and that is something gained; for, I
have heard of ice making in the bays, even at
mid-summer
.
We are not in a high enough latitude for that, thank
heaven, though pretty well south too. This is our
harvest-time
here, sure enough, and we had better look to it.
As Gardiner said this, the eyes of all three were turned
on the sterile scene around them. The island was not
absolutely destitute of vegetation, as is the case a few
degrees
further south; but it might be said to be nearly so.
A few stunted plants were to be seen in the fissures of the
rocks, and a little soil had been made, seemingly by the
crumbling of the stones, in which a wiry grass occasionally
showed itself. As for the mountain, however, it was mostly
bare; and when our party began to climb, the ascent was
not only difficult, but in places dangerous. Roswell had
foreseen this, and he had made a provision accordingly.
In addition to his lance, used as a leaping-staff and
walking-pike
,
each man had a small coil of ratlin-stuff thrown
over his shoulder, in order to help him in difficult places,
or enable him to help his companions. It was in the
descent
chiefly that these ropes were expected to be of
service
,
though their utility was made apparent ere the three
reached the summit. The ascent of a mountain a thousand
feet in height is no great exploit under ordinary
circumstances
.
Even when there are precipitous cliffs, gorges,
ravines and broken masses, youth, activity and courage
will commonly overcome all the difficulties, placing the
foot of man on eminences that nature would appear to
have intended solely for the dominion of the goat. Thus
did it turn out with the three sealers, all of whom stood on
the bald cap of that mountain, after a vigorous and
somewhat
hazardous ascent, that occupied rather more than an
hour. They had greatly aided each other in achieving
their purpose, to be sure; and the ratlin-stuff was found
of use on more than one occasion.
An extraordinary, and, considering the accessories, a
most brilliant view, rewarded the adventurers. But, after
a few minutes passed in pure admiration of what they
beheld
,
the minds of all three adverted to the parts which
gave such unusual splendour to the panorama. Icebergs
were visible on all sides of them, the great bay excepted;
and the group was surrounded by them, in a way that would
seem to proclaim a blockade. At that season, the south
winds prevailed, though changes were frequent and sudden,
and the vast frozen fleet was drifting north. Gardiner saw
that the passage by which he had brought in his schooner
was now completely closed, and that the only means of exit
from the bay was by its northern outlet. The great depth
of the bergs still prevented their coming within the cluster
of islands, while their number and size completely stopped
the floes from passing.
To the northward, the sea was much more open.
Gardiner
and Daggett both thought, as they gazed in that
direction
,
that it would be easy enough to take a vessel
through the difficulties of the navigation, and that a good
run of eight-and-forty hours would carry her quite beyond
the crowded ice. This sight awakened some regrets in the
two masters, that they were not then in a condition to
depart.
I am almost sorry that we have made a holiday of the
Sunday, said Daggett, seating himself on a point of rock,
to get a little rest after so fatiguing an ascent. Every
minute of time is precious to men in our situation.
Every minute of time is precious to all men, Captain
Daggett, in another and a still more important sense, if
they did but know it, put in Stimson, with a zealous
freedom
,
and a Christian's earnestness.
I understand you, Stephen, and will not gainsay it.
But a sealin' v'y'ge is no place, after all, for a man to give
himself up to Sabbaths and religion.
All places are good, sir, and all hours Sabbaths, when
the heart is in the true state. God is on this naked rock,
as he is on the Vineyard; and a thought, or a syllable, in
his praise, on this mountain, are as pleasant to him as them
that arise from churches and priests.
I believe it is, at least, a mistake in policy to give the
men no day of rest, said Roswell, quietly. Though not
prepared to carry matters as far as my friend Stephen here,
I agree with him entirely in
that
.
And not in believing, sir, that the Spirit of God is on
this island?
In that too, certainly. Neither Captain Daggett nor
myself will be disposed to dispute either of these two
propositions
,
I think, when we come to reflect on them. A
day of rest would seem to be appointed by nature; and I
make no doubt we have filled up all the sooner for having
observed one. Seamen have so many calls on their time
which cannot be neglected, that it is unwise in them to
increase the number unnecessarily.
This is not the spirit, Captain Gar'ner, I'm sorry to
say, in which we should keep our day of rest, though it is
well that we keep it at all. I'm no stickler for houses and
congregations, though they are good enough in their times
and seasons; for every man has a tabernacle in his own
heart, if he's disposed to worship.
And if any place on earth can particularly incline one
to worship God, surely it must be some such spot as this!
exclaimed Roswell, with a degree of fervour it was not
usual for him to exhibit. Never in my life have my eyes
seen a sight as remarkable and as glorious as this!
Well might our young mariner thus exclaim. The day
was fine for the region, but marked by the caprice and
changeful light of high latitudes. There was mist in places,
and flurries of snow were to be seen to the southward, while
the ocean to the northward of the group was glittering
under the brightness of an unclouded sun. It was the
mixed character of this scene that rendered it so peculiar,
while its grandeur, sublimity, and even beauty, were found
in its vastness, its noble though wild accessories, its frozen
and floating mountains, glowing in prismatic light, and the
play of summer on the features of an antarctic view.
'T is a remarkable spot, as no one can deny, answered
Dagget; but I like its abundance of seal the most of all.
I cannot say I have much taste for sights, unless they bring
the promise of good profit with them. We Vineyarders
live in a small way, and are not rich enough to take delight
in landscapes.
Serve God, and reverence his holy name, said
Stimson
,
earnestly, and all places will be good to look upon.
I have been on the Vineyard in my time, and have never
found any difference as to the spot, so long as the heart is
right.
A poor man must work, answered Daggett, dropping
his eyes from the more distant and gorgeous views of the
drifting ice-mountains, to the rocky shore, that was still
frequented by thousands of seals, some of the largest of
which might be seen, even from that elevation, waddling
about; ay, a poor man must work, Sundays or no
Sundays
;
and he who would make his hay, must do it while
the sun shines. I like meetin'-goin' at the right place, and
sealin' when sealin' ought to be done. This day is lost, I
fear, and I hope we shall not have reason to regret it.
Stimson did not abandon what he conceived to be his
duty, but answered this cold, worldly spirit in the best
manner his uncultivated speech enabled him to do. But
his words were thrown away on Daggett. The lust of gold
was strong within him; and while that has full dominion
over the heart, it is vain to expect that any purely spiritual
fruits will ripen there. Daggett was an instance of what,
we fear, many thousands resembling him might be found, up
and down the land, of a man energetic by temperament,
industrious by habit, and even moderate in his views, but
whose whole existence is concentrated in the accumulation
of property. Born poor, and in a state of society in which
no one other generally recognised mode of distinction is so
universally acknowledged as that of the possession of
money
,
it is not surprising that a man of his native disposition
should early bend all his faculties to this one great object.
He was not a miser, like Deacon Pratt, for he could spend
freely, on occasion, and perfectly understood the necessity
of making liberal outfits to insure ample returns; but he
lived for little else than for gain. What such a man might
have become, under more favourable auspices, and with
different desires instilled into his youthful mind, it is not
easy to say; it is only certain that, as he was, the steel-trap
is not quicker to spring at the touch, than he was to arouse
all his manifold energies at the hopes or promise of profit.
As his whole life had been passed in one calling, it was but
natural that his thoughts should most easily revert to the
returns that calling had so often given. He never dreamed
of speculations, knew nothing of stocks, had no concern
with manufactures in cotton or wool, nor had any other
notion of wealth than the possession of a good farm on the
Vineyard, a reasonable amount of money at use, certain
interests in coasters, whalers, and sealers, and a sufficiency
of household effects, and this in a very modest way, to
make himself and family comfortable. Notwithstanding
this seeming moderation, Daggett was an intensely
covetous
man; but his wishes were limited by his habits.
While one of the masters of the sealing crafts was
drawing
these pictures, in his imagination, of wealth after his
manner, very different were the thoughts of the other.
Roswell's fancy carried him far across that blue and
sparkling
ocean, northward, to Oyster Pond, and Deacon Pratt's
homestead, and to Mary. He saw the last in her
single-hearted
simplicity, her maiden modesty, her youthful beauty,
nay, even in her unyielding piety; for, singular as it may
seem, Gardiner valued his mistress so much the more for
that very faith to which, in his own person, he laid no claim.
Irreligious he was not, himself, though skeptical on the one
great tenet of Christianity. But, in Mary, it struck him it
was right that she should believe that which she had been
so sedulously taught; for he did not at all fancy those
inquiring
minds, in the other sex, that lead their possessors
in quest of novelties and paradoxes. In this humour, then,
the reader will not be surprised to hear that he imagined
the deacon's niece in her most pleasing attributes, and
bedecked her with all those charms that render maidens
pleasant to youthful lovers. Had Mary been less devout,
less fixed in her belief that Jesus was the Son of God,
strange as it may seem, the skeptical young man would
have loved her less.
And what was that rugged, uncultivated seaman, who
stood near the two officers, thinking of, all this time? Did
he, too, bend his thoughts on love, and profit, and the
pleasures
of this world? Of love, most truly, was his heart full
Vol. II.  3
to overflowing; but it was the love of God, with that
affection
for all his creatures, that benevolence and faith, which
glow as warmly in the hearts of the humblest and least
educated
,
as in those of the great and learned. His mind was
turned towards his Creator, and it converted the
extraordinary
view that lay before his sight into a vast, magnificent,
gorgeous, though wild temple, for his worship and honour.
It might be well for all of us occasionally to pause in our
eager pursuit of worldly objects, and look around on the
world itself, considering it as but a particle in the
illimitable
fields of creation,one among the many thousands
of other known worlds, that have been set in their places
in honour of the hand that made them. These brief but
vivid glances at the immensity of the moral space which
separates man from his Deity, have very healthful effects in
inculcating that humility which is the stepping-stone of
faith and love.
After passing an hour on the bald cap of the mountain,
sometimes conversing, at others ruminating on the scene,
a change in the weather induced our party to move. There
had been flurries of snow visible all the morning, but it
was in the distance, and among the glittering bergs. Once
the volcano had thus been shut in from view; but now a
driving cloud passed over the mountain itself, which was
quickly as white as the pure element could make it. So
heavy was the fall of snow, that it was soon impossible to
see a dozen yards, and of course the whole of the plain
of the island was concealed. At this most inauspicious
moment, our adventurers undertook their descent.
It is always much less dangerous to mount an acclivity
than to go down it. The upward progress is easily enough
arrested, while that in the other direction is frequently too
rapid to be under perfect command. Roswell felt the truth
of this, and would have proposed a delay until the
atmosphere
became clear again, but it struck him that this was
not likely to occur very soon. He followed Daggett,
therefore
,
though reluctantly, and with due caution. Stimson
brought up the rear.
For the first ten minutes our adventurers got along
without
any great difficulty. They found the precise point at
which they had reached the summit of the mountain, and
began to descend. It was soon apparent that great caution
must be used, the snow rendering the footing slippery.
Daggett, however, was a bold and hot-blooded man when
in motion, and he preceded the party some little distance,
calling out to those behind him to come on without fear.
This the last did, though it was with a good deal more
caution than was observed by their leader. At length, all
three reached a spot where it seemed they could not
overcome
the difficulties. Beneath them was the smooth face
of a rock already covered with snow, while they could not
see far enough in advance to ascertain in what this inclined
plane terminated. Daggett, however, insisted that he knew
the spot; that they had passed up it. There was a broad
shelf a short distance below them; and once on that shelf,
it would be necessary to make a considerable circuit in
order to reach a certain ravine, down which the path would
be reasonably easy. All remembered the shelf and the
ravine; the question was merely whether the first lay
beneath
them, and as near as Daggett supposed. A mistaken
confidence beset the last, and he carried this feeling so far
as to decline taking an end of a line which Roswell threw
to him, but seated himself on the snow and slid downward,
passing almost immediately out of sight.
What has become of him? demanded Roswell,
endeavouring
to pierce the air by straining his eye-balls. He
is not to be seen!
Hold on to the line, sir, and give me the other end of
it; I will go and see, answered Stimson.
It being obviously the most hazardous to remain to the
last, and descend without the support of one above him,
Roswell acquiesced in this proposal, lowering the
boat-steerer
down the rock, until he too was hid from his sight.
But, though out of sight in that dense snow-storm, Stimson
was not so distant as to be beyond the reach of the voice.
Go more to the right, sir, called out the seaman, and
steady me with the line along with you.
This was done, the walking being sufficiently secure at
the elevation where Roswell was. Presently, Stimson shook
the line, and called out again.
That will do, Captain Gar'ner, he said. I am on
the shelf
now
, and have pretty good footing. Lay the line
down on the snow, sir, and slide as slowly as you can;
mind and keep close at its side. I'll stand by to fetch
you up.
Gardiner understood all this perfectly, and did as he was
desired to do. By keeping near the line he reached the
shelf precisely at the spot where Stimson was ready to meet
him; the latter arresting his downward movement by
throwing
the weight of his own body forward to meet his officer.
By such a precaution Roswell was stopped in time, else
would he have gone over the shelf, and down a declivity
that was so nearly perpendicular as to offer no means of
arresting the movement.
And what has become of Captain Daggett? demanded
Gardiner, as soon as on his feet again.
I fear he has shot off the rock, sir, was the answer.
At the place where I reached this shelf, it was so narrow
I could with great difficulty walkcould not, indeed, had
not the line been there to steady me; and, judging from
the marks in the snow, the poor man has gone down
helpless
!
This was appalling intelligence to receive at such a
time, and in such a place! But, Roswell was not unmanned
by it; on the contrary, he acted coolly and with great
judgment. Making a coil of the ratlin-stuff, he threw the
line down until certain it reached bottom, at the distance
of about six fathoms. Then he caused Stimson to brace
himself firmly, holding on to the line, aided by a turn
round a rise in the rock, and he boldly lowered himself
down the precipice, reaching its base at about the distance
he had calculated so to do.
It still snowed violently, the flakes being large, and
eddying
round the angles of the rocks, in flurries so violent as,
at moments, to confound all the senses of the young man.
He was resolute, however, and bent on an object of
humanity, as well as of good fellowship. Living or dead,
Daggett must be somewhere on his present level; and he
began to grope his way among the fragments of rock, eager
and solicitous. The roaring of the wind almost prevented
his hearing other sounds; though once or twice he heard,
or fancied that he heard, the shouts of Stimson from above.
Suddenly, the wind ceased, the snow lessened in quantity,
soon clearing away altogether; and the rays of the sun
and this in the dog-days of that region, be it remembered
fell bright and genial on the glittering scene. At the
next instant, the eyes of Roswell fell on the object of his
search.
Daggett had been carried over the narrow shelf on which
Stimson landed, in consequence of his having no support,
or any means of arresting his momentum. He did thrust
forward his lance, or leaping-staff; but its point met
nothing
but air. The fall, however, was by no means
perpendicular
,
several projections of the rocks helping to lessen
it; though it is probable that the life of the unfortunate
sealer was saved altogether by means of the lance. This
was beneath him as he made his final descent, and he slid
along it the whole length, canting him into a spot where
was the only piece of stinted vegetation that was to be seen
for a considerable distance. In consequence of coming
down on a tolerably thick bunch of furze, the fall was
essentially broken.
When Roswell reached his unfortunate companion, the
latter was perfectly sensible, and quite cool.
God be thanked that you have found me, Gar'ner, he
said; at one time I had given it up.
Thank God, also, that you are living, my friend,
answered
the other. I expected only to find your body;
but you do not seem to be much hurt.
More than appears, Gar'ner; more than appears. My
left leg is broken, certainly; and one of my shoulders pains
me a good deal, though it is neither out of joint or broken.
This is a sad business for a sealing v'y'ge!
Give yourself no concern about your craft, Daggett
I will look to her, and to your voyage.
Will you stand by the schooner, Gar'ner?  Promise
me that, and my mind will be at peace.
I do promise. The two vessels shall stick together,
at all events, until we are clear of the ice.
Ay, but that won't do.
My
Sea Lion must be filled up
as well as your own. Promise me
that
.
It shall be done, God willing. But here comes
Stimson
;
the first thing will be to get you out of this spot.
Daggett was obviously relieved by Roswell's pledges;
3*
for, amid the anguish and apprehensions of his unexpected
state, his thoughts had most keenly adverted to his vessel
and her fortunes. Now that his mind was somewhat
relieved
on this score, the pains of his body became more
sensibly felt. The situation of our party was sufficiently
embarrassing. The leg of Daggett was certainly broken,
a little distance above his ancle; and various bruises in
other places, gave notice of the existence of other injuries.
To do anything with the poor man, lying where he was,
was out of the question, however; and the first thing was
to remove the sufferer to a more eligible position.
Fortunately
it was no great distance to the foot of the mountain,
and a low level piece of rock was accessible by means of
care and steady feet. Daggett was raised between Roswell
and Stimson in a sitting attitude, and supporting himself
by putting an arm around the neck of each. The legs
hung down, the broken as well as the sound limb. To this
accidental circumstance the sufferer was indebted to a piece
of incidental surgery that proved of infinite service to him.
While dangling in this manner the bone got into its place,
and Daggett instantly became aware of that important fact,
which was immediately communicated to Roswell. Of
course the future mode of proceeding was regulated by this
agreeable piece of information.
Sailors are often required to act as physicians, surgeons
and priests. It is not often that they excel in either
capacity
;
but, in consequence of the many things they are called
to turn their hands to, it does generally happen that they
get to possess a certain amount of address that renders
them far more dexterous, in nearly everything they
undertake
,
than the generality of those who are equally strangers
to the particular act that is thus to be exercised. Roswell
had set one or two limbs already, and had a tolerable
notion
of the manner of treating the case. Daggett was now
seated on a rock at the base of the mountain, with his legs
still hanging down, and his back supported by another rock.
No sooner was he thus placed, than Stimson was
despatched
,
post-haste, for assistance. His instructions were full,
and the honest fellow set off at a rate that promised as early
relief as the circumstances would at all allow.
As for our hero, he set about his most important office
the instant Stimson left him. Daggett aided with his
counsel
,
and a little by his personal exertions; for a seaman does
not lie down passively, when anything can be done, even
in his own case.
Baring the limb, Roswell soon satisfied himself that the
bone had worked itself into place. Bandages were instantly
applied to keep it there while splints were making. It was,
perhaps, a little characteristic that Daggett took out his
knife, and aided in shaving down these splints to the
necessary
form and thickness. They were made out of the
staff of the broken lance, and were soon completed.
Roswell
manifested a good deal of dexterity and judgment in
applying the splints. The handkerchiefs were used to
relieve
the pressure in places, and rope-yarns from the
ratlin-stuff
furnished the means of securing everything in its
place. In half an hour, Roswell had his job completed,
and that before there was much swelling to interfere with
him. As soon as the broken limb was thus attended to, it
was carefully raised, and laid upon the rock along with its
fellow, a horizontal position being deemed better than one
that was perpendicular.
Not less than four painful hours now passed, ere the
gang of hands from the vessels reached the base of the
mountain. It came prepared, however, to transport the
sufferer on a hand-barrow that had been used in conveying
the skins of seal across the rocks. On this barrow Daggett
was now carefully placed, when four men lifted him up,
and walked away with him for a few hundred yards. These
were then relieved by four more; and, in this manner, was
the whole distance to the house passed over. The patient
was put in his bunk, and some attention was bestowed on
his bruises and other injuries.
Glad enough was the sufferer to find himself beneath a
roof, and in a room that had its comforts; or what were
deemed comforts on a sealing voyage. As the men were
in the dormitory very little of the time except at night, he
was enabled to sleep; and Roswell had hopes, as he now
told Stimson, that a month or six weeks would set the
patient
on his feet again.
He has been a fortunate fellow, Stephen, that it was
no worse, added Roswell, on that occasion. But for the
luck which turned the lance-pole beneath him, every bone
he has would have been broken.
What you call
luck
, Captain Gar'ner, I call
Providence
,
was Stephen's answer. The good book tells us that not a sparrow shall fall without the eye of Divine
Providence
being on it.
CHAPTER
III
.
Now far he sweeps, where scarce a summer smiles,
On Bhering's rocks, or Greenland's naked isles;
Cold on his midnight watch the breezes blow,
From wastes that slumber in eternal snow,
And waft across the waves' tumultuous roar,
The wolf's long howl from Oonalaska's shore.
Campbell
.
Roswell Gardiner
set about his duties, the succeeding
day, with a shade of deep reflection on his brow. A crisis
had, indeed, come in his affairs, and it behooved him to
look well to his proceedings. Daggett's presence on the
island was no longer of any moment to himself or his owner,
but there remained the secret of the Key, and of the buried
treasure. Should the two schooners keep together, how
was he to acquit himself in that part of his duty, without
admitting of a partnership, against which he knew that
every fibre in the deacon's system, whether physical or
moral, would revolt. Still, his word was pledged, and he
had no choice but to remain, and help fill up the rival Sea
Lion, and trust to his own address in getting rid of her
again, as the two vessels proceeded north.
The chief mate of Daggett's craft, though a good sealer,
was an impetuous and reckless man, and had more than
once found fault with the great precautions used, by the
orders of Roswell. Macy, as this officer was called, was
for making a regular onslaught upon the animals, slaying
as many as they could at once, and then take up the
business
of curing and trying-out as a regular job. He had
seen such things done with success, and he believed it was
the most secure mode of getting along. `Some of these
fine mornings,' as he expressed it, `Captain Gar'ner would
turn out, and find that his herd was offgone to pasture in
some other field.' This was a view of the matter with
which Roswell did not at all agree. His forbearing and
cautious policy had produced excellent results so far, and
he hoped it would continue so to do, until both schooners
were full. On the morning when the men next went forth,
he as leader of both crews, therefore, our young master
renewed his admonitions, pointing out to the new-comers,
in particular, the great necessity there was of using
forbearance
,
and not to alarm the seals more than the work
indispensably
required. The usual number of Ay, ay's, sir!
were given in reply, and the gangs went along the rocks,
seemingly in a good humour to obey these injunctions.
Circumstances, however, were by no means favourable
to giving Roswell the same influence over the
Vineyard-men
as he possessed over his own crew. He was a young
commander, and this was his first voyage in that capacity,
as all well knew; then, there had been rivalry and
competition
between the two crafts, which was a feeling not so
easily removed; next, Macy felt, and even intimated, that
he was the lawful commander of his own schooner, in cases
in which Daggett was disabled, and that the latter had no
power to transfer him and his people to the authority of any
other individual. All these points were discussed that day,
with some freedom, particularly among the Vineyard-men,
and especially the last.
Wisely has it been said that the king's name is a tower
of strength. They who have the law on their side, carry
with them a weight of authority that it is not easy to shake
by means of pure reasoning on right or wrong. Men are
much inclined to defer to those who are thus armed, legal
control being ordinarily quite as effective in achieving a
victory, as having one's quarrel just. In a certain sense,
authority indeed becomes justice, and we look to its proper
exercise as one of the surest means of asserting what is
right between man and man.
The
commodore
says that the critturs are to be treated
delicately, said Macy, laughing, as he lanced his first seal
that morning, a young one of the fur species; so take up
the pet, lads, and lay it in its cradle, while I go look for its
mamma.
A shout of merriment succeeded this sally, and the men
were only so much the more disposed to be rebellious and
turbulent, in consequence of hearing so much freedom of
remark in their officer.
The child's in its cradle, Mr. Macy, returned
Jenkins
,
who was a wag as well as the mate. In my
judgment
,
the best mode of rocking it to sleep will be by
knocking
over all these grim chaps that are so plenty in our
neighbourhood.
Let'em have it! cried Macy, making an onset on an
elephant, as he issued the order. In an instant, the rocks
at that point of the island were a scene of excitement and
confusion. Hazard, who was near at hand, succeeded in
restraining his own people, but it really seemed as if the
Vineyard-men were mad. A great many seals were killed,
it is true; but twenty were frightened to take refuge in the
ocean, where one was slain. All animals have their alarm
cries, or, if not absolutely cries, signals that are understood
by themselves. Occasionally, one sees a herd, or a flock,
take to its heels, or to its wings, without any apparent cause,
but in obedience to some warning that is familiar to their
instincts. Thus must it have been with the seals; for the
rocks were soon deserted, even at the distance of a league
from the scene of slaughter, leaving Hazard and his gang
literally with nothing to do, unless, indeed, they returned
to complete some stowage that remained to be done, on
board their own craft.
I suppose you know, Mr. Macy, all this is contrary to
orders, said Hazard, as he was leading his own gang back
towards the cove. You see I am obliged to go in and
report.
Report and welcome! was the answer. I have no
commander but Captain Daggett;and, by the way, if you
see him, Hazard, just tell him we have made a glorious
morning's work of it.
Ay, ay; you will have your hands full enough to-day,
Macy; but how will it be to-morrow?
Why, just as it has been to-day. The devils must come
up to blow, and we're sartain of 'em, somewhere along the
shore. This day's work is worth any two that I've seen,
since I came upon the island.
Very true; but what will to-morrow's work be worth?
I will tell Captain Daggett what you wish me to say,
however
,
and we will hear his opinion on the subject. In my
judgment, he means to command his craft till she gets back
to the Hole, legs or no legs.
Hazard went his way, shaking his head ominously as he
proceeded. Nor was he much mistaken in what he
expected
from Daggett's anger. That experienced sealer
sent for his mate, and soon gave him to understand that he
was yet his commander. Loose and neighbourly as is
usually
the discipline of one of these partnership vessels, there
is commonly a man on board who is every way competent
to assert the authority given him by the laws, as well as by
his contract. Macy was sent for, rebuked, and menaced
with degradation from his station, should he again presume
to violate his orders. As commonly happens in cases of
this nature, regrets were expressed by the offender, and
future obedience promised.
But the mischief was done. Sealing was no longer the
regular, systematic pursuit it had been on that island, but
had become precarious and changeful. At times, the men
met with good success; then, days would occur in which
not a single creature, of any of the different species, would
be taken. The Vineyard schooner was not more than
half-full
,
and the season was fast drawing to a close. Roswell
was quite ready to sail, and he began to chafe a little under
the extra hazards that were thus imposed on himself and
his people.
In the mean time, or fully three weeks after the
occurrence
of the accident to Daggett, the injuries received by
the wounded man were fast healing. The bones had knit,
and the leg promised, in another month, to become
tolerably
sound, if not as strong as it had been before the hurt.
All the bruises were well, and the captain of the Vineyard
craft was just beginning to move about a little on crutches;
a prodigious relief to one of his habits, after the
confinement
to the house. By dint of great care, he could work
his way down on the shelf that stretched, like a terrace, for
two hundred yards beneath the dwelling. Here he met
Roswell, on the morning of the Sabbath, just three weeks
after their unfortunate visit to the mountain. Each took
his seat on a low point of rock, and they began to converse
on their respective prospects, and on the condition of their
vessels and crews. Stephen was near his officer, as usual.
I believe Stimson was right in urging me to give the
men their Sabbaths, observed Gardiner, glancing round
at the different groups, in which the men were washing,
shaving, and otherwise getting rid of the impurities created
by another week of toil. They begin anew, after a little
rest, with a better will, and steadier hands.
Yes, the Sabbath
is
a great privilege, especially to such
as are on shore, returned Daggett. At sea, I make no
great account of it: a craft must jog along, high days or
holidays.
Depend on it, the same account is kept of the day,
Captain Daggett, in the great log-book above, whether a
man is on or off soundings, put in Stephen, who was
privileged
ever to deliver his sentiments on such subjects.
The Lord is God on the sea, as on the land.
There was a pause; for the solemn manner and undoubted
sincerity of the speaker produced an impression on his
companions, little given as they were to thinking deeply
on things of that nature. Then Roswell renewed the
discourse
,
turning it on a matter that had been seriously
uppermost
in his mind for several days.
I wish to converse with you, Captain Daggett, about
our prospects and chances, he said. My schooner is
full, as you know. We could do no more, if we stayed
here another season. You are about half-full, with a greatly
diminished chance of filling up this summer. Mr. Macy's
attack on the seals has put you back a month, at least, and
every day we shall find the animals less easy to take. The
equinox is not very far off, and then, you know, we shall
get less and less sun,so little, as to be of no great use to
us. We want day-light to get through the ice, and we
shall have a long hundred leagues of it between us and
clear water, even were we to get under way to-morrow.
Remember what a serious thing it would be, to get caught
up here, in so high a latitude, after the sun has left us!
I understand you, Gar'ner, answered the other, quietly,
though his manner denoted a sort of compelled resignation,
rather than any cordial acquiescence in that which he
believed
his brother master intended to propose. You're
master of your own vessel; and I dare say Deacon Pratt
would be much rejoiced to see you coming in between
Shelter Island and Oyster Pond. I'm but a cripple, or I
think the Vineyard craft wouldn't be many days' run astarn!
Roswell was provoked; but his pride was touched also.
Biting his lip, he was silent for a moment, when he spoke
very much to the point, but generously, and like a man.
I'll tell you what it is, Daggett, said our hero,
good-fellowship
is good-fellowship, and the flag is the flag. It
is the duty of all us Yankee seamen to stand by the stripes;
and I hope I'm as ready as another to do what I ought to
do, in such a matter; but my owner is a close calculator,
and I am much inclined to think that he will care less for
this sort of feeling than you and I. The deacon was never
in blue water.
So I supposeHe has a charming daughter, I believe,
Gar'ner?
You mean his niece, I suppose, answered Roswell,
colouring. The deacon never had any child himself, I
believe  at least he has none living. Mary Pratt is his
niece.
It's all the same  niece or daughter, she's comely,
and will be rich, I hear.
Well
, I am
poor
, and what is
more, a
cripple!
Roswell could have knocked his companion down, for
he perfectly understood the character of the allusion; but
he had sufficient self-command to forbear saying anything
that might betray how much he felt.
It is always easier to work upon the sensitiveness of a
spirited and generous-minded man, than to influence him
by force or apprehensions. Roswell had never liked the
idea of leaving Daggett behind him, at that season, and in
that latitude; and he relished it still less, now that he saw
a false reason might be attributed to his conduct.
You certainly do not dream of wintering here, Captain
Daggett? he said, after a pause.
Not if I can help it. But the schooner can never go
Vol. II.  4
back to the Vineyard without a full hold. The very women
would make the island too hot for us in such a case. Do
your duty by Deacon Pratt, Gar'ner, and leave me here to
get along as well as I can. I shall be able to walk a little
in a fortnight; and, in a month, I hope to be well enough
to get out among the people, and regulate their sealing a
little myself. Mr. Macy will be more moderate with my
eye on him.
A month! He who stays here another month may
almost make up his mind to stay eight more of them; if,
indeed, he ever get away from the group at all!
A late start is better than a half-empty vessel. When
you get in to Oyster Pond, Gar'ner, I hope you will send a
line across to the Vineyard, and tell 'em all about us.
Another long and brooding pause succeeded, during
which Roswell's mind was made up.
I will do this with you, Daggett, he said, speaking
like one who had fully decided on his course. Twenty
days longer will I remain here, and help to make out your
cargo; after which I sail, whether you get another skin or
a thousand. This will be remaining as long as any prudent
man ought to stay in so high a latitude.
Give me your hand, Gar'ner. I knew you had the
clear stuff in you, and that it would make itself seen at the
proper moment. I trust that Providence will favour us
it's really a pity to lose as fine a day as this; especially as
the crittur's are coming up on the rocks to bask, something
like old times!
You'll gain no great help from that Providence you
just spoke of, Captain Daggett, by forgetting to keep
`Holy the Sabbath,' said Stimson, earnestly. Try
forbearance
a little, and find the good that will come of it.
He is right, said Roswell, as I know from having
done as he advises. Well, our bargain is made. For twenty
days longer I stay here, helping you to fill up. That will
bring us close upon the equinox, when I shall get to the
northward as fast as I can. In that time, too, I think you
will be able to return to duty.
This, then, was the settled arrangement. Roswell felt
that he conceded more than he ought to do; but the
feeling
of good-fellowship was active within him, and he was
strongly averse to doing anything that might wear the
appearance
of abandoning a companion in his difficulties.
All this time our hero was fully aware that he was
befriending
a competitor; and he was not without his
suspicions
that Daggett wished to keep him within his view
until the visit had been paid to the Key. Nevertheless,
Roswell's mind was made up. He would remain the
twenty days, and do all he could in that time to help along
the voyage of the Vineyarders.
The sealing was now continued with more order and
method than had been observed under Macy's control.
The old caution was respected, and the work prospered in
proportion. Each night, on his return to the house,
Gardiner
had a good report to make; and that peculiar
snapping
of the eye, that denoted Daggett's interest in his
calling, was to be again traced in the expression of the
Vineyarder's features; a certain proof that he was fast
falling into his old train of thought and feeling. Daggett
was never happier than when listening to some account
of the manner in which an old elephant or lion had been
taken, or a number of fur-seals had been made to pay their
tribute to the enterprise and address of his people.
As for Roswell, though he complied with his promise,
and carried on the duty with industry and success, his eye
was constantly turned on those signs that denote the
advance
of the seasons. Now he scanned the ocean to the
northward, and noted the diminished number as well as
lessened size of the floating bergs; proofs that the summer
and the waves had been at work on their sides. Next, his
look was on the sun, which was making his daily course,
lower and lower, each time that he appeared, settling
rapidly away towards the north, as if in haste to quit a
hemisphere that was so little congenial to his character.
The nights, always cool in that region, began to menace
frost; and the signs of the decline of the year that come
so much later in more temperate climates, began to make
themselves apparent here. It is true, that of vegetation
there was so little, and that little so meagre and of so hardy
a nature, that in this respect the progress of the seasons
was not to be particularly noted; but in all others, Roswell
saw with growing uneasiness that the latest hour of his
departure was fast drawing near.
The sealing went on the while, and with reasonable
returns
,
though the golden days of the business had been
seriously interrupted by Macy's indiscretion and
disobedience
.
The men worked hard, for they too foresaw the
approach of the long night of the antarctic circle, and all
the risk of remaining too long. As we have had frequent
occasion to use the term `antarctic,' it may be well here
to say a few words in explanation. It is not our wish to
be understood that these sealers had penetrated literally
within that belt of eternal snows and ice, but
approximatively
.
Few navigators, so far as our knowledge extends,
have absolutely gone as far south as this. Wilkes did it,
it is true; and others among the late explorers have been
equally enterprising and successful. The group visited by
Gardiner on this occasion was quite near to this imaginary
line; but we do not feel at liberty precisely to give its
latitude and longitude. To this hour it remains a species
of private property; and in this age of anti-rentism and
other audacious innovations on long-received and venerable
rules of conduct, we do not choose to be parties to any
inroads on the rights of individuals when invaded by the
cupidity and ruthless power of numbers. Those who wish
to imitate Roswell must find the islands by bold adventure
as he reached them; for we are tongue-tied on the subject.
It is enough, therefore, that we say the group is
near
the
antarctic circle; whether a little north or a little south of
it, is a matter of no moment. As those seas have a general
character, we shall continue to call them the antarctic
seas; with the understanding that, included in the term,
are the nearest waters without as well as within the circle.
Glad enough was Roswell Gardiner when his twenty
days were up. March was now far advanced, and the
approach
of the long nights was near. The Vineyard craft
was not full, nor was Daggett yet able to walk without a
crutch; but orders were issued by Gardiner, on the evening
of the last day, for his own crew to knock off sealing,
and to prepare to get under way for home.
Your mind is made up, Gar'ner, said Daggett, in a
deprecating sort of way, as if he still had latent hopes of
persuading his brother-master to remain a little longer.
Another week would almost fill us up.
Not another day, was the answer. I have stayed too
long already, and shall be off in the morning. If you will
take my advice, Captain Daggett, you will do the same
thing. Winter comes in this latitude very much as spring
appears in our own; or with a hop, skip, and a jump. I
have no fancy to be groping about among the ice, after the
nights get to be longer than the days!
All true enough, Gar'ner; all quite true  but it has
such a look to take a craft home, and she not full!
You have a great abundance of provisions; stop and
whale awhile on the False Banks, as you go north. I
would much rather stick by you there a whole month, than
remain here another day.
You make me narvous, talking of the group in this
way! I'm sartain that this bay must remain clear of ice
several weeks longer.
Perhaps it may; it is more likely to be so than to freeze
up. But this will not lengthen the days and carry us safe
through the fields and bergs that we know are drifting about
out here to the northward. There's a hundred leagues of
ocean thereaway, Daggett, that I care for more just now,
than for all the seal that are left on these islands. But,
talking is useless; I go to-morrow; if you are wise, you
will sail in company.
This settled the matter. Daggett well knew it would be
useless to remain without the aid of Roswell's counsel, and
that of his crew's hands; for Macy was not to be trusted
any more as the leader of a gang of sealers. The man had
got to be provoked and reckless, and had called down upon
himself latterly more than one rebuke. It was necessary,
therefore, that one of the Sea Lions should accompany the
other. The necessary orders were issued accordingly, and
hey for home! were the words that now cheerfully
passed
from mouth to mouth. That pleasant idea of home,
in which is concentrated all that is blessed in this life, the
pale of the Christian duties and charities excepted, brings
to each mind its particular forms of happiness and good.
The weather-beaten seaman, the foot-worn soldier, the
weary traveller, the adventurer in whatever lands interest
4*
or pleasure may lead, equally feels a throb at his heart as
he hears the welcome sounds of hey for home. Never
were craft prepared for sea with greater rapidity than was
the case now with our two Sea Lions. It is true that the
Oyster-Ponders were nearly ready, and had been quite so,
for a fortnight; but a good deal remained to be done among
the Vineyarders. The last set themselves to their task with
a hearty good-will, however, and with corresponding
results
.
We will leave the house standing for them that come
after us, said Roswell, when the last article belonging to his
schooner was taken out of it. The deacon has crammed
us so full of wood that I shall be tempted to throw half of it
overboard, now we have so much cargo. Let all stand,
Hazard, bunks, planks and all; for really we have no room
for the materials. Even this wood, pointing to a pile of
several cords that had been landed already to make room
for skins and casks that had been brought out in shocks,
must go to the next comer. Perhaps it may be one of
ourselves; for we sailors never know what port will next
fetch us up.
I hope it will be old Sag, sir, answered Hazard,
cheerfully
;
for, though no great matter of a seaport, it is near
every man's home, and may be called a sort of door-way to
go in and out of the country through.
A side-door, at the best, answered Roswell. With
you, I trust it will be the next haven that we enter; though
I shall take the schooner at once in behind Shelter Island,
and tie her up to the deacon's wharf.
What images of the past and future did these few jocular
words awaken in the mind of our young sealer! He
fancied
that he saw Mary standing in the porch of her uncle's
habitation, a witness of the approach of the schooner,
looking
wistfully at the still indistinct images of those who were
to be seen on her decks. Mary had often done this in her
dreams; again and again had she beheld the white sails
of the Sea Lion driving across Gardiner's Bay, and
entering
Peconic; and often had she thus gazed in the
weather-worn
countenance of him who occupied so much of her
thoughtsso many of her prayerspicturing through the
mysterious images of sleep the object she so well loved
when waking.
And where was Mary Pratt at that day and hour when
Roswell was thus issuing his last orders at Sealer's Land;
and what was her occupation, and what her thoughts? The
difference in longitude between the group and Montauk
was so trifling that the hour might be almost called
identical
.
Literally so, it was not; but mainly so, it was. There
were not the five degrees in difference that make the twenty
minutes in time. More than this we are not permitted to
say on this subject; and this is quite enough to give the
navigator a pretty near notion of the position of the group.
As a degree of longitude measures less than twenty-eight
statute miles at the polar circles, this is coming within a
day's run of the spot, so far as longitude is concerned; and
nearer than that we do not intend to carry the over-anxious
reader, let his curiosity be as lively as it may.
And where, then, was Mary Pratt? Safe, well, and
reasonably
happy, in the house of her uncle, where she had
passed most of her time since infancy. The female friends
of mariners have always fruitful sources of uneasiness in
the pursuit itself; but Mary had no other cause for concern
of this nature than what was inseparable from so long a
voyage, and the sea into which Roswell had gone. She
well knew that the time was arrived when he was expected
to be on his way home; and as hope is an active and
beguiling
feeling, she already fancied him to be much
advanced
on his return. But a dialogue which took place
that very daynay, that very hour  between her and the
deacon, will best explain her views and opinions, and
expectations
.
It's very extr'or'nary, Mary, commenced the uncle,
that Gar'ner doesn't write! If he only know'd how a
man feels when his property is ten thousand miles off, I'm
sartain he would write, and not leave me with so many
misgivings in the matter.
By whom is he to write, uncle? answered the more
considerate and reasonable niece. There are no
post-offices
in the antarctic seas, nor any travellers to bring
letters
by private hands.
But he
did
write once; and plaguy good news was it
that he sent us in that letter!
He did write from Rio, for there he had the means.
By my calculations, Roswell has left his sealing ground
some three or four weeks, and must now be as many
thousand
miles on his way home.
D'ye think so, gal?d'ye think so? exclaimed the
deacon, his eyes fairly twinkling with pleasure. That
would be good news; and if he doesn't stop too long by the
way, we might look for him home in less than ninety days
from this moment!
Mary smiled pensively, and a richer colour stole into her
cheeks, slowly but distinctly.
I do not think, uncle, that Roswell Gardiner will be
very likely to stop on his way to us here, on Oyster Pond,
was the answer she made.
I should be sorry to think that. The best part of his
v'y'ge may be made in the West Ingees, and I hope he is
not a man to overlook his instructions.
Will Roswell be obliged to stop in the West Indies,
uncle?
Sartainif he obeys his orders; and I think the young
man will do
that
. But the business there will not detain
him long,Mary's countenance brightened again, at this
remark,and, should you be right, we may still look for
him in the next ninety days.
Mary remained silent for a short time, but her charming
face was illuminated by an expression of heartfelt happiness,
which, however, the next remark of her uncle's had an
obvious
tendency to disturb.
Should Gar'ner come home successful, Mary, inquired
the deacon, successful in all thingssuccessful in sealing,
and successful in that other matterthe West Ingee
business
,
I meanbut successful in all, as I daily pray he may
be,I want to know if you would then have him; always
supposing that he got back himself unchanged?
Unchanged, I shall never be his wife, answered Mary,
tremulously, but firmly.
The deacon looked at her in surprise; for he had never
comprehended but one reason why the orphan and
penniless
Mary should refuse so pertinaciously to become the
wife of Roswell Gardiner; and that was his own want of
means. Now the deacon loved Mary more than he was
aware of himself, but he had never actually made up his
mind to leave her the heiress of his estate. The idea of
parting with property at all, was too painful for him to think
of making a will; and without such an instrument, there
were others who would have come in for a part of the assets,
share and share alike, as the legal men express it. Of
all this was the deacon fully aware, and it occasionally
troubled him: more of late than formerly, since he felt in
his system the unerring signs of decay. Once had he got
so far as to write on a page of foolscape, In the name of
God, Amen; but the effort proved too great for him, and
he abandoned the undertaking. Still Deacon Pratt loved
his niece, and was well inclined to see her become the wife
of young Gar'ner, more especially should the last return
successful.
Unchanged! repeated the uncle, slowly; you
sartainly
would not wish to marry him, Mary, if he was
changed!
I do not mean changed, in the sense you are thinking
of, uncle. But we will not talk of this now. Why should
Roswell stop in the West Indies at all? It is not usual for
our vessels to stop there.
No, it is not. If Gar'ner stop at all, it will be on a
very
unusual
business, and one that may make all our
fortunes
your'n,
as well as his'n and mine, Mary.
I hope that sealers never meddle with the
transportation
of slaves, uncle! the girl exclaimed, with a face filled
with apprehension. I would rather live and die poor,
than have anything to do with them!
I see no such great harm in the trade, gal; but such
is not Roswell's ar'nd in the West Ingees. It's a great
secret, the reason of his call there; and I will venture to
foretell that, should he make it, and should it turn out
successful
,
you will marry him, gal.
Mary made no reply. Well was she assured that
Roswell
had an advocate in her own heart, that was pleading
for him, night and day; but firm was her determination not
to unite herself with one, however dear to her, who set up his
own feeble understanding of the nature of the mediation
between
God and man, in opposition to the plainest language
of revelation, as well as to the prevalent belief of the church,
since the ages that immediately succeeded the Christian
era.
CHAPTER IV.
Poor child of danger, nursling of the storm,
Sad are the woes that wreck thy manly form!
Rocks, waves, and winds the shatter'd bark delay;
Thy heart is sad, thy home is far away.
Campbell
.
It
was about midday, when the two Sea Lions opened
their canvass, at the same moment, and prepared to quit
Sealer's Land. All hands were on board, every article was
shipped for which there was room, and nothing remained
that denoted the former presence of man on that dreary
island, but the deserted house, aud three or four piles of
cord-wood, that had grown on Shelter Island and Martha's
Vineyard, and which was now abandoned on the rocks of
the antarctic circle. As the topsails were sheeted home,
and the heavy fore-and-aft mainsails were hoisted, the songs
of the men sounded cheerful and animating. `Home' was
in every tone, each movement, all the orders. Daggett
was on deck, in full command, though still careful of his
limb, while Roswell appeared to be everywhere. Mary
Pratt was before his mind's eye all that morning; nor did
he even once think how pleasant it would be to meet her
uncle, with a There, deacon, is your schooner, with a
good cargo of elephant-oil, well chucked off with fur-seal
skins.
The Oyster Pond craft was the first clear of the ground.
The breeze was little felt in that cove, where usually it did
not seem to blow at all, but there was wind enough to serve
to cast the schooner, and she went slowly out of the rocky
basin, under her mainsail, foretopsail, and jib. The wind
was at south-west,the nor-wester of that hemisphere,
and it was fresh and howling enough, on the other side of
the island. After Roswell had made a stretch out into the
bay of about a mile, he laid his foretopsail flat aback, hauled
over his jib-sheet, and put his helm hard down, in waiting
for the other schooner to come out and join him. In a
quarter of an hour, Daggett got within hail.
Well, called out the last, you see I was right,
Gar'ner
;
wind enough out here, and more, still further from
the land. We have only to push in among them bergs
while it is light, pick out a clear spot, and heave-to during
the night. It will hardly do for us to travel among so much
ice in the dark.
I wish we had got out earlier, that we might have made
a run of it by day-light, answered Roswell. Ten hours
of such a wind, in my judgment, would carry us well
towards clear water.
The delay could not be helped. I had so many traps
ashore, it took time to gather them together. Come, fill
away, and let us be moving. Now we are under way, I'm
in as great haste as you are yourself.
Roswell complied, and away the two schooners went,
keeping quite near to each other, having smooth water, and
still something of a moderated gale, in consequence of the
proximity and weatherly position of the island. The course
was towards a spot to leeward, where the largest opening
appeared in the ice, and where it was hoped a passage to
the northward would be found. The further the two
vessels
got from the land, the more they felt the power of the
wind, and the greater was their rate of running. Daggett
soon found that he could spare his consort a good deal of
canvass, a consequence of his not being full, and he took
in his topsail, though, running nearly before the wind, his
spar would have stood even a more severe strain.
As the oldest mariner, it had been agreed between the
two masters that Daggett should lead the way. This he
did for an hour, when both vessels were fairly out of the
great bay, clear of the group altogether, and running off
north-easterly, at a rate of-nearly ten knots in the hour.
The sea got up as they receded from the land, and
everything
indicated a gale, though one of no great violence.
Night was approaching, and an Alpine-like range of
icebergs
was glowing, to the northward, under the oblique
rays of the setting sun. For a considerable space around
the vessels, the water was clear, not even a cake of any sort
being to be seen; and the question arose in Daggett's mind,
whether he ought to stand on, or to heave-to and pass the
night well to windward of the bergs. Time was precious,
the wind was fair, the heavens clear, and the moon would
make its appearance about nine, and might be expected to
remain above the horizon until the return of day. This
was one side of the picture. The other presented less
agreeable points. The climate was so fickle, that the
clearness
of the skies was not to be depended on, especially with
a strong south-west winda little gale, in fact; and a
change in this particular might be produced at any moment.
Then it was certain that floes, and fragments of bergs,
would be found near, if not absolutely among the sublime
mountain-like piles that were floating about, in a species
of grand fleet, some twenty miles to leeward. Both of our
masters, indeed all on board of each schooner, very well
understood that the magnificent array of icy islands which
lay before them was owing to the currents, for which it is
not always easy to account. The clear space was to be
attributed to the same cause, though there was little doubt
that the wind, which had now been to the southward fully
eight-and-forty hours, had contributed to drive the icy fleet
to the northward. As a consequence of these facts, the
field-ice must be in the vicinity of the bergs, and the
embarrassment
from that source was known always to be very
great.
It required a good deal of nerve for a mariner to run in
among dangers of the character just described, as the sun
was setting. Nevertheless, Daggett did it; and Roswell
Gardiner followed the movement, at the distance of about
a cable's length. To prevent separation, each schooner
showed a light at the lower yard-arm, just as the day was
giving out its last glimmerings. As yet, however, no
difficulty
was encountered; the alpine-looking range being yet
quite two hours' run still to leeward. Those two hours
must be passed in darkness; and Daggett shortened sail
in order not to reach the ice before the moon rose. He
had endeavoured to profit by the light as long as it
remained
,
to find a place at which he might venture to enter
among the bergs, but had met with no great success. The
opening first seen now appeared to be closed, either by
means of the drift or by means of the change in the
position
of the vessels; and he no longer thought of
that
.
Fortune must be trusted to, in some measure; and on he
went, Roswell always closely following.
The early hours of that eventful night were intensely
dark. Nevertheless, Daggett stood down towards the icy
range, using no other precautions than shortening sail and
keeping a sharp look-out. Every five minutes the call from
the quarter-deck of each schooner to keep a bright
look-out
was heard, unless, indeed, Daggett or Roswell was on
his own forecastle, thus occupied in person. No one on
board of either vessel thought of sleep. The watch had
been called, as is usual at sea, and one half of the crew
was at liverty to go below and turn in. What was more,
those small fore-and-aft rigged craft were readily enough
handled by a single watch; and this so much the more
easily, now that their top-sails were in. Still, not a man
left the deck. Anxiety was too prevalent for this, the least
experienced hand in either crew being well aware that the
next four-and-twenty hours would, in all human probability,
be decisive of the fate of the voyage.
Both Daggett and Gardiner grew more and more uneasy
as the time for the moon to rise drew near, without the orb
of night making its appearance. A few clouds were driving
athwart the heavens, though the stars twinkled as usual,
in their diminutive but sublime splendour. It was not so
dark that objects could not be seen at a considerable
distance
;
and the people of the schooners had no difficulty in
very distinctly tracing, and that not very far ahead, the
broken outlines of the chain of floating mountains. No
alpine pile, in very fact, could present a more regular or
better defined range, and in some respects more fantastic
outlines. When the bergs first break away from their
native
moorings, their forms are ordinarily somewhat regular;
the summits commonly resembling table-land. This
regularity
of shape, however, is soon lost under the rays of the
summer sun, the wash of the ocean, and most of all by the
wear of the torrents that gush out of their own frozen
bosoms. A distinguished navigator of our own time has
Vol. II.  5
compared the appearance of these bergs, after their
regularity
of shape is lost, and they begin to assume the
fantastic
outlines that uniformly succeed, to that of a deserted
town, built of the purest alabaster, with its edifices
crumbling
under the seasons, and its countless unpeopled streets,
avenues and alleys. All who have seen the sight unite in
describing it as one of the most remarkable that comes
from the lavish hand of nature.
About nine o'clock on the memorable night in question,
there was a good deal of fog driving over the ocean to
increase
the obscurity. This rendered Daggett doubly
cautious
,
and he actually hauled up close to the wind, heading
off well to the westward, in order to avoid running in among
the bergs, in greater uncertainty than the circumstances
would seem to require. Of course Roswell followed the
movement; and when the moon first diffused its mild rays
on the extraordinary scene, the two schooners were
pitching
into a heavy sea, within less than a mile of the
weather-line
of the range of bergs. It was soon apparent that floes
or field ice accompanied the floating mountains, and
extended
so far to the southward of them as to be already
within an inconvenient if not hazardous proximity to the
two vessels. These floes, however, unlike those previously
encountered, were much broken by the undulations of the
waves, and seldom exceeded a quarter of a mile in
diameter
;
while thousands of them were no larger than the
ordinary
drift ice of our own principal rivers in the time of a
freshet. Their vicinity to the track of the schooners,
indeed
,
was first ascertained by the noise they produced in
grinding against each other, which soon made itself audible
even above the roaring of the gale.
Both of our masters now began to be exceedingly
uncomfortable
.
It was soon quite apparent that Daggett had
been too bold, and had led down towards the ice without
sufficient caution and foresight. As the moon rose, higher
and higher, the difficulties and dangers to leeward became
at each minute more and more apparent. Nothing could
have been more magnificent than the scene which lay
before
the eyes of the mariners, or would have produced a
deeper feeling of delight, had it not been for the lively
consciousness of the risk the two schooners and all who
were in them unavoidably ran, by being so near and to
windward of such an icy coast, if one may use the
expression
as relates to floating bodies. By that light it was very
easy to imagine Wilkes' picture of a ruined town of
alabaster
.
There were arches of all sizes and orders;
pinnacles
without number; towers, and even statues and columns.
To these were to be added long lines of perpendicular walls,
that it was easy enough to liken to fortresses, dungeons and
temples. In a word, even the Alps, with all their
peculiar
grandeur, and certainly on a scale so vastly more
enlarged
,
possess no one aspect that is so remarkable for its
resemblance to the labours of man, composed of a material
of the most beautiful transparency, and considered as the
results of human ingenuity, on a scale so gigantic. The
glaciers have often been likened, and not unjustly, to a
frozen sea; but here were congealed mountains seemingly
hewed into all the forms of art, not by the chisel it is true,
but by the action of the unerring laws which produced
them.
Perhaps Roswell Gardiner was the only individual in
those two vessels that night who was fully alive to all the
extraordinary magnificence of its unusual pictures.
Stephen
may, in some degree, have been an exception to the
rule; though he saw the hand of God in nearly all things,
It's wonderful to look at, Captain Gar'ner, isn't it? said
this worthy seaman, about the time the light of the moon
began to tell on the view; wonderful, truly, did we not
know who made it all! These few and simple words had
a cheering influence on Roswell, and served to increase
his confidence in eventual success. God did produce all
things, either directly or indirectly; this even his sceptical
notions could allow; and that which came from divine
wisdom must be intended for good. He would take courage,
and for once in his life trust to Providence. The most
resolute
man by nature feels his courage augmented by such
a resolution.
The gales of the antarctic sea are said to be short, though
violent. They seldom last six-and-thirty hours, and for
about a third of that time they blow with their greatest
violence. As a matter of course, the danger amid the ice
is much increased by a tempest; though a good working
breeze, or small gale of wind, perhaps, adds to a vessel's
security, by rendering it easier to handle her, and to avoid
floes and bergs. If the ice is sufficient to make a lee,
smooth water is sometimes a consequence; though it
oftener happens that the turbulence produced in clear water
is partially communicated over a vast surface, causing the
fields and mountains to grind against each other under the
resistless power of the waves. On the present occasion,
however, the schooners were still in open water, where the
wind had a long and unobstructed rake, and a sea had got
up that caused both of the little craft to bury nearly to their
gunwales. What rendered their situation still more
unpleasant
was the fact that all the water which came aboard of
them now soon froze. To this, however, the men were
accustomed, it frequently happening that the moisture
deposited
on their rigging and spars by the fogs froze during
the nights of the autumn. Indeed, it has been thought by
some speculators on the subject, that the bergs themselves
are formed in part by a similar process, though snows
undoubtedly
are the principal element in their composition.
This it is which gives the berg its stratified appearance,
no geological formation being more apparent or regular in
this particular than most of these floating mountains.
About ten, the moon was well above the horizon; the
fog had been precipitated in dew upon the ice, where it
congealed, and helped to arrest the progress of dissolution;
while the ocean became luminous for the hour, and objects
comparatively distinct. Then it was that the seamen first
got a clear insight into the awkwardness of their situation.
The bold are apt to be reckless in the dark; but when
danger is visible, their movements become more wary and
better calculated than those of the timid. When Daggett
got this first good look at the enormous masses of the
field-ice
,
that, stirred by the unquiet ocean, were grinding each
other, and raising an unceasing rushing sound like that the
surf produces on a beach, though far louder, and with a
harshness in it that denoted the collision of substances
harder than water, he almost instinctively ordered every
sheet to be flattened down, and the schooner's head brought
as near the wind as her construction permitted. Roswell
observed the change in his consort's line of sailing, slight
as it was, and imitated the manuvre. The sea was too
heavy to dream of tacking, and there was not room to ware.
So close, indeed, were some of the cakes, those that might
be called the stragglers of the grand array, that repeatedly
each vessel brushed along so near them as actually to
receive
slight shocks from collisions with projecting portions.
It was obvious that the vessels were setting down upon the
ice, and that Daggett did not haul his wind a moment too
soon.
The half-hour that succeeded was one of engrossing
interest
.
It settled the point whether the schooners could or
could not eat their way into the wind sufficiently to weather
the danger. Fragment after fragment was passed; blow
after blow was received; until suddenly the field-ice
appeared
directly in front. It was in vast quantities,
extending
to the southward far as the eye could reach. There
remained no alternative but to attempt to ware. Without
waiting longer than to assure himself of the facts, Daggett
ordered his helm put up and the main gaff lowered. At
that moment both the schooners were under their jibs and
foresails, each without its bonnet, and double-reefed
mainsails
.
This was not canvass very favourable for waring,
there being too much after-sail; but the sheets were
attended
to, and both vessels were soon driving dead to
leeward
,
amid the foam of a large wave; the next instant, ice
was heard grinding along their sides.
It was not possible to haul up on the other tack ere the
schooners would be surrounded by the floes; and seeing a
comparatively open passage a short distance ahead, Daggett
stood in boldly, followed closely by Roswell. In ten
minutes
they were fully a mile within the field, rendering all
attempts to get out of it to windward so hopeless as to be
almost desperate. The man\uvre of Daggett was begun
under circumstances that scarcely admitted of any
alternative
,
though it might be questioned if it were not the best
expedient that offered. Now that the schooners were so far
within the field-ice, the water was much less broken, though
the undulations of the restless ocean were still
considerable
,
and the grinding of ice occasioned by them was really
terrific. So loud was the noise produced by these constant
and violent collisions, indeed, that the roaring of the wind
5*
was barely audible, and that only at intervals. The sound
was rushing, like that of an incessant avalanche, attended
by cracking noises that resembled the rending of a glacier.
The schooners now took in their foresails, for the double
purpose of diminishing their velocity and of being in a
better condition to change their course, in order to avoid
dangers ahead. These changes of course were necessarily
frequent; but, by dint of boldness, perseverance and skill,
Daggett worked his way into the comparatively open
passage
already mentioned. It was a sort of river amid the
floes, caused doubtless by some of the inexplicable
currents
,
and was fully a quarter of a mile in width, straight
as an air-line, and of considerable length; though how
long could not be seen by moonlight. It led, moreover,
directly down towards the bergs, then distant less than a
mile. Without stopping to ascertain more, Daggett stood
on, Roswell keeping close on his quarter. In ten minutes
they drew quite near to that wild and magnificent ruined
city of alabaster that was floating about in the antarctic
sea!
Notwithstanding the imminent peril that now most
seriously
menaced the two schooners, it was not possible to
approach that scene of natural grandeur without feelings
of awe, that were allied quite as much to admiration as to
dread. Apprehension certainly weighed on every heart;
but curiosity, wonder, even delight, were all mingled in
the breasts of the crews. As the vessels came driving down
into the midst of the bergs, everything contributed to
render the movements imposing in all senses, appalling in
one. There lay the vast maze of floating mountains,
generally of a spectral white at that hour, though many of
the masses emitted hues more pleasing, while some were
black as night. The passages between the bergs, or what
might be termed the streets and lanes of this
mysterious-looking
,
fantastical, yet sublime city of the ocean, were
numerous, and of every variety. Some were broad, straight
avenues, a league in length; others winding and narrow;
while a good many were little more than fissures, that might
be fancied lanes.
The schooners had not run a league within the bergs
before they felt much less of the power of the gale, and the
heaving and setting of the seas were sensibly diminished.
What was, perhaps, not to be expected, the field-ice had
disappeared entirely within the passages of the bergs, and
the only difficulty in navigating was to keep in such
channels
as had outlets, and which did not appear to be closing.
The rate of sailing of the two schooners was now greatly
lessened, the mountains usually intercepting the wind,
though it was occasionally heard howling and scuffling in
the ravines, as if in a hurry to escape, and pass on to the
more open seas. The grinding of the ice, too, came down
in the currents of air, furnishing fearful evidence of
dangers
that were not yet distant. As the water was now
sufficiently smooth, and the wind, except at the mouths of
particular ravines, was light, there was nothing to prevent
the schooners from approaching each other. This was
done, and the two masters held a discourse together on the
subject of their present situation.
You're a bold fellow, Daggett, and one I should not
like to follow in a voyage round the world, commenced
Roswell. Here we are, in the midst of some hundreds
of ice-bergs; a glorious sight to behold, I must confess
but are we ever to get out again?
It is much better to be here, Gar'ner, returned the
other, than to be among the floes. I'm always afraid of
my starn and my rudder when among the field-ice;
whereas
there is no danger hereabouts that cannot be seen before
a vessel is on it. Give me my eyes, and I feel that I have
a chance.
There is some truth in that; but I wish these channels
were a good deal wider than they are. A man may
feel
a
berg as well as see it. Were two of these fellows to take
it into their heads to close upon us, our little craft would
be crushed like nuts in the crackers!
We must keep a good look-out for that. Here seems
to be a long bit of open passage ahead of us, and it leads
as near north as we can wish to run. If we can only get
to the other end of it, I shall feel as if half our passage
back to Ameriky was made.
The citizen of the United States calls his country
America
par excellence
, never using the addition of `North,'
as is practised by most European people. Daggett meant
`home,' therefore, by his `Ameriky,' in which he saw no
other than the east end of Long Island, Gardiner's Island,
and Martha's Vineyard. Roswell understood him, of
course; so no breath was lost.
In my judgment, returned Gardiner, we shall not
get clear of this ice for a thousand miles. Not that I
expect
to be in a wilderness of it, as we are to-night; but
after such a summer, you may rely on it, Daggett, that the
ice will get as far north as 45, if not a few degrees
further
.
It is possible: I have seen it in 42 myself; and in 40
to the nor'ard of the equator. If it get as far as 50,
however
,
in this part of the world, it will do pretty well. That
will be play to what we have just hereIn the name of
Divine Providence, what is that, Gar'ner!
Not a voice was heard in either vessel; scarcely a breath
was drawn! A heavy, groaning sound had been instantly
succeeded by such a plunge into the water, as might be
imagined to succeed the fall of a fragment from another
planet. Then all the bergs near by began to rock as if
agitated by an earthquake. This part of the picture was
both grand and frightful. Many of those masses rose above
the sea more than two hundred feet perpendicularly, and
showed wall-like surfaces of half a league in length. At
the point where the schooners happened to be just at that
moment, the ice-islands were not so large, but quite as
high, and consequently were more easily agitated. While
the whole panorama was bowing and rocking, pinnacles,
arches, walls and all, seeming about to totter from their
bases, there came a wave sweeping down the passage that
lifted them high in the air, some fifty feet at least, and bore
them along like pieces of cork, fully a hundred yards.
Other waves succeeded, though of less height and force;
when, gradually, the water regained its former and more
natural movement, and subsided.
This has been an earthquake! exclaimed Daggett.
That volcano has been pent up, and the gas is stirring
up the rocks beneath the sea.
No, sir, answered Stimson, from the forecastle of his
own schooner, it's not that, Captain Daggett. One of
them bergs has turned over, like a whale wallowing, and it
has set-all the others a-rocking.
This was the true explanation; one that did not occur
to the less experienced sealers. It is a danger, however,
of no rare occurrence in the ice, and one that ever needs
to be looked to. The bergs, when they first break loose
from their native moorings, which is done by the agency
of frosts, as well as by the action of the seasons in the
warm months, are usually tabular, and of regular outlines;
but this shape is soon lost by the action of the waves on
ice of very different degrees of consistency; some being
composed of frozen snow; some of the moisture
precipitated
from the atmosphere in the shape of fogs; and some
of pure frozen water. The first melts soonest; and a berg
that drifts for any length of time with one particular face
exposed to the sun's rays, soon loses its equilibrium, and
is canted with an inclination to the horizon. Finally, the
centre of gravity gets outside of the base, when the still
monstrous mass rolls over in the ocean, coming literally
bottom upwards. There are all degrees and varieties of these
ice-slips, if one may so term them, and they bring in their
train the many different commotions that such accidents
would naturally produce. That which had just alarmed
and astonished our navigators was of the following
character
.
A mass of ice that was about a quarter of a mile in
length, and of fully half that breadth, which floated quite
two hundred feet above the surface of the water, and twice
that thickness beneath it, was the cause of the disturbance.
It had preserved its outlines unusually well, and stood
upright
to the last moment; though, owing to numerous strata
of snow-ice, its base had melted much more on one of its
sides than on the other. When the precise moment arrived
that would have carried a perpendicular line from the
centre
of gravity without this base, the monster turned leisurely
in its lair, producing some such effect as would have been
wrought by the falling of a portion of a Swiss mountain
into a lake; a sort of accident of which there have been
many and remarkable instances.
Stimson's explanation, while it raised the curtain from
all that was mysterious, did not serve very much to quiet
apprehensions. If one berg had performed such an
evolution
,
it was reasonable to suppose that others might do the
same thing; and the commotion made by this, which was
at a distance, gave some insight into what might be
expected
from a similar change in another nearer by. Both
Daggett and Gardiner were of opinion that the fall of a
berg of equal size within a cable's length of the schooners
might seriously endanger the vessels by dashing them
against some wall of ice, if in no other manner. It was
too late, however, to retreat, and the vessels stood on
gallantly
.
The passage between the bergs now became quite
straight, reasonably broad, and was so situated as regarded
the gale, as to receive a full current of its force. It was
computed that the schooners ran quite three marine leagues
in the hour that succeeded the overturning of the berg.
There were moments when the wind blew furiously; and,
taking all the accessories of that remarkable view into the
account, the scene resembled one that the imagination
might present to the mind in its highest flights, but which
few could ever hope to see with their proper eyes. The
moon-light, the crowd of ice-bergs of all shapes and
dimensions
,
seeming to flit past by the rapid movements of the
vessels; the variety of hues, from spectral white to tints
of orange and emerald, pale at that hour yet distinct;
streets and lanes that were scarce opened ere they were
passed; together with all the fantastic images that such
objects conjured to the thoughts; contributed to make that
hour much the most wonderful that Roswell Gardiner had
ever passed. To add to the excitement, a couple of whales
came blowing up the passage, coming within a hundred
yards of the schooners. They were fin-backs, which are
rarely if ever taken, and were suffered to pass unharmed.
To capture a whale, however, amid so many bergs, would
be next to impossible, unless the animal were killed by the
blow of the harpoon, without requiring the keener thrust
of the lance.
At the end of the hour mentioned, the Sea Lion of the
Vineyard rapidly changed her course, hauling up by a
sudden
movement to the westward. The passage before her
was closed, and there remained but one visible outlet,
towards
which the schooner slowly made her way, having
got rather too much to leeward of it, in consequence of
not earlier seeing the necessity for the change of course in
that dim and deceptive light. Roswell, being to windward,
had less difficulty, but, notwithstanding, he kept his station
on his consort's quarter, declining to lead. The passage into
which Daggett barely succeeded in carrying his schooner
was fearfully narrow, and appeared to be fast closing;
though it was much wider further ahead, could the schooners
but get through the first dangerous strait. Roswell
remonstrated
ere the leading vessel entered, and pointed out
to Daggett the fact that the bergs were evidently closing,
each instant increasing their movement, most probably
through the force of attraction. It is known that ships are
thus brought in contact in calms, and it is thought a
similar
influence is exercised on the ice-bergs. At all events,
the wind, the current, or attraction, was fast closing the
passage through which the schooners had now to go.
Scarcely was Daggett within the channel, when an
enormous
mass fell from the summit of one of the bergs, literally
closing the passage in his wake, while it compelled
Gardiner
to put his helm down, and to tack ship, standing off
from the tottering berg. The scene that followed was
frightful! The cries on board the leading craft denoted
her peril, but it was not possible for Roswell to penetrate
to her with his vessel. All he could do was to heave-to his
own schooner, lower a boat, and pull back towards the
point of danger. This he did at once, manfully, but with
an anxious mind and throbbing heart. He actually urged
his boat into the chasm beneath an arch in the fallen
fragment
,
and made his way to the very side of Daggett's vessel.
The last was nipped again, and that badly, but was not
absolutely lost. The falling fragment from the berg alone
prevented her and all in her from being ground into powder.
This block, of enormous size, kept the two bergs asunder;
and now that they could not absolutely come together, they
began slowly to turn in the current, gradually opening and
separating, at the very point where they had so lately
seemed
attracted to a closer union. In an hour the way was
clear, and the boats towed the schooner stern foremost into
the broader passage.
CHAPTER V.
A voice upon the prairies,
A cry of woman's woe,
That mingleth with the autumn blast
All fitfully and low.
Mrs. Sigourney
.
The
accident to the Sea Lion of the Vineyard occurred
very near the close of the month of March, which, in the
southern hemisphere, corresponds to our month of
September
.
This was somewhat late for a vessel to remain in so
high a latitude, though it was not absolutely dangerous to
be found there several weeks longer. We have given a
glance at Mary Pratt and her uncle, about this time; but
it has now become expedient to carry the reader forward
for a considerable period, and take another look at our
heroine
and her miserly uncle, some seven months later. In
that interval a great change had come over the deacon and
his niece; and hope had nearly deserted all those who had
friends on board the Sea Lion of Oyster Pond, as the
following
explanation will show was reasonable, and to be
expected.
When Captain Gardiner sailed, it was understood that
his absence would not extend beyond a single season. All
who had friends and connections on board his schooner,
had been assured of this; and great was the anxiety, and
deep the disappointment, when the first of our own summer
months failed to bring back the adventurers. As week
succeeded week, and the vessel did not return, the concern
increased, until hope began to be lost in apprehension.
Deacon Pratt groaned in spirit over his loss, finding little
consolation in the gains secured by means of the oil sent
home, as is apt to be the case with the avaricious, when
their hearts are once set on gain. As for Mary, the load
on
her
heart increased in weight, as it might be, day by
day, until those smiles, which had caused her sweet
countenance
to be radiant with innocent joy, entirely disappeared,
and she was seen to smile no more. Still, complaints never
passed her lips. She prayed much, and found all her relief
in such pursuits as comported with her feelings, but she
seldom spoke of her grief; never, except at weak moments,
when her querulous kinsman introduced the subject, in his
frequent lamentations over his losses.
The month of November is apt to be stormy on the
Atlantic
coasts of the republic. It is true that the heaviest
gales do not then occur, but the weather is generally stern
and wintry, and the winds are apt to be high and
boisterous
.
At a place like Oyster Pond, the gales from the
ocean are felt with almost as much power as on board a
vessel at sea; and Mary became keenly sensible of the
change from the bland breezes of summer to the sterner
blasts of autumn. As for the deacon, his health was
actually
giving way before anxiety, until the result was getting
to be a matter of doubt. Premature old age appeared to
have settled on him, and his niece had privately consulted
Dr. Sage on his case. The excellent girl was grieved to
find that the mind of her uncle grew more worldly, his
desires
for wealth more grasping, as he was losing his hold
on life, and was approaching nearer to that hour when time
is succeeded by eternity. All this while, however, Deacon
Pratt kept about, as he expressed it himself, and
struggled
to look after his interests, as had been his practice
through life. He collected his debts, foreclosed his
mortgages
when necessary, drove tight bargains for his wood
and other saleable articles, and neglected nothing that he
thought would tend to increase his gains. Still, his heart
was with his schooner; for he had expected much from
that adventure, and the disappointment was in proportion
to the former hopes.
One day, near the close of November, the deacon and his
niece were alone together in the keeping-room,as it
was, if it be not still, the custom among persons of New
England origin to call the ordinary sitting-apartment,he
bolstered up in an easy-chair, on account of increasing
infirmities
,
and she plying the needle in her customary way.
The chairs of both were so placed that it was easy for either
to look out upon that bay, now of a wintry aspect, where
Roswell had last anchored, previously to sailing.
What a pleasant sight it would be, uncle, Mary,
almost
Vol. II.  6
unconsciously to herself, remarked, as, with tearful
eyes, she sat gazing intently on the water, could we only
awake and find the Sea Lion at anchor, under the point of
Gardiner's Island! I often fancy that such
may
benay,
must
be the case yet; but it never comes to pass! I would
not tell you yesterday, for you did not seem to be as well
as common, but I have got an answer, by Baiting Joe, to
my letter sent across to the Vineyard.
The deacon started, and half-turned his body towards
his niece, on whose face his own sunken eyes were now
fastened with almost ferocious interest. It was the love of
Mammon, stirring within him the lingering remains of
covetousness
.
He thought of his property, while Mary thought
of those whose lives had been endangered, if not lost, by
the unhappy adventure. The latter understood the look,
however, so far as to answer its inquiry, in her usual gentle,
feminine voice.
I am sorry to say, sir, that no news has been heard
from Captain Daggett, or any of his people, was the sad
reply to this silent interrogatory. No one on the island
has heard a word from the Vineyard vessel since the day
before she sailed from Rio. There is the same uneasiness
felt among Captain Daggett's friends, as we feel for poor
Roswell. They think, however, that the two vessels have
kept together, and believe that the same fate has befallen
both.
Heaven forbid! exclaimed the deacon, as sharply as
wasting lungs would allowHeaven forbid! If Gar'ner
has let that Daggett keep in his company an hour longer
than was necessary, he has deserved to meet with shipwreck,
though the loss always falls heaviest on the owners.
Surely, uncle, it is more cheering to think that the two
schooners are together in those dangerous seas, than to
imagine one, alone, left to meet the risks, without a
companion
!
You talk idly, galas women always talk. If you
know'd all, you wouldn't think of such a thing.
So you have said often, uncle, and I fear there is some
mystery preying all this time on your spirits. Why not
relieve your mind, by telling your troubles to me? I am
your child in affection, if not by birth.
You're a good gal, Mary, answered the deacon, a
good deal softened by the plaintive tones of one of the
gentlest
voices that ever fell on human ear, an excellent
creatur'
at the bottombut of course you know nothing of the
sealing business, and next to nothing about taking care of
property.
I hope you do not think me wasteful, sir? That is a
character I should not like to possess.
No, not wasteful; on the contrary, curful (so the
deacon
pronounced the word) and considerate enough, as to
keeping
, but awfully indifferent as to
getting
. Had I been
as indifferent as you are yourself, your futur' days would
not be so comfortable and happy as they are now likely to
be, a'ter my departureif depart I
must
.
My future life happy and comfortable!
thought
Mary;
then she struggled to be satisfied with her lot, and contented
with the decrees of Providence. It is but a few hours
that we live in this state of trials, compared to the endless
existence that is to succeed it.
I wish I knew all about this voyage of Roswell's, she
added, aloud; for she was perfectly certain that there was
something to be told that, as yet, the deacon had concealed
from her. It might relieve your mind, and lighten your
spirits of a burthen, to make me a confidant.
The deacon mused in silence for more than five minutes.
Seldom had his thoughts gone over so wide a reach of
interests
and events in so short a space of time; but the
conclusion
was clear and decided.
You ought to know all, Mary, and you shall know all,
he answered, in the manner of a man who had made up his
mind beyond appeal. Gar'ner has gone a'ter seal to some
islands that the Daggett who died here, about a year and
a half ago, told me of; islands of which nobody know'd
anything, according to his account, but himself. His
shipmates
,
that saw the place when he saw it, were all dead,
afore he let me into the secret.
I have long suspected something of the sort, sir, and
have also supposed that the people on Martha's Vineyard
had got some news of this place, by the manner in which
Captain Daggett has acted.
Isn't it wonderful, gal? Islands, they tell me, where
a schooner can fill up with ile and skins, in the shortest
season in which the sun ever shone upon an antarctic
summer
!
Wonderful! wonderful!
Very extraordinary, perhaps; but we should remember,
uncle, at how much risk the young men of the country go
on these distant voyages, and how dearly their profits are
sometimes bought.
Bought! If the schooner would only come back, I
should think nothing of all that. It's the cost of the vessel
and outfit, Mary, that weighs so much on
my
spirits. Well,
Gar'ner's first business is with them islands, which are at
an awful distance for one to trust his property; but, `
nothing
ventured, nothing got,' they say. By my calculations,
the schooner has had to go a good five hundred miles among
the ice, to get to the spot; not such ice as a body falls in
with, in going and coming between England and Ameriky,
as we read of in the papers, but ice that covers the sea as
we sometimes see it piled up in Gar'ner's Bay, only a
hundred
times higher, and deeper, and broader, and colder!
It's desperate
cold
ice, the sealers all tell me, that of the
antarctic seas. Some on 'em think it's colder down south
than it is the other way, up towards Greenland and Iceland
itself. It's extr'or'nary, Mary, that the weather should
grow cold as a body journeys south; but so it is, by all
accounts. I never could understand it, and it isn't so in
Ameriky, I'm sartain. I suppose it must come of their
turning the months round, and having their winter in the
midst of the dog-days. I never could understand it, though
Gar'ner has tried, more than once, to reason me into it. I
believe, but I don't understand.
It is all told in my geography here, answered Mary,
mechanically taking down the book, for her thoughts were
far away in those icy seas that her uncle had been so
graphically
describing. I dare say we can find it all explained
in the elementary parts of this book.
They
do
make their geographies useful, now-a-days,
said the deacon, with rather more animation than he had
shown before, that morning. They've got 'em to be,
now, almost as useful as almanacs. Read what it says
about the seasons, child.
It says, sir, that the changes in the seasons are owing
to `the inclination of the earth's axis to the plane of its
orbit.' I do not exactly understand what that means, uncle.
No,it's not as clear as it might be.The
declination
In
clination, sir, is what is printed here.
Ay, inclination. I do not see why any one should have
much inclination for winter, but so it must be, I suppose.
The `'arth's orbit has an inclination towards changes,' you
say.
The changes in the seasons, sir, are owing to `the
inclination
of the earth's axis to the plane of its orbit.' It
does not say that the orbit has an inclination in any
particular
way.
Thus was it with Mary Pratt, and thus was it with her
uncle, the deacon. One of the plainest problems in
natural
philosophy was Hebrew to both, simply because the
capacity
that Providence had so freely bestowed on each had
never been turned to the consideration of such useful
studies
.
But, while the mind of Mary Pratt was thus obscured
on this simple, and, to such as choose to give it an hour of
reflection, perfectly intelligible proposition, it was radiant
as the day on another mystery, and one that has confounded
thousands of the learned, as well as of the unlearned. To
her intellect, nothing was clearer, no moral truth more
vivid, no physical fact more certain, than the incarnation
of the Son of God. She had the evidence of things not
seen, in the fulness of Divine grace; and was profound
on this, the greatest concern of human life, while unable
even to comprehend how the inclination of the earth's
axis to the plane of its orbit could be the cause of the
change of the seasons. And was it thus with her uncle?
he who was a pillar of the meeting, whose name was
often in men's mouths as a shining light, and who had
got to be identified with religion in his own neighbourhood,
to a degree that caused most persons to think of Deacon
Pratt, when they should be thinking of the Saviour? We
are afraid he knew as little of one of these propositions as
of the other.
It's very extr'or'nary, resumed the deacon, after
ruminating
on the matter for a few moments, but I suppose
it
is
so. Wasn't it for this `inclination' to cold weather,
6*
our vessels might go and seal under as pleasant skies as we
have here in June. But, Mary, I suppose that wasn't to
be, or it would be.
There would have been no seals, most likely, uncle, if
there was no ice. They tell me that such creatures love
the cold and the ice, and the frozen oceans. Too much
warm weather would not suit them.
But, Mary, it might suit other folks! Gar'ner's whole
ar'nd isn't among the ice, or a'ter them seals.
I do not know that I understand you, sir. Surely
Roswell has gone on a sealing voyage.
Sartain; there's no mistake about
that
. But there
may be many stopping-places in so long a road.
Do you mean, sir, that he is to use any of these
stopping-places
,
as you call them? asked Mary, eagerly,
half-breathless
with her anxiety to hear all. You said
something
about the West Indies once.
Harkee, Maryjust look out into the entry and see if
the kitchen door is shut. And now come nearer to me,
child, so that there may be no need of bawling what I've
got to say all over Oyster Pond. There, sit down, my dear,
and don't look so eager, as if you wanted to eat me, or my
mind may misgive me, and then I couldn't tell you, a'ter
all. Perhaps it would be best, if I was to keep my own
secret.
Not if it has anything to do with Roswell, dear uncle;
not if it has anything to do with him! You have often
advised me to marry him, and I ought to know all about
the man you wish me to marry.
Yes, Gar'ner will make a right good husband for any
young woman, and I
do
advise you to have him. You are
my brother's da'ghter, Mary, and I give you this advice,
which I should give you all the same, had you been my
own child, instead of his'n.
Yes, sir, I know that.But what about Roswell, and
his having to stop, on his way home?
Why, you must know, Mary, that this v'y'ge came
altogether
out of that seaman who died among us, last year.
I was kind to him, as you may remember, and helped him
to many little odd comforts,odd enough were they, of a
verity,and he was grateful. Of all virtues, give me
gratitude, say I! It is the noblest, as it is the most
oncommon
of all our good qualities. How little have I met with,
in my day! Of all the presents I have made, and gifts be
stowed, and good acts done, not one in ten has ever met
with any gratitude.
Mary sighed; for well did she know how little he had
given, of his abundance, to relieve the wants of his
fellow-creatures
.
She sighed, too, with a sort of mild impatience
that the information she sought with so much eagerness,
was so long and needlessly delayed. But the deacon had
made up his mind to tell her all.
Yes, Gar'ner has got something to do, beside sealing,
he resumed of himself, when his regret at the prevalence
of ingratitude among men had exhausted itself. Suthin'
for this was the way he pronounced that wordthat is
of more importance than the schooner's hold full of ile. Ile
is ile, I know, child; but gold is gold. What do you think
of
that?
Is Roswell, then, to stop at Rio again, in order to sell
his oil, and send the receipts home in gold?
Better than that  much better than that, if he gets
back at all. Mary felt a chill at her heart. Yes, that is
the p'int  if he gets back at all. If Gar'ner ever does
come home, child, I shall expect to see him return with a
considerable sized kegalmost a barrel, by all accounts
filled with gold!
The deacon stared about him as he made this
announcement
,
like a man who was afraid that he was telling too
much. Nevertheless, it was to his own niece, his brother's
daughter, that he had confided thus much of his great
secret
and
reflection re-assured him.
How is Roswell to get all this gold, uncle, unless he
sells his cargo? Mary asked, with obvious solicitude.
That's another p'int. I'll tell you all about it, gal,
and you'll see the importance of keeping the secret. This
Daggett  not the one who is out in another schooner,
another
Sea Lion, as it might be, but his uncle, who died
down here at the Widow White'swell,
that
Daggett told
more than the latitude and longitude of the sealing islands
he told me of a buried treasure!
Buried treasure!Buried by whom, and consisting of
what, uncle?
Buried by seamen who make free with the goods of
others on the high seas, ag'in the time when they might
come back and dig it up, and carry it away to be used.
Consisting of what, indeed! Consisting principally,
accordin'
to Daggett's account, of heavy doubloons; though
there was a lot of old English guineas among 'em. Yes, I
remember that he spoke of them guineasthree thousand
and odd, and nearly as many doubloons!
Was Daggett, then, a pirate, sir?for they who make
free with the goods of others on the high seas are neither
more nor less than pirates.
No; not he, himself. He got this secret from one who
was
a pirate, however, and who was a prisoner in a gaol
where he was himself confined for smuggling. Yes; that
man told him all about the buried treasure, in return for
some acts of kindness shown him by Daggett. It's well
to be kind sometimes, Mary.
It is well to be kind always, sir; even when it is
misunderstood
,
and the kindness is abused. What was the
redemption but kindness and love, and god-like compassion
on those who neither understood it nor felt it? But money
collected and buried by pirates can never become
yours
,
uncle; nor can it ever become the property of Roswell
Gardiner.
Whose is it, then, gal? demanded the deacon, sharply.
Gar'ner had some such silly notion in his head when I
first told him of this treasure; but I soon brought
him
to
hear reason.
I think Roswell must always have seen that a treasure
obtained by robbery can never justly belong to any but its
rightful owner.
And who is this rightful owner, pray? or
owners
, I
might say; for the gold was picked up, here and there, out
of all question, from many hands. Now, supposing Gar'ner
gets this treasure, as I still hope he may, though he is an
awful time about it  but suppose he gets it, how is he to
find the rightful owners? There it is, a bag of doubloons,
sayall looking just alike, with the head of a king, a Don
Somebody, and the date, and the Latin and Greek  now
who can say that `this is my doubloon; I lost it at such a
timeit was taken from me by such a pirate, in such sea;
and I was whipped till I told the thieves where I had hid
the gold?' No, no, Mary; depend on't, no action of 'plevy
would lie ag'in a single one of all them pieces. They are
lost, one and all, to their former owners, and will belong
to the man that succeeds in getting hold on 'em ag'in; who
will become a rightful owner in his turn. All property
comes from law; and if the law won't 'plevy money got in
this way, nobody can maintain a claim to it.
I should be very, very sorry, my dear uncle, to have
Roswell enrich himself in this way.
You talk like a silly young woman, and one that doesn't
know her own rights. We had no hand in robbing the folks
of their gold. They lost it years ago, and may be dead
probably are, or they would make some stir about it  or
have forgotten it, and couldn't for their lives tell a single
one of the coins they once had in their possession; and
don't know whether what they lost was thrown into the
sea, or buried in the sand on a key  Mary, child; you
must never mention anything I tell you on this subject!
You need fear nothing, sir, from me. But I do most
earnestly hope Roswell will have nothing to do with any
such ill-gotten wealth. He is too noble-hearted and
generous
to get rich in this way.
Well, well, say no more about it, child; you're romantic
and notional. Just pour out my drops; for all this talking
makes me breathe thick. I'm not what I was, Mary, and
cannot last long; but was it the last breath I drew, I would
stand to it, that treasure desarted and found in this way
belongs to the last holder. I go by the law, however; let
Gar'ner only find it  well, well, I'll say no more about it
now; for it distresses you, and that I don't like to see.
Go and hunt up the Spectator, child, and look for the
whaling news  perhaps there may be suthin' about the
sealers too.
Mary did not require to be told twice to do as her uncle
requested. The paper was soon found, and the column
that contained the marine intelligence consulted. The
niece read a long account of whalers spoken, with so many
hundred or so many thousand barrels of oil on board, but
could discover no allusion to any sealer. At length she
turned her eyes into the body of the journal, which being
semi-weekly, or tri-weekly, was crowded with matter, and
started at seeing a paragraph to the following effect:
By the arrival of the Twin Sisters at Stonington, we
learn that the ice has been found farther north in the
southern hemisphere this season, than it has been known
to be for many years. The sealers have had a great deal
of difficulty in making their way through it; and even
vessels bound round the Cape of Good Hope have been
much embarrassed by its presence.
That's it!Yes, Mary, that's just it! exclaimed the
deacon. It's that awful ice. If 'twasn't for the ice,
sealin' would be as pleasant a calling as preachin' the
gospel
!
It is possible that this ice has turned Gar'ner back,
when he has been on his way home, and that he has been
waiting for a better time to come north. There's one good
p'int in this news  they tell me that when the ice is seen
drifting about in low latitudes, it's a sign there's less of it
in the higher.
The Cape of Good Hope is certainly, in one sense, in
a low latitude, uncle; if I remember right, it is not as far
south as we are north; and, as you say, it
is
a good sign
if the ice has come anywhere near it.
I don't say it has, child; I don't say it has. But it may
have come to the northward of Cape Horn, and that will
be a great matter; for all the ice that is drifting about
there comes from the polar seas, and is so much taken out
of Gar'ner's track.
Still he must come
through
it to get home, returned
Mary, in her sweet, melancholy tones. Ah! why cannot
men be content with the blessings that Providence places
within our immediate reach, that they must make distant
voyages to accumulate others!
You like your tea, I fancy, Mary Prattand the sugar
in it, and your silks and ribbons that I've seen you wear;
how are you to get such matters if there's to be no going
on v'y'ges? Tea and sugar, and silks and satins don't
grow along with the clams on `Yster Pond'for so the
deacon uniformly pronounced the word `oyster.'
Mary acknowledged the truth of what was said, but
changed the subject. The journal contained no more that
related to sealing or sealers, and it was soon laid aside.
It may be that Gar'ner is digging for the buried
treasure
all this time, the deacon at length resumed. That
may be the reason he is so late. If so, he has nothing to
dread from ice.
I understand you, sir, that this money is supposed to
be buried on a keyin the West Indies, of course.
Don't speak so loud, Marythere's no need of letting
all 'Yster Pond know where the treasure is. It may be in
the West Ingees, or it may not; there's keys all over the
'arth, I take it.
Do you not think, uncle, that Roswell would write, if
detained long among those keys?
You wouldn't hear to post-offices in the antarctic
ocean, and now you want to put them on the sand-keys of
the West Ingees! Woman's always a sailin' ag'in wind
and tide.
I do not think so, sir, in this case, at least. There
must be many vessels passing among the keys of the West
Indies, and nothing seems to me to be easier than to send
letters by them. I am quite sure Roswell would write, if
in a part of the world where he thought what he wrote
would reach us.
Not henot heGar'ner's not the man I take him for,
if he let any one know what he is about in them keys, until
he had done up all his business there. No, no, Mary. We
shall never hear from him in that quarter of the world. It
may be that Gar'ner is a digging about, and has difficulty
in finding the place; for Daggett's account had some weak
spots in it.
Mary made no reply, though she thought it very little
likely that Roswell would pass months in the West Indies
employed in such a pursuit, without finding the means of
letting her know where he was, and what he was about.
The intercourse between these young people was somewhat
peculiar, and ever had been. In listening to the suit of
Roswell, Mary had yielded to her heart; in hesitating about
accepting him, she deferred to her principles. Usually, a
mothernot a managing, match-making, interested parent,
but a prudent, feminine, well-principled motheris of the
last importance to the character and well-being of a young
woman. It sometimes happens, however, that a female
who has no parent of her own sex, and who is early made
to be dependent on herself, if the bias of her mind is good,
becomes as careful and prudent of herself and her conduct
as the advice and solicitude of the most tender mother
could make her. Such had been the case with Mary Pratt.
Perfectly conscious of her own deserted situation, high
principled, and early awake to the defects in her uncle's
character, she had laid down severe rules for the
government
of her own conduct; and from these rules she never
departed. Thus it was that she permitted Roswell to write,
though she never answered his letters. She permitted him
to write, because she had promised not to shut her ears to
his suit, so long as he practised towards her his native and
manly candour; concealing none of his opinions, and
confessing
his deficiency on the one great point that formed
the only obstacle to their union.
A young woman who has no mother, if she escape the
ills attendant on the privation while her character is
forming
,
is very apt to acquire qualities that are of great use in
her future life. She learns to rely on herself, gets
accustomed
to think and act like an accountable being, and is
far more likely to become a reasoning and useful head of a
family, than if brought up in dependence, and under the
control of even the best maternal government. In a word,
the bias of the mind is sooner obtained in such
circumstances
than when others do so much of the thinking;
whether that bias be in a right or in a wrong direction.
But Mary Pratt had early taken the true direction in all
that relates to opinion and character, and had never been
wanting to herself in any of the distinctive and discreet
deportment of her sex.
Our heroine hardly knew whether or not to seek for
consolation in her uncle's suggestion of Roswell's being
detained among the keys, in order to look for the hidden
treasure. The more she reflected on this subject, the more
did it embarrass her. Few persons who knew of the
existence
of such a deposit would hesitate about taking
possession
of it; and, once reclaimed, in what way were the best
intentions to be satisfied with the disposition of the gold?
To find the owners would probably be impossible; and a
question in casuistry remained. Mary pondered much on
this subject, and came to the conclusion that, were she the
person to whom such a treasure were committed, she would
set aside a certain period for advertising; and failing to
discover those who had the best claim to the money, that
she would appropriate every dollar to a charity.
Alas! Little did Mary understand the world. The fact
that money was thus advertised would probably have brought
forward a multitude of dishonest pretenders to having been
robbed by pirates; and scarce a doubloon would have found
its way into the pocket of its right owner, even had she
yielded all to the statements of such claimants.
All this, however, did not bring back the missing
Roswell
.
Another winter was fast approaching, with its
chilling
storms and gales, to awaken apprehensions by keeping
the turbulence of the ocean, as it might be, constantly
before
the senses. Not a week now passed that the deacon
did not get a letter from some wife, or parent, or sister, or
perhaps from one who hesitated to avow her relations to
the absent mariner; all inquiring after the fate of those
who had sailed in the Sea Lion of Oyster Pond, under the
orders of Captain Roswell Gardiner.
Even those of the Vineyard sent across questions, and
betrayed anxiety and dread, in the very manner of putting
their interrogatories. Each day did the deacon's
apprehensions
increase, until it was obvious to all around him
that this cause, united to others that were more purely
physical, perhaps, was seriously undermining his health,
and menacing his existence. It is a sad commentary on
the greediness for gain, manifested by this person, that ere
the adventure he had undertaken on the strength of
Daggett's
reluctant communications was brought to any
apparent
result, he himself was nearly in the condition of that
diseased seaman, with as little prospect of being benefited
by his secrets as was the man himself who first
communicated
their existence. Mary saw all this clearly, and
mourned almost as much over the blindness and
worldliness
of her uncle as she did over the now nearly assured
fate of him whom she had so profoundly loved in her heart's
core.
Vol. II.  7
Day by day did time roll on, without bringing any tidings
of either of the Sea Lions. The deacon grew weak fast,
until he seldom left his room, and still more rarely the
house. It was now that he was induced to make his will,
and this by an agency so singular as to deserve being
mentioned
.
The Rev. Mr. Whittle broached the subject one
day, not with any interested motive of course, but simply
because the meeting-house wanted some material
repairs
,
and there was a debt on the congregation that it
might be a pleasure to one who had long stood in the
relation
to it that Deacon Pratt filled, to pay off, when he no
longer had any occasion for the money for himself. It is
probable the deacon at length felt the justice of this
remark
;
for the sent to Riverhead for a lawyer, and made a
will that would have stood even the petulant and envious
justice of the present day; a justice that inclines to divide
a man's estate infinitesimally, lest some heir become a
little richer than his neighbours. After all, no small
portion
of that which struts about under the aspects of right,
and liberty, and benevolence, is in truth derived from some
of the most sneaking propensities of human nature!
CHAPTER VI.
I, too, have seen thee on thy surging path
When the night-tempest met thee; thou didst dash
Thy white arms high in heaven, as if in wrath,
Threatening the angry sky; thy waves did lash
The labouring vessel, and with deadening crash
Rush madly forth to scourge its groaning sides;
Onward thy billows came, to meet and clash
In a wild warfare, till the lifted tides
Mingled their yesty tops, where the dark storm-cloud rides.
Percival
.
The
first movement of the mariner, when his vessel has
been brought in collision with any hard substance, is to
sound the pumps. This very necessary duty was in the act
of performance by Daggett, in person, even while the boats
of Roswell Gardiner were towing his strained and roughly
treated craft into the open water. The result of this
examination
was waited for by all on board, including Roswell,
with the deepest anxiety. The last held the lantern by
which the height of the water in the well was to be
ascertained
;
the light of the moon scarce sufficing for such a
purpose. Daggett stood on the top of the pump himself,
while Gardiner and Macy were at its side. At length the
sounding-rod came up, and its lower end was held out, in
order to ascertain how high up it was wet.
Well, what do you make of it, Gar'ner? Daggett
demanded
,
a little impatiently. Water there must be; for
no craft that floats could have stood such a squeeze, and
not have her sides open.
There must be near three feet of water in your hold,
answered Roswell, shaking his head. If this goes on,
Captain Daggett, it will be hard work to keep your schooner
afloat!
A float she shall be, while a pump-break can work.
Here, rig this larboard pump at once, and get it in
motion
.
It is possible that your seams opened under the nip, and
have closed again, as soon as the schooner got free. In such
a case, ten minutes at the pump will let us know it.
Although there is no duty to which seamen are so averse
as pumpingnone, perhaps, that is actually so exhausting
and laboriousit often happens that they have recourse to
it with eagerness, as the only available means of saving
their lives. Such was now the case, the harsh but familiar
strokes of the pump-break being audible amid the more
solemn and grand sounds of the grating of ice-bergs, the
rushing of floes, and the occasional scuffling and howling
of the winds. The last appeared to have changed in their
direction, however; a circumstance that was soon noted,
there being much less of biting cold in the blasts than had
been felt in the earlier hours of the night.
I do believe that the wind has got round here to the
north-east, said Roswell, as he paced the quarter-deck
with Daggett, still holding in his hand the well wiped and
dried sounding-rod, in readiness for another trial. That
last puff was right in our teeth!
Not in our teeth, Gar'ner; no, not in
my
teeth,
answered
Daggett, whatever it may be in
your'n
. I shall
try to get back to the island, where I shall endeavour to
beach the schooner, and get a look at her leaks. This is
the
most
I can hope for. It would never do to think of
carrying a craft, after such a nip, as far as Rio, pumping
every foot of the way!
That will cause a great delay, Captain Daggett, said
Roswell, doubtingly. We are now well in among the
first great body of the ice; it may be as easy to work our
way to the northward of it, as to get back into clear water
to the southward.
I dare say it would; but, back I go. I do not ask you
to accompany us, Gar'ner; by no means. A'ter the
handsome
manner in which you've waited for us so long, I
couldn't think of such a thing! If the wind has r'ally got
round to nothe-east, and I begin to think it has, I shall get
the schooner into the cove in four-and-twenty hours; and
there's as pretty a spot to beach her, just under the shelf
where we kept our spare casks, as a body can wish. In a
fortnight we'll have her leaks all stopped, and be jogging
along in your wake. You'll tell the folks on Oyster Pond
that we're a-coming, and they'll be sure to send the news
across to the Vineyard.
This was touching Roswell on a point of honour, and
Daggett knew it very well. Generous and determined, the
young man was much more easily influenced by a silent
and indirect appeal to his liberal qualities, than he could
possibly have been by any other consideration. The idea
of deserting a companion in distress, in a sea like that in
which he was, caused him to shrink from what, under other
circumstances, he would regard as an imperative duty.
The deacon, and still more, Mary, called him north; but
the necessities of the Vineyarders would seem to chain him
to their fate.
Let us see what the pump tells us now, cried Roswell,
impatiently. Perhaps the report may make matters better
than we have dared to hope for. If the pump gains on the
leak, all may yet be well.
It's encouraging and hearty to hear you say this; but
no one who was
in
that nip, as a body might say, can ever
expect the schooner to make a run of two thousand miles,
without repairs. To my eye, Gar'ner, these bergs are
separating
,
leaving us a clearer passage back to the open
water.
I do believe you are right; but it seems a sad loss of
time, and a great risk, to go through these mountains again,
returned Roswell. The wind has shifted; and the nearest
bergs, from some cause or other, are slowly opening; but
recollect what a mass of floe-ice there is outside. Let us
sound again.
The process was renewed this time much easier than
before, the boxes being already removed. The result was
soon known.
Well, what news, Gar'ner? demanded Daggett,
leaning
down, in a vain endeavour to perceive the almost
imperceptible
marks that distinguished the wet part of the
rod from that which was dry. Do we gain on the leak,
or does the leak gain on us? God send it may be the
first!
God has so sent it, sir, answered Stimson, reverently;
for he was holding the lantern, having remained on board
the damaged vessel by the order of his officer. It is He
alone, Captain Daggett, who could do this much to seamen
in distress.
Then to God be thanks, as is due! If we can but
keep the leak under, the schooner may yet be saved.
I think it may be done, Daggett, added Roswell.
That one pump has brought the water down more than
two inches; and, in my judgment, the two together would
clear her entirely.
We'll pump her till she sucks! cried Daggett. Rig
the other pump, men, and go to the work heartily.
This was done, though not until Roswell ordered fully
half of his own crew to come to the assistance of his
consort
.
By this time the two vessels had filled away, made
more sail, and were running off before the new wind,
retracing
their steps, so far as one might judge of the position
of the great passage. Daggett's vessel led, and Hazard
followed; Roswell still remaining on board the injured
craft. Thus passed the next few hours. The pumps soon
sucked, and it was satisfactorily ascertained that the
7*
schooner could be freed from the water by working at them
about one-fourth of the time. This was a bad leak, and
one that would have caused any crew to become exhausted
in the course of a few days. As Roswell ascertained the
facts more clearly, he became better satisfied with a
decision
that, in a degree, had been forced on him. He was
passively content to return with Daggett, convinced that
taking the injured vessel to Rio was out of the question,
until some attention had been paid to her damages.
Fortuneor as Stimson would say, Providence
favoured
our mariners greatly in the remainder of their run among
the bergs. There were several avalanches of snow quite
near to them, and one more berg performed a revolution
at no great distance; but no injury was sustained by either
vessel. As the schooners got once more near to the
field-ice
,
Roswell went on board his own craft; and all the boats,
which had been towing in the open passage, were run up
and secured. Gardiner now led, leaving his consort to
follow as closely in his wake as she could keep.
Much greater difficulty, and dangers indeed, were
encountered
among the broken and grating floes, than had
been expected, or previously met with. Notwithstanding
fenders were got out on all sides, many a rude shock was
sustained, and the copper suffered in several places. Once
or twice, Roswell apprehended that the schooners would
be crushed by the pressure on their sides. The hazards
were in some measure increased by the bold manner in
which our navigators felt themselves called on to push
ahead; for time was very precious in every sense, not only
on account of the waning season, but actually on account
of the fatigue undergone by men who were compelled to
toil at the pumps one minute in every four.
At the return of day, now getting to be later than it had
been during the early months of their visit to these seas,
our adventurers found themselves in the centre of vast fields
of floating ice, driving away from the bergs, which,
influenced
by under-currents, were still floating north, while
the floes drove to the southward. It was very desirable to
get clear of all this cake-ice, though the grinding among it
was by no means as formidable as when the seas were
running
high, and the whole of the frozen expanse was in
violent commotion. Motion, however, soon became nearly
impossible, except as the schooners drifted in the midst of
the mass, which was floating south at the rate of about two
knots.
Thus passed an entire day and night. So compact was
the ice around them, that the mariners passed from one
vessel to the other on it, with the utmost confidence. No
apprehension was felt so long as the wind stood in its
present
quarter, the fleet of bergs actually forming as good a
lee as if they had been so much land. On the morning of
the second day, all this suddenly changed. The ice began
to open; why, was matter of conjecture, though it was
attributed
to a variance between the wind and the currents.
This, in some measure, liberated the schooners, and they
began to move independently of the floes. About noon,
the smoke of the volcano became once more visible; and
before the sun went down the cap of the highest elevation
in the group was seen, amid flurries of snow.
Every one was glad to see these familiar land-marks,
dreary and remote from the haunts of men as they were
known to be; for there was a promise in them of a
temporary
termination of their labours. Incessant pumping
one minute in four being thus employed on board the
Vineyard
craft  was producing its customary effect; and the
men looked jaded and exhausted. No one who has not stood
at a pump-break on board a vessel, can form any notion of
the nature of the toil, or of the extreme dislike with which
seamen regard it. The tread-mill, as we conceivefor our
experience extends to the first, though not to the last of
these occupations  is the nearest approach to the pain of
such toil, though the convict does not work for his life.
On the morning of the fourth day, our mariners found
themselves in the great bay, in clear water, about a league
from the cove, and nearly dead to windward of their port.
The helms were put up, and the schooners were soon within
the well-known shelter. As they ran in, Roswell gazed
around him, in regret, awe, and admiration. He could not
but regret being compelled to lose so much precious time,
at that particular season. Short as had been his absence
from the group, sensible changes in the aspect of things
had already occurred. Every sign of summer  and they
had ever been few and meagrewas now lost; a chill and
dreary autumn having succeeded. As a matter of course,
nothing was altered about the dwelling; the piles of wood,
and other objects placed there by the hands of man,
remaining
just as they had been left; but even these looked
less cheering, more unavailable, than when last seen. To
the surprise of all, not a seal was visible. From some cause
unknown to the men, all of these animals had disappeared,
thereby defeating one of Daggett's secret calculations; this
provident master having determined, in his own mind, to
profit by his accident, and seize the occasion to fill up.
Some said that the creatures had gone north to winter;
others asserted that they had been alarmed, and had taken
refuge on one of the other islands; but all agreed in saying
that they were gone.
It is known that a seal will occasionally wander a great
distance from what may be considered his native waters;
but we are not at all aware that they are to be considered
as migratory animals. The larger species usually take a
wide range of climate to dwell in, and even the little
fur-seal
sometimes gets astray, and is found on coasts that do
not usually come within his haunts. As respects the animals
that so lately abounded on Sealer's Land, we shall hazard
no theory, our business being principally with facts; but a
conversation that took place between the two chief mates
on this occasion may possibly assist some inquiring mind
in its speculations.
Well, Macy, said Hazard, pointing along the desertel
rocks, what do you think of
that?
Not an animal to be
seen, where there were lately thousands!
What do I think of it?  Why, I think they are off,
and I've know'd such things to happen afore  The
sealers of 1819 were not very particular about their
English
,
even among their officers  Any man who watches
for signs and symptoms, may know how to take this.
I should like to hear it explained; to me it is quite
new.
The seals are off, and that is a sign
we
should be off,
too. There's my explanation, and you may make what
you please of it. Natur' gives sich hints, and no prudent
seaman ought to overlook 'em. I say, that when the seals
go, the sealers should go likewise.
And you set this down as a hint from natur', as you
call it?
I do; and a useful hint it is. If we was in sailing
trim, I'd ha'nt the old man, but I'd get him off this blessed
night. Now, mark my words, Hazardno good will come
of that nip, and of this return into port ag'in; and of all
this veering and hauling upon cargo.
The other mate laughed; but a call from his
commanding
officer put a stop to the dialogue. Hazard was wanted
to help secure the schooner of Daggett in the berth in
which she was now placed. The tides do not appear to
rise and fall in very high latitudes, by any means, as much
as it does in about 50. In the antaretic sea they are
reported
to be but of medium elevation and force. This fact
our navigators had noted; and Daggett had, at once, carried
his schooner on the only thing like a beach that was to be
found on any part of that wild coast. His craft was snug
within the cove, and quite handy for discharging and taking
in. Beach, in a proper sense, it was not; being, with a
very trifling exception, nothing but a shelf of rock that was
a little inclined, and which admitted of a vessel's being
placed upon it, as on the floor of a dock.
Into this berth Daggett took his schooner, while the
other vessel anchored. There was nearly a whole day
before
them, and all the men were at once set to work to
discharge
the cargo of the injured vessel. To get rid of the
pumps, they would cheerfully have worked the twenty-four
hours without intermission. As fast as the vessel was
lightened, she was hove further and further on the rock,
until she was got so high as to be perfectly safe from
sinking
,
or from injuring anything on board her; when the
pumps were abandoned. Before night came, however, the
schooner was so secured by means of shores, and purchases
aloft that were carried out to the rocks, as to stand
perfectly
upright on her keel. She was thus protected when
the tide left her. At low water it was found that she
wanted
eight feet of being high and dry, having already been
lightened four feet. A good deal of cargo was still in, on
this the first night after her return.
The crew of Daggett's vessel carried their mattresses
ashore, took possession of the bunks, lighted a fire in the
stove, and made their preparations to get the camboose
ashore next day, and do their cooking in the house, as had
been practised previously to quitting the island. Roswell,
and all his people, remained on board their own vessel.
The succeeding day the injured schooner was cleared of
everything, even to her spars, the lower masts and bowsprit
excepted. Two large sealing crews made quick work with
so small a craft. Empty casks were got under her, and at
the top of the tide she was floated quite up to the small
beach that was composed of the
dbris
of rock, already
mentioned. As the water left her, she fell over a little, of
course; and at half-tide her keel lay high and dry.
The prying eyes of all hands were now busy looking out
for the leaks. As might have been expected, none were
found near the garboard streak, a fact that was clearly
enough proved by a quantity of the water remaining in the
vessel after she lay, entirely bare, nearly on her bilge.
Her seams have opened a few streaks below the bends,
said Roswell, as he and Daggett went under the vessel's
bottom, looking out for injuries; and you had better set
about getting off the copper at once. Has there been an
examination made inside?
None had yet been made, and our two masters
clambered
up to the main hatch, and got as good a look at the
state of things in the hold as could be thus obtained. So
tremendous had been the pressure, that three of the deck
beams were broken. They would have been driven quite
clear of their fastenings, had not the wall of ice at each
end prevented the possibility of such a thing. As it was,
the top-timbers had slightly given way, and the seams must
have opened just below the water-line. When the tide
came in again, the schooner righted of course; and the
opportunity was taken to pump her dry. There was then
no leak, another proof that the defective places must be
sought above the present water-line.
With the knowledge thus obtained, the copper was
removed
,
and several of the seams examined. The condition
of the pitch and oakum pointed out the precise spots that
needed attention, and the caulking-irons were immediately
set at work. In about a week the job was completed, as
was fancied, the copper re-placed, and the schooner was
got afloat again. Great was the anxiety to learn the effect
of what had been done, and quite as great the
disappointment
,
when it was found that there was still a serious leak
that admitted too much water to think of going to sea until
it was stopped. A little head-work, however, and that on
the part of Roswell, speedily gave a direction to the search
that was immediately set on foot.
This leak is not as low down as the vessel's bilge, he
said; for the water did not run out of her, nor into her,
until we got her afloat. It is somewhere, then, between
her light-water load-line and her bilge. Now we have had
all the copper off, and the seams examined in the wake of
this section of the vessel's bottom, from the fore-chains to
the main; and, in my judgment, it will be found that
something
is wrong about her stem, or her stern-post. Perhaps
one of her wood-ends has started. Such a thing might very
well have happened under so close a squeeze.
In which case we shall have to lay the craft ashore
again, and go to work anew, answered Daggett. I see
how it is; you do not like the delay, and are thinking of
Deacon Pratt and Oyster Pond. I do not blame you,
Gar'ner
;
and shall never whisper a syllable ag'in you, or your
people, if you sail for home this very a'ternoon; leaving
me and mine to look out for ourselves. You've stood by
us nobly thus far, and I am too thankful for what you have
done already, to ask for more.
Was Daggett sincere in these professions? To a certain
point he was; while he was only artful on others. He
wished to appear just and magnanimous; while, in secret,
it was his aim to work on the better feelings, as well as on
the pride of Gardiner, and thus secure his services in getting
his own schooner ready, as well as keep him in sight until
a certain key had been examined, in the proceeds of which
he conceived he had a share, as well as in those of Sealer's
Land. Strange as it may seem, even in the strait in which
he was now placed, with so desperate a prospect of ever
getting his vessel home again, this man clung like a leech
to the remotest chance of obtaining property. There is a
bull-dog tenacity on this subject, among a certain portion
of the great American familythe god-like Anglo-Saxon
that certainly leads to great results in one respect; but
which it is often painful to regard, and never agreeable to
any but themselves, to be subject to. Of this school was
Daggett, whom no dangers, no toil, no thoughts of a future,
could divert from a purpose that was coloured by gold. We
do not mean to say that other nations are not just as
mercenary
;
many are more so; those, in particular, that have
long been corrupted by vicious governments. You may
buy half a dozen Frenchmen, for instance, more easily
than one Yankee; but let the last actually get his teeth
into a dollar, and the muzzle of the ox fares worse in the
jaws of the bull-dog.
Roswell was deeply reluctant to protract his stay in the
group; but professional pride would have prevented him
from deserting a consort under such circumstances, had
not a better feeling inclined him to remain and assist
Daggett
.
It is true the last had, in a manner, thrust himself
on him, and the connection had been strangely continued
down to that moment; but this he viewed as a dispensation
of Providence, to which he was bound to submit. The
result was a declaration of a design to stand by his
companion
as long as there was any hope of getting the injured
craft home.
This decision pointed at once to the delay of another
week. No time was lost in vain regrets, however; but all
hands went to work to get the schooner into shallow water
again, and to look further for the principal leak. Accurate
trimming and pumping showed that a good deal of the
water was already stopped out; but too much still entered
to render it prudent to think of sailing until the injury was
repaired. This time the schooner was not suffered to lie
on her bilge at all. She was taken into water just deep
enough to permit her to stand upright, sustained by shores,
while the tide left two or three streaks dry forward; it
being
the intention to wind her, should the examination
forward
not be successful.
On stripping off the copper, it was found that a
wood-end
had indeed started, the inner edge of the plank having
got as far from its bed as where the outer had been
originally
placed. This opened a crack through which a small
stream of water must constantly pour, each hour rendering
the leak more dangerous by loosening the oakum, and
raising the plank from its curvature. Once discovered,
however, nothing was easier than to repair the damage. It
remained merely to butt-bolt anew the wood-end, drive a
few spikes, cork, and replace the copper. Roswell, who
was getting each moment more and more impatient to sail,
was much vexed at a delay that really seemed unavoidable;
as it arose from the particular position of the leak. Placed
as it was, in a manner, between wind and water, it was not
possible to work at it more than an hour each tide; and the
staging permitted but two hands to be busy at the same
time. As a consequence of these embarrassments, no less
than six tides came in and went out, before the stem was
pronounced tight again. The schooner was then pumped
out, and the vessel was once more taken into deep water.
This time it was found that the patience and industry of
our sealers were rewarded with success; no leak of any
account existing.
She's as tight as a bottle with a sealed cork, Gar'ner,
cried Daggett, a few hours after his craft was at her
anchor
,
meeting his brother-master at his own gangway, and
shaking hands with him cordially. I owe much of this
to you, as all on the Vineyard shall know, if we ever get
home ag'in.
I am rejoiced that it turns out so, Captain Daggett,
was Roswell's reply; for to own the truth to you, the
fortnight we have lost, or shall lose, before we get you
stowed and ready to sail again, has made a great change
in our weather. The days are shortening with frightful
rapidly, and the great bay was actually covered with a
skim of ice this very morning. The wind has sent in a sea
that has broke it up; but look about you, in the cove here
a boy might walk on that ice near the rocks.
There'll be none of it left by night, and the two crews
will fill me up in twenty-four hours. Keep a good heart,
Gar'ner; I'll take you clear of the bergs in the course of
the week.
I have less fear of the bergs now, than of the new ice
and the floes. The islands must have got pretty well to
the northward by this time; but each night gets colder,
Vol. II.  8
and the fields seem to be setting back towards the group,
instead of away from it.
Daggett cheered his companion by a good deal of
confident
talk; but Roswell was heartily rejoiced when, at the
end of four-and-twenty hours more, the Vineyard craft was
pronounced entirely ready. It was near the close of the
day, and Gardiner was for sailing, or moving at once; but
Daggett offered several very reasonable objections. In the
first place, there was no wind; and Roswell's proposition
to tow the schooners out into the middle of the bay, was
met by the objection that the people had been hard at work
for several days, and that they needed some rest. All that
could be gained by moving the schooners then, was to get
them outside of the skim of ice that now regularly formed
every still night near the land, but which was as regularly
broken and dispersed by the waves, as soon as the wind
returned. Roswell, however, did not like the appearances
of things; and he determined to take his own craft outside;
let Daggett do as he might. After discussing the matter
in vain, therefore, and finding that the people of the other
schooner had eaten their suppers and turned in, he called
all hands, and made a short address to his own crew,
leaving it to their discretion whether to man the boats or
not. As Roswell had pointed out the perfect absence of
wind, the smoothness of the water, and the appearances of
a severe frost, or cold, for frost there was now, almost at
mid-day, the men came reluctantly over to his view of the
matter, and consented to work instead of sleeping. The
toil, however, could be much lessened, by dividing the
crew into the customary watches. All that Roswell aimed
at was to get his schooner about a league from the cove;
which would be taking her without a line drawn from cape
to cape, the greatest danger of new ice being within the
curvature of the crescent. This he thought might easily
be done in the course of a few hours; and, should there
come any wind, much sooner. On explaining this to the
crew, the men were satisfied.
Roswell Gardiner felt as if a load were taken off his
spirits, when his schooner was clear of the ground, and his
mainsail was hoisted. A boat was got ahead, and the craft
was slowly towed out of the cove, the canvass doing neither
good nor harm. As the vessel passed that of Daggett, the
last was on deck; the only person visible in the Vineyard
craft. He wished his brother-master a good night,
promising
to be out as soon as there was any light next
morning.
It would not be easy to imagine a more dreary scene
than that in which Deacon Pratt's schooner moved out into
the waters that separated the different islands of this remote
and sterile group. Roswell could just discern the frowning
mass of the rocks that crowned the centre of Sealer's Land;
and that was soon lost in the increasing obscurity. The
cold was getting to be severe, and the men soon complained
that ice was forming on the blades of their oars. Then it
was that a thought occurred to our young mariner, which
had hitherto escaped him. Of what use would it be for his
vessel to be beyond the ice, if that of Daggett should be
shut in the succeeding day? So sensible did he become
to the importance of this idea, that he called in his boat,
and pulled back into the cove, in order to make one more
effort to persuade Daggett to follow him out.
Gardiner found all of the Vineyarders turned in, even to
their officers. The fatigue they had lately undergone,
united to the cold, rendered the berths very agreeable; and
even Daggett begged his visiter would excuse him for not
rising to receive his guest. Argument with a man thus
circumstanced and so disposed, was absolutely useless.
After remaining a short time with Daggett, Roswell
returned
to his own schooner. As he pulled back, he
ascertained
that ice was fast making; and the boat actually cut
its way through a thin skim, ere it reached the vessel.
Our hero was now greatly concerned lest he should be
frozen in himself, ere he could get into the more open
water of the bay. Fortunately a light air sprung up from
the northward, and trimming his sails, Gardiner succeeded
in carrying his craft to a point where the undulations of
the ground-swell gave the assurance of her being outside
the segment of the crescent. Then he brailed his foresail,
hauled the jib-sheet over, lowered his gaff, and put his helm
hard down. After this, all the men were permitted to seek
their berths; the officers looking out for the craft in turns.
It wanted about an hour of day, when the second mate
gave Roswell a call, according to orders. The young
master found no wind, but an intensely cold morning, on
going on deck. Ice had formed on every part of the
rigging
and sides of the schooner where water had touched
them; though the stillness of the night, by preventing the
spray from flying, was much in favour of the navigators in
this respect. On thrusting a boat-hook down, Roswell
ascertained that the bay around him had a skim of ice
nearly an inch in thickness. This caused him great
uneasiness
;
and he waited with the greatest anxiety for the
return
of light, in order to observe the condition of Daggett.
Sure enough, when the day came out distinctly, it was
seen that ice of sufficient thickness to bear men on it,
covered the entire surface within the crescent. Daggett
and his people were already at work on it, using the saw.
They must have taken the alarm before the return of day;
for the schooner was not only free from the ground, but
had been brought fully a cable's length without the cove.
Gardiner watched the movements of Daggett and his crew
with a glass for a short time, when he ordered all hands
called. The cook was already in the galley, and a warm
breakfast was soon prepared. After eating this, the two
whale-boats were lowered, and Roswell and Hazard both
rowed as far as the ice would permit them, when they
walked the rest of the way to the imprisoned craft, taking
with them most of their hands, together with the saw.
It was perhaps fortunate for Daggett that it soon began
to blow fresh from the northward, sending into the bay a
considerable sea, which soon broke up the ice, and enabled
the Vineyard craft to force her way through the fragments,
and join her consort about noon.
Glad enough was Roswell to regain his own vessel; and
he made sail on a wind, determined to beat out of the
narrow
waters at every hazard, the experience of that night
having told him that they had remained in the cove too
long. Daggett followed willingly, but not like a man who
had escaped by the skin of his teeth, from wintering near
the antarctic circle.
CHAPTER VII.
Beside the Moldau's rushing stream
With the wan moon overhead,
There stood, as in an awful dream,
The army of the dead.
Longfellow
.
Most
of our readers will understand what was meant by
Mary Pratt's inclination of the earth's axis to the plane
of its orbit; but as there may be a few who do not, and
as the consequences of this great physical fact are
materially
connected with the succeeding events of the
narrative
,
we propose to give such a homely explanation of the
phenomenon as we humbly trust will render it clear to the
most clouded mind. The orbit of the earth is the path
which it follows in space in its annual revolution around
the sun. To a planet there is no up or down, except as
ascent and descent are estimated from and towards itself.
In all other respects it floats in vacuum, or what is so
nearly so as to be thus termed. Now, let the uninstructed
reader imagine a large circular table, with a light on its
surface, and near to its centre. The light shall represent
the sun, the outer edge of the circle of the table the earth's
orbit, and its surface the plane of that orbit. In nature
there is no such thing as a plane at all, the space within
the orbit being vacant; but the surface of the table gives a
distinct notion of the general position of the earth as it
travels round the sun. It is scarcely necessary to say that
the axis of the earth is an imaginary line drawn through
the planet, from one pole to the other; the name being
derived from the supposition that our daily revolution is
made on this axis.
Now, the first thing that the student is to fix in his mind,
in order to comprehend the phenomenon of the seasons, is
the leading fact that the earth does not change its attitude
in space, if we may so express it, when it changes its
position
.
8*
If the axis were
perpendicular
to the plane of the
orbit, this circumstance would not affect the temperature,
as the simplest experiment will show. Putting the equator
of a globe on the outer edge of the table, and holding it
perfectly
upright
, causing it to turn on its axis as it passes
round the circle, it would be found that the light from the
centre of the table would illumine just one half of the globe,
at all times and in all positions, cutting the two poles. Did
this movement correspond with that of nature, the days and
nights would be always of the same length, and there would
be no changes of the seasons, the warmest weather being
nearest to the equator, and the cold increasing as the poles
were approached. No where, however, would the cold be
so intense as it now is, nor would the heat be as great as at
present, except at or quite near to the equator. The first
fact would be owing to the regular return of the sun, once
in twenty-four hours; the last to the oblique manner in
which its rays struck this orb, in all places but near its
centre.
But the globe ought not to be made to move around the
table with its axis perpendicular to its surface, or to the
plane of the earth's orbit. In point of fact, the earth is
inclined to this plane, and the globe should be placed at a
corresponding inclination. Let the globe be brought to
the edge of the table, at its south side, and with its upper
or north pole inclining to the sun, and then commence the
circuit, taking care always to keep this north pole of the
globe pointing in the same direction, or to keep the globe
itself in what we have termed a fixed attitude. As one
half of the globe must always be in light, and the other
half in darkness, this inclination from the perpendicular
will bring the circle of light some distance beyond the
north pole, when the globe is due-south from the light, and
will leave an equal space around the opposite pole without
any light at all, or any light directly received. Now it is
that what we have termed the
fixed attitude
of the globe
begins to tell. If the north pole inclined towards the orbit
facing the rim of the table, the light would still cut the
poles, the days and nights would still be equal, and there
would be no changes in the seasons, though there would
be a rival revolution of the globe, by causing it to turn once
a year, shifting the poles end for end. The inclination
being
to the surface of the table, or to the
plane
of the orbit,
the phenomena that are known to exist are a consequence.
Thus it is, that the change in the seasons is as much owing
to the fixed attitude of the earth in space, as we have
chosen to term its polar directions, as to the inclination of
its axis. Neither would produce the phenomena without
the assistance of the other, as our experiment with the
table will show.
Place, then, the globe at the south side of the rim of the
table, with its axis inclining towards its surface, and its
poles always pointing in the same general direction, not
following the circuit of the orbit, and set it in motion
towards
the east, revolving rapidly on its axis as it moves.
While directly south of the light, it would be found that
the north pole would be illuminated, while no revolution
on the axis would bring the south pole within the circle of
the light. This is when a line drawn from the axis of the
globe would cut the lamp, were the inclination brought as
low as the surface of the table. Next set the globe in
motion
,
following the rim of the table, and proceeding to the
east or right hand, keeping its axis always looking in the
same general direction, or in an attitude that would be
parallel to a north and south line drawn through the sun,
were the inclination as low as the surface of the table.
This movement would be, in one sense, sideways, the circle
of light gradually lessening around the north pole, and
extending
towards the south, as the globe proceeded east and
north, diminishing the length of the days in the northern
hemisphere, and increasing them in the southern. When
at east, the most direct rays of the light would fall on the
equator, and the light would cut the two poles, rendering
the days and nights equal. As the globe moved north, the
circle of light would be found to increase around the
south
pole, while none at all touched the
north
. When on the
north side of the table, the
northern
pole of the globe would
incline so far from the sun as to leave a space around it in
shadow that would be of precisely the same size as had
been the space of light when it was placed on the opposite
side of the table. Going round the circle west, the same
phenomena would be seen, until coming directly south of
the lamp, the north pole would again come into light
altogether
,
and the south equally into shadow.
Owing to this very simple but very wonderful provision
of divine power and wisdom, this earth enjoys the relief of
the changes in the seasons, as well as the variations in the
length of the days. For one half of the year, or from
equinox to equinox, from the time when the globe is at a
due-west point of the table until it reaches the east, the
north pole would always receive the light, in a circle around
it, that would gradually increase and diminish; and for the
other half, the same would be true of the other hemisphere.
Of course there is a precise point on the earth where this
polar illumination ceases. The shape of the illuminated
part is circular; and placing the point of a pencil on the
globe at the extremest spot on the circle, holding it there
while the globe is turned on its axis, the lines made would
just include the portions of the earth around the globe that
thus receives the rays of the sun at midsummer. These
lines compose what are termed the arctic and antarctic
circles, with the last of which our legend has now a most
serious connection. After all, we are by no means certain
that we have made our meaning as obvious as we could wish,
it being very difficult to explain phenomena of this nature
clearly, without actually experimenting.
It is usual to say that there are six months day and six
months night in the polar basins. This is true, literally,
at the poles only; but, approximatively, it is true as a whole.
We apprehend that few personsnone, perhaps, but those
who are in habits of study  form correct notions of the
extent of what may be termed the icy seas. As the polar
circles are in 23 28, a line drawn through the south pole,
for instance, commencing on one side of the earth at the
antarctic circle, and extending to the other, would traverse
a distance materially exceeding that between New York
and Lisbon. This would make those frozen regions cover
a portion of this globe that is almost as large as the whole
of the Atlantic Ocean, as far south as the equator. Any
one can imagine what must be the influence of frost over
so vast a surface, in reproducing itself, since the presence
of ice-bergs is thought to affect our climate, when many
of them drift far south in summer. As power produces
power, riches wealth, so does cold produce cold. Fill,
then, in a certain degree, a space as large as the North
Atlantic Ocean with ice in all its varieties, fixed, mountain
and field, berg and floe, and one may get a tolerably
accurate
notion of the severity of its winters, when the sun is
scarce seen above the horizon at all, and then only to shed
its rays so obliquely as to be little better than a
chill-looking
orb of light, placed in the heavens simply to divide the
day from the night.
This, then, was the region that Roswell Gardiner was so
very anxious to leave; the winter he so much dreaded.
Mary Pratt was before him, to say nothing of his duty to
the deacon; while behind him was the vast polar ocean
just described, about to be veiled in the freezing obscurity
of its long and gloomy twilight, if not of absolute night.
No wonder, therefore, that when he trimmed his sails that
evening, to beat out of the great bay, that it was done with
the earnestness with which we all perform duties of the
highest import, when they are known to affect our
well-being
,
visibly and directly.
Keep her a good full, Mr. Hazard, said Roswell, as
he was leaving the deck, to take the first sleep in which he
had indulged for four-and-twenty hours; and let her go
through the water. We are behind our time, and must
keep in motion. Give me a call if anything like ice
appears
in a serious way.
Hazard `ay-ay'd' this order, as usual, buttoned his
pee-jacket
tighter than ever, and saw his young superiorthe
transcendental delicacy of the day is causing the difference
in rank to be termed
senior
and
junior
but Hazard saw
his
superior go below, with a feeling allied to envy, so
heavy were his eye-lids with the want of rest. Stimson
was in the first-mate's watch, and the latter approached
that old sea-dog with a wish to keep himself awake by
conversing
.
You seem as wide awake, king Stephen, the mate
remarked, as if you never felt drowsy!
This is not a part of the world for hammocks and
berths, Mr. Hazard, was the reply. I can get along,
and must get along, with a quarter part of the sleep in
these seas as would sarve me in a low latitude.
And I feel as if I wanted all I can get. Them fellows
look up well into our wake, Stephen.
They do indeed, sir, and they ought to do it; for we
have been longer than is for our good, in their'n.
Well, now we have got a fresh start, I hope we may
make a clear run of it. I saw no ice worth speaking of,
to the nor'ard here, before we made sail.
Because you see'd none, Mr. Hazard, is no proof there
is none. Floe-ice can't be seen at any great distance,
though its blink may. But, it seems to me, it's all blink
in these here seas!
There you're quite right, Stephen; for turn which
way you will, the horizon has a show of that sort_____
Starboardcalled out the look-out forwardkeep
her awaykeep her awaythere is ice ahead.
Ice in here! exclaimed Hazard, springing forward
That is more than we bargained for! Where away is
your ice, Smith?
Off here, sir, on our weather bow  and a mortal big
field of it  jist sich a chap as nipp'd the Vineyard Lion,
when she first came in to join us. Sich a fellow as that
would take the sap out of our bends, as a squeezer takes
the juice from a lemon!
Smith was a carpenter by trade, which was probably the
reason why he introduced this figure. Hazard saw the ice
with regret; for he had hoped to work the schooner fairly
out to sea in his watch; but the field was getting down
through the passage in a way that threatened to cut off the
exit of the two schooners from the bay. Daggett kept
close in his wake, a proof that this experienced navigator
in such waters saw no means to turn farther to windward.
As the wind was now abeam, both vessels drove rapidly
ahead; and in half an hour the northern point of the land
they had so lately left came into view close aboard of them.
Just then the moon rose, and objects became more clearly
visible.
Hazard hailed the Vineyard Lion, and demanded what
was to be done. It was possible, by hauling close on a
wind, to pass the cape a short distance to windward of it,
and seemingly thus clear the floe. Unless this were done,
both vessels would be compelled to ware, and run for the
southern passage, which would carry them many miles to
leeward, and might place them a long distance on the
wrong side of the group.
Is Captain Gar'ner on deck? asked Daggett, who had
now drawn close up on the lee-quarter of his consort,
Hazard having brailed his foresail and laid his topsail sharp
aback, to enable him to do so  If he isn't, I'd advise
you to give him a call at once.
This was done immediately; and while it was doing,
the Vineyard Lion swept past the Oyster Pond schooner.
Roswell announced his presence on deck just as the other
vessel cleared his bows.
There's no time to consult, Gar'ner, answered
Daggett
.
There's our road before us. Go through it we
must, or stay where we are until that field-ice gives us a
jam down yonder in the crescent. I will lead, and you
can follow as soon as your eyes are open.
One glance let Roswell into the secret of his situation.
He liked it little, but he did not hesitate.
Fill the topsail, and haul aft the foresheet, were the
quiet orders that proclaimed what he intended to do.
Both vessels stood on. By some secret process, every
man on board the two craft became aware of what was
going on, and appeared on deck. All hands were not
called, nor was there any particular noise to attract
attention
;
but the word had been whispered below that there
was a great risk to run. A risk it was, of a verity! It was
necessary to stand close along that iron-bound coast where
the seals had so lately resorted, for a distance of several
miles. The wind would not admit of the schooners
steering
much more than a cable's length from the rocks for
quite a league; after which the shore trended to the
southward
,
and a little sea-room would be gained. But on those
rocks the waves were then beating heavily, and their
bellowings
as they rolled into the cavities were at almost all
times terrific. There was some relief, however, in the
knowledge obtained of the shore, by having frequently
passed up and down it in the boats. It was known that
the water was deep close to the visible rocks, and that
there was no danger as long as a vessel could keep off
them.
No one spoke. Every eye was strained to discern objects
ahead, or was looking astern to trace the expected collision
between the floe-ice and the low promontory of the cape.
The ear soon gave notice that this meeting had already
taken place; for the frightful sound that attended the
cracking and rending of the field might have been heard
fully a league. Now it was that each schooner did her
best! Yards were braced up, sheets flattened, and the
helm tended. The close proximity of the rocks on the one
side, and the secret presentiment of there being more
field-ice
on the other, kept every one wide awake. The two
masters, in particular, were all eyes and ears. It was
getting to be very cold; and the sort of shelter aloft that
goes by the quaint name of crow's-nest, had been fitted
up in each vessel. A mate was now sent into each, to
ascertain what might be discovered to windward. Almost
at the same instant, these young seamen hailed their
respective
decks, and gave notice that a wide field was
coming in upon them, and must eventually crush them,
unless avoided. This startling intelligence reached the
two commanders in the very same moment. The
emergency
demanded decision, and each man acted for himself.
Roswell ordered his helm put
down
, and his schooner
tacked
. The water was not rough enough to prevent the
success of the manuvre. On the other hand, Daggett
kept a rap full, and
stood on
. Roswell manifested the most
judgment and seamanship. He was now far enough from
the cape to beat to windward; and, by going nearer to the
enemy, he might always run along its southern boundary,
profit by any opening, and would be by as much as he could
thus gain, to windward of the coast. Daggett had one
advantage. By standing on, in the event of a return
becoming
necessary, he would gain in time. In ten minutes
the two schooners were a mile asunder. We shall first
follow that of Roswell Gardiner's, in his attempt to escape.
The first floe, which was ripping and tearing one of its
angles into fragments, as it came grinding down on the
cape, soon compelled the vessel to tack. Making short
reaches, Roswell ere long found himself fully a mile to
windward of the rocks, and sufficiently near to the new
floe to discern its shape, drift, and general character. Its
eastern end had lodged upon the field that first came in,
and was adding to the vast momentum with which that
enormous floe was pressing down upon the cape. Large
as was that first visiter to the bay, this was of at least twice
if not of thrice its dimensions. What gave Roswell the
most concern was the great distance that this field extended
to the westward. He went up into the crow's-nest himself,
and, aided by the light of a most brilliant moon, and a sky
without a cloud, he could perceive the blink of ice in that
direction, as he fancied, for fully two leagues. What was
unusual, perhaps, at that early season of the year, these
floes did not consist of a vast collection of numberless
cakes of ice; but the whole field, so far as could then be
ascertained, was firm and united. The nights were now
so cold that ice made fast wherever there was water; and
it occurred to our young master that, possibly, fragments
that had once been separated and broken by the waves,
might have become re-united by the agency of the frost.
Roswell descended from the crow's-nest half chilled by a
cutting wind, though it blew from a warm quarter.
Summoning
his mates, he asked their advice.
It seems to me, Captain Gar'ner, Hazard replied,
there's very little choice. Here we are, so far as I can
make it out, embayed, and we have only to box about until
day-light comes, when some chance may turn up to help
us. If so, we must turn it to account; if not, we must
make up our minds to winter here.
This was coolly and calmly said; though it was clear
enough that Hazard was quite in earnest.
You forget there may be an open passage to the
westward
,
Mr. Hazard, Roswell rejoined, and that we may
yet pass out to sea by it. Captain Daggett is already out
of sight in the western board, and we may do well to stand
on after him.
Ay, ay, sir  I know all that, Captain Gar'ner, and it
may be as you say; but when I was aloft, half an hour
since, if there wasn't the blink of ice in that direction,
quite round to the back of the island, there wasn't the
blink of ice nowhere hereabouts. I'm used to the sight
of it, and can't well be mistaken.
There is always ice on that side of the land, Hazard,
Vol. II.  9
and you may have seen the blink of the bergs which have
hugged the cliffs in that quarter all summer. Still, that is
not proving we shall find no outlet. This craft can go
through a very small passage, and we must take care and
find one in proper time. Wintering here is out of the
question. A
hundred
reasons tell us not to think of such
a thing, besides the interests of our owners. We are
walking
along this floe pretty fast, though I think the vessel is
too much by the head; don't it strike you so, Hazard?
Lord, sir, it's nothing but the ice that has made, and
is making for'ard! Before we got so near the field as to
find a better lee, the little lipper that came athwart our
bows froze almost as soon as it wet us. I do suppose, sir,
there are now several tons of ice on our bows, counting
from channel to channel, forward.
On an examination this proved to be true, and the
knowledge
of the circumstance did not at all contribute to
Gardiner's
feeling of security. He saw there was no time to
be lost, and he crowded sail with a view of forcing the
vessel past the dangers if possible, and of getting her into
a milder climate. But even a fast-sailing schooner will
scarcely equal our wishes under such circumstances. There
was no doubt that the Sea Lion's speed was getting to be
affected by the manner in which her bows were weighed
down by ice, in addition to the discomfort produced by
cold, damp, and the presence of a slippery substance on
the deck and rigging. Fortunately there was not much
spray flying, or matters would have been much worse. As
it was, they were bad enough, and very ominous of future
evil.
While the Sea Lion of Oyster Pond was running along
the margin of the ice in the manner just described, and
after the blink to the westward had changed to a visible
field, making it very uncertain whether any egress was to
be found in that quarter or not, an opening suddenly
appeared
trending to the northward, and sufficiently wide, as
Roswell thought, to enable him to beat through it. Putting
his helm down, his schooner came heavily round, and was
filled on a course that soon carried her half a mile into
this passage. At first, everything seemed propitious, the
channel rather opening than otherwise, while the course
was suchnorth-north-westas enabled the vessel to make
very long legs on one tack, and that the best. After going
about four or five times, however, all these flattering
symptoms
suddenly changed, by the passage's terminating in a
cul de sac
. Almost at the same instant the ice closed
rapidly in the schooner's wake. An effort was made to
run back, but it failed in consequence of an enormous
floe's turning on its centre, having met resistance from a
field closer in, that was, in its turn, stopped by the rocks.
Roswell saw at once that nothing could be done at the
moment. He took in all his canvass, as well as the frozen
cloth could be handled, got out ice-anchors, and hauled
his vessel into a species of cove where there would be the
least danger of a nip, should the fields continue to close.
All this time Daggett was as busy as a bee. He rounded
the headland, and flattered himself that he was about to
slip past all the rocks, and get out into open water, when
the vast fields of which the blink had been seen even by
those in the other vessel, suddenly stretched themselves
across his course in a way that set at defiance all attempts
to go any further in that direction. Daggett wore round,
and endeavoured to return. This was by no means as easy
as it was to go down before the wind, and his bows were
also much encumbered with ice; more so, indeed, than
those of the other schooner. Once or twice his craft missed
stays in consequence of getting so much by the head, and
it was deemed necessary to heave-to, and take to the axes.
A great deal of extra and cumbrous weight was gotten rid
of, but an hour of most precious time was lost.
By the time Daggett was ready to make sail again, he
found his return round the headland was entirely cut off,
by the field's having come in absolute contact with the
rocks!
It was now midnight, and the men on board both vessels
required rest. A watch was set in each, and most of the
people were permitted to turn in. Of course, proper
look-outs
were had, but the light of the moon was not sufficiently
distinct to render it safe to make any final efforts under its
favour. No great alarm was felt, there being nothing
unusual
in a vessel's being embayed in the ice; and so long
as she was not nipped or pressed upon by actual contact,
the position was thought safe rather than the reverse. It
was desirable, moreover, for the schooners to communicate
with each other; for some advantage might be known to
one of the masters that was concealed by distance from his
companion. Without concert, therefore, Roswell and
Daggett came to the same general conclusions, and waited
patiently.
The day came at last, cold and dreary, though not
altogether
without the relief of an air that blew from regions
far warmer than the ocean over which it was now
travelling
.
Then the two schooners became visible from each
other, and Roswell saw the jeopardy of Daggett, and
Daggett
saw the jeopardy of Roswell. The vessels were little
more than a mile apart, but the situation of the Vineyard
Lion was much the most critical. She had made fast to
the floe, but her support itself was in a steady and most
imposing motion. As soon as Roswell saw the manner in
which his consort was surrounded, and the very threatening
aspect of the danger that pressed upon him, his first impulse
was to hasten to him, with a party of his own people, to
offer any assistance he could give. After looking at the
ice immediately around his own craft, where all seemed to
be right, he called over the names of six of his men,
ordered
them to eat a warm breakfast, and to prepare to
accompany
him.
In twenty minutes Roswell was leading his little party
across the ice, each man carrying an axe, or some other
implement that it was supposed might be of use. It was
by no means difficult to proceed; for the surface of the
floe, one seemingly more than a league in extent, was quite
smooth, and the snow on it was crusted to a strength that
would have borne a team.
The water between the ice and the rocks is a much
narrower strip than I had thought, said Roswell, to his
constant attendant, Stimson. Here, it does not appear to
be a hundred yards in width!
Nor is it, sirwhewthis trotting in so cold a climate
makes a man puff like a whale blowing  but, Captain
Gar'ner, that schooner will be cut in two before we can
get to her. Look, sir; the floe has reached the rocks
already, quite near her; and it does not stop the drift at
all, seemingly.
Roswell made no reply; the state of the Vineyard Lion
did appear to be much more critical than he had previously
imagined. Until he came nearer to the land, he had formed
no notion of the steady power with which the field was
setting down on the rocks on which the broken fragments
were now creeping like creatures endowed with life.
Occasionally
,
there would be loud disruptions, and the
movement
of the floe would become more rapid; then, again, a
sort of pause would succeed, and for a moment the
approaching
party felt a gleam of hope. But all expectations
of this sort were doomed to be disappointed.
Look, sir! exclaimed Stimsonshe went down afore
it twenty fathoms at that one set. She must be awful near
the rocks, sir!
All the men now stopped. They knew they were
powerless
;
and intense anxiety rendered them averse to move.
Attention appeared to interfere with their walking on the
ice; and each held his breath in expectation. They saw
that the schooner, then less than a cable's length from them,
was close to the rocks; and the next shock, if anything
like the last, must overwhelm her. To their astonishment,
instead of being nipped, the schooner rose by a stately
movement that was not without grandeur, upheld by broken
cakes that had got beneath her bottom, and fairly reached
the shelf of rocks almost unharmed. Not a man had left
her; but there she was, placed on the shore, some twenty
feet above the surface of the sea, on rocks worn smooth by
the action of the waves! Had the season been propitious,
and did the injury stop here, it might have been possible to
get the craft into the water again, and still carry her to
America.
But the floe was not yet arrested. Cake succeeded cake,
one riding over another, until a wall of ice rose along the
shore, that Roswell and his companions, with all their
activity and courage, had great difficulty in crossing. They
succeeded in getting over it, however; but when they
reached the unfortunate schooner, she was literally buried.
The masts were broken, the sails torn, rigging scattered,
and sides stove. The Sea Lion of Martha's Vineyard was
9*
a worthless wreckworthless as to all purposes but that
of being converted into materials for a smaller craft, or to
be used as fuel.
All this had been done in ten minutes! Then it was
that the vast superiority of nature over the resources of
man made itself apparent. The people of the two vessels
stood aghast with this sad picture of their own
insignificance
before their eyes. The crew of the wreck, it is true,
had escaped without difficulty; the movement having been
as slow and steady as it was irresistible. But there they
were, in the clothes they had on, with all their effects
buried under piles of ice that were already thirty or forty
feet in height.
She looks as if she was built there, Gar'ner! Daggett
coolly observed, as he stood regarding the scene with eyes
as intently riveted on the wreck as human organs were
ever fixed on any object. Had a man told me this
could
happen, I would not have believed him!
Had she been a three-decker, this ice would have
treated
her in the same way. There is a force in such a field
that walls of stone could not withstand.
Captain Gar'nerCaptain Gar'ner, called out
Stimson
,
hastily; we'd better go back, sir; our own craft is
in danger. She is drifting fast in towards the cape, and
may reach it afore we can get to her!
Sure enough, it was so. In one of the changes that are
so unaccountable among the ice, the floe had taken a
sudden
and powerful direction towards the entrance of the
Great Bay. It was probably owing to the circumstance
that the inner field had forced its way past the cape, and
made room for its neighbour to follow. A few of Daggett's
people, with Daggett himself, remained to see what might
yet be saved from the wreck; but all the rest of the men
started for the cape, towards which the Oyster Pond craft
was now directly setting. The distance was less than a
league; and, as yet, there was not much snow on the rocks.
By taking an upper shelf, it was possible to make pretty
good progress; and such was the manner of Roswell's
present
march.
It was an extraordinary sight to see the coast along which
our party was hastening, just at that moment. As the cakes
of ice were broken from the field, they were driven
upward
by the vast pressure from without, and the whole line
of the shore seemed as if alive with creatures that were
issuing from the ocean to clamber on the rocks. Roswell
had often seen that very coast peopled with seals, as it now
appeared to be in activity with fragments of ice, that were
writhing, and turning, and rising, one upon another, as if
possessed of the vital principle.
In half an hour Roswell and his party reached the house.
The schooner was then less than half a mile from the spot,
still setting in, along with the outer field, but not nipped.
So far from being in danger of such a calamity, the little
basin in which she lay had expanded, instead of closing;
and it would have been possible to handle a quick-working
craft in it, under her canvass. An exit, however, was quite
out of the question; there being no sign of any passage to
or from that icy dock. There the craft still lay, anchored
to the weather-floe, while the portion of her crew which
remained on board was as anxiously watching the coast as
those who were on the coast watched her. At first,
Roswell
gave his schooner up; but on closer examination found
reason to hope that she might pass the rocks, and enter the
inner, rather than the Great, Bay.
CHAPTER VIII.
To prayer;for the glorious sun is gone,
And the gathering darkness of night comes on;
Like a curtain from God's kind hand it flows,
To shade the couch where his children repose.
Then kneel, while the watching stars are bright,
And give your last thoughts to the guardian of night.
Ware
.
Desolate
, indeed, and nearly devoid of hope, had the
situation of our sealers now become. It was mid-day, and
it was freezing everywhere in the shade. A bright genial
sun was shedding its glorious rays on the icy panorama;
but it was so obliquely as to be of hardly any use in
dispelling
the frosts. Far as the eye could see, even from the
elevation of the cape, there was nothing but ice, with the
exception of that part of the Great Bay into which the floe
had not yet penetrated. To the southward, there stood
clustering around the passage a line of gigantic bergs,
placed like sentinels, as if purposely to stop all egress in
that direction. The water had lost its motion in the shift
of wind, and new ice had formed over the whole bay, as
was evident by a white sparkling line that preceded the
irresistible march of the floe.
As Roswell gazed on this scene, serious doubts
darkened
his mind as to his escaping from this frozen chain until
the return of another summer. It is true that a south wind
might possibly produce a change, and carry away the
blockading mass; but every moment rendered this so much
the less probable. Winter, or what would be deemed
winter
in most regions, was already setting in; and should the
ice really become stationary in and around the group, all
hope of its moving must vanish for the next eight months.
Daggett reached the house about an hour before sunset.
He had succeeded in cutting a passage through the ice as
far as the cabin-door of his unfortunate schooner, when
there was no difficulty in descending into the interior parts
of the vessel. The whole party came in staggering under
heavy loads. Pretty much as a matter of course, each man
brought his own effects. Clothes, tobacco, rum,
small-stores
,
bedding, quadrants, and similar property, was that
first attended to. At that moment, little was thought of the
skins and oil. The cargo was neglected, while the minor
articles had been eagerly sought.
Roswell was on board his own schooner, now again in
dangerous proximity to the cape. She was steadily setting
in, when Daggett rejoined him. The crew of the lost vessel
remained in the house, where they lighted a fire and
deposited
their goods, returning to the wreck for another load,
taking the double sets of wheels along with them. When the
two masters met, they conferred together earnestly,
receiving
into their councils such of the officers as were on board.
The security of the remaining vessel was now all-important;
and it was not to be concealed that she was in imminent
jeopardy. The course taken by the floe was directly
towards the most rugged part of Cape Hazard; and the
rate of the movement such as to threaten a very speedy
termination of the matter. There was one circumstance,
however, and only that one, which offered a single chance
of escape. The opening around the schooner still existed
in part, about half of it having been lost in the collision
with the outermost point of the rocks. It was this species
of vacuum that, by removing all resistance at that
particular
spot, indeed, which had given the field its most
dangerous
cant, turning the movement of the vessel towards the
rocks. The chance, therefore, existed in the possibility
and it was little more than a bare possibility  of moving
the schooner in that small area of open water, and of taking
her far enough south to clear the most southern extremity
of the wall of stone that protected the cove. As yet, this
open water did not extend far enough to admit of the
schooner's being taken to the point in question; but it was
slowly tending in that direction, and did not the basin
close altogether ere that desirable object was achieved, the
vessel might yet be saved. In order, however, to do this,
it would be necessary to cut a sort of dock or slip in the
ice of the cove, into which the craft might shoot, as a place
of refuge. Once within the cove, fairly behind the point
of the rocks, there would be perfect safety; if suffered to
drift to the southward of that shelter, this schooner would
probably be lost like her consort, and very much in the
same manner.
Gardiner now sent a gang of hands to the desired point,
armed with saws, and the slip was commenced. The ice
in the cove was still only two or three inches thick, and the
work went bravely on. Instead of satisfying himself with
cutting a passage merely behind the point of rock, Hazard
opened one quite up into the cove, to the precise place
where the schooner had been so long at anchor. Just as
the sun was setting, the crisis arrived. So heavy had been
the movement towards the rocks, that Roswell saw he
could delay no longer. Were he to continue where he
was, a projection on the cape would prevent his passage to
the entrance of the cove; he would be shut in, and he
might be certain that the Sea Lion would be crushed as
the floe pressed home upon the shore. The ice-anchors
were cut out accordingly, the jib was hoisted, and the
schooner wore short round on her heel. The space
between
the floe and the projection in the rocks just named,
did not now exceed a hundred feet; and it was lessening
fast. Much more room existed on each side of this
particular
excrescence in the rugged coast, the space north
being still considerable, while that to the southward might
be a hundred yards in width; the former of these areas
being owing to the form of the basin, and the latter to the
shape of the shore.
In the first of the basins named, the schooner wore short
round on her heel, her foresail being set to help her. A
breathless moment passed as she ran down towards the
narrow strait. It was quickly reached, and that none too
soon; the opening now not exceeding sixty feet. The yards
of the vessel almost brushed the rocks in passing; but she
went clear. As soon as in the lower basin, as one might
call it, the jib and foresail were taken in, and the head of
the mainsail was got on the craft. This helped her to luff
up towards the slip, which she reached under sufficient
head-way fairly to enter it. Lines were thrown to the people
on the ice, who soon hauled the schooner up to the head
of her frozen dock. Three cheers broke spontaneously out
of the throats of the men, as they thus achieved the step
which assured them of the safety of the vessel, so far as the
ice was concerned! In this way do we estimate our
advantages
and disadvantages, by comparison. In the abstract,
the situation of the sealers was still sufficiently painful;
though compared with what it would have been with the
other schooner wrecked, it was security itself.
By this time it was quite dark; and a day of excitement
and fatigue required a night of rest. After supping, the
men turned in; the Vineyarders mostly in the house, where
they occupied their old bunks. When the moon rose, the
party from the wreck arrived, with their carts well loaded,
and themselves half frozen, notwithstanding their toil. In
a short time, all were buried in sleep.
When Roswell Gardiner came on deck next morning,
his first glance told him how little was the chance of his
party's returning north that season. The strange floe had
driven into the Great Bay, completely covering its surface,
lining the shores far and near with broken and glittering
cakes of ice; and, as it were, hermetically sealing the place
against all egress. New ice, an inch or two thick, or even
six or eight inches thick, might have been sawed through,
and a passage cut even for a league, should it be necessary.
Such things were sometimes done, and great as would have
been the toil, our sealers would have attempted it, in
preference
to running the risk of passing a winter in that
region. But almost desperate as would have been even
that source of refuge, the party was completely cut off from
its possession. To think of sawing through ice as thick as
that of the floe, for any material distance, would be like a
project to tunnel the Alps.
Melancholy was the meeting between Roswell and
Daggett
that morning. The former was too manly and generous
to indulge in reproaches, else might he well have told the
last that all this was owing to him. There is a singular
propensity in us all to throw the burthen of our own
blunders
on the shoulders of other folk. Roswell had a little
of this weakness, overlooking the fact that he was his own
master; and as he had come to the group by himself, he
ought to have left it in the same manner, as soon as his
own particular task was accomplished. But Roswell did
not see this quite as distinctly as he saw the fact that
Daggett's
detentions and indirect appeals to his better feelings
had involved him in all these difficulties. Still, while thus
he felt, he made no complaint.
All hope of getting north that season now depended on
the field-ice's drifting away from the Great Bay before it
got fairly frozen in. So jammed and crammed with it did
every part of the bay appear to be, however, that little
could be expected from that source of relief. This
Daggett
admitted in the conversation he held with Roswell, as
soon as the latter joined him on the rocky terrace beneath
the house.
The wisest thing we can do, then, replied our hero,
will be to make as early preparations as possible to meet
the winter. If we are to remain here, a day gained now
will be worth a week a month hence. If we should happily
escape, the labour thus expended will not kill us.
Quite truevery much as you say, certainly,
answered
Daggett, musing. I was thinking as you came ashore,
Gar'ner, if a lucky turn might not be made in this wise:
I have a good many skins in the wreck, you see, and you
have a good deal of ile in your holdnow, by starting some
of that ile, and pumping it out, and shooking the casks,
room might be made aboard of you for all my skins. I
think we could run all of the last over on them wheels in
the course of a week.
Captain Daggett, it is by yielding so much to your
skins that we have got into all this trouble.
Skins, measure for measure, in the way of tonnage,
will bring a great deal more than ile.
Roswell smiled, and muttered something to himself, a
little bitterly. He was thinking of the grievous
disappointment
and prolonged anxiety that it pained him to believe
Mary would feel at his failure to return home at the
appointed
time; though it would probably have pained him
more to believe she would not thus be disappointed and
anxious. Here his displeasure, or its manifestation, ceased;
and the young man turned his thoughts on the present
necessities
of his situation.
Daggett appearing very earnest on the subject of
removing
his skins before the snows came to impede the
path, Roswell could urge no objection that would be likely
to prevail; but his acquiescence was obtained by means
of a hint from Stimson, who by this time had gained his
officer's ear.
Let him do it, Captain Gar'ner, said the boat-steerer,
in an aside, speaking respectfully, but earnestly. He'll
never stow'em in our hold, this season at least; but they'll
make excellent filling-in for the sides of this hut.
You think then, Stephen, that we are likely to pass
the winter here?
We are in the hands of Divine Providence, sir, which
will do with us as seems the best in the eyes of
never-failing
wisdom. At all events, Captain Gar'ner, I think 'twill
be safest to act at once as if we had the winter afore us.
In my judgment, this house might be made a good deal
more comfortable for us all, in such a case, than our craft;
for we should not only have more room, but might have as
many fires as we want, and more than we can find fuel
for.
Ay, there's the difficulty, Stephen. Where are we to
find wood, throughout a polar winter, for even one fire?
We must be saving, sir, and thoughtful, and keep
ourselves
warm as much as we can by exercise. I have had a
t
aste of this once, in a small way, already; and know what
ought to be done, in many partic'lars. In the first place,
the men must keep themselves as clean as water will make
themdirt is a great helper of cold  and the water must
be just as frosty as human natur' can bear it. This will set
everything into actyve movement inside, and bring out
warmth from the heart, as it might be. That's my
principle
of keeping warm, Captain Gar'ner.
I dare say it may be a pretty good one, Stephen,
answered
Roswell, and we'll bear it in mind. As for stoves
we are well enough off, for there is one in the house, and a
good large one it is; then, there is a stove in each cabin,
and there are the two cambooses. If we had fuel for them
all, I should feel no concern on the score of warmth.
There's the wrack, sir. By cutting her up at once,
we should get wood enough, in my judgment, to see it
out.
Roswell made no reply; but he looked intently at the
boat-steerer for half a minute. The idea was new to him;
and the more he thought on the subject, the greater was
the confidence it gave him in the result. Daggett, he well
knew, would not consent to the mutilation of his schooner,
wreck as it was, so long as the most remote hope existed
of getting her again into the water. The tenacity with
which this man clung to property was like that which is
imputed to the life of the cat; and it was idle to expect
any concessions from him on a subject like that.
Nevertheless
,
necessity is a hard master; and if the question
were narrowed down to one of burning the materials of a
vessel that was in the water, and in good condition, and
of burning those of one that was out of the water, with
holes cut through her bottom in several places, and
otherwise
so situated as to render repairs extremely difficult, if
not impossible, even Daggett would be compelled to submit
to circumstances.
Vol. II.  10
It was accordingly suggested to the people of the
Vineyard
Lion that they could do no better than to begin at
once to remove everything they could come at, and which
could be transported from the wreck to the house. As
there was little to do on board the vessel afloat, her crew
cheerfully offered to assist in this labour. The days were
shortening sensibly and fast, and no time was to be lost,
the distance being so great as to make two trips a day a
matter of great labour. No sooner was the plan adopted,
therefore, than steps were taken to set about its execution.
It is unnecessary for us to dwell minutely on everything
that occurred during the succeeding week or ten days.
The wind shifted to south-west the very day that the Sea
Lion got back into her little harbour; and this seemed to
put a sudden check on the pressure of the vast floe.
Nevertheless
,
there was no counter-movement, the ice
remaining
in the Great Bay seemingly as firmly fastened as if it
had originally been made there. Notwithstanding this shift
of the wind to a cold point of the compass, the thermometer
rose, and it thawed freely about the middle of the day, in
all places to which the rays of the sun had access. This
enabled the men to work with more comfort than they
could have done in the excessively severe weather; as it
was found that respiration became difficult when it was so
very cold.
Access was now obtained to the wreck by cutting a
regular
passage to the main hatch through the ice. The
schooner stood nearly upright, sustained by fragments of
the floe; and there were extensive caverns all around her,
produced by the random manner in which the cakes had
come up out of their proper element like so many living
things. Among these caverns one might have wandered
for miles without once coming out into the open air, though
they were cold and cheerless, and had little to attract the
adventurer after the novelty was abated. In rising from
the water, the schooner had been roughly treated; but
once sustained by the ice, her transit had been easy and
tolerably safe. Several large cakes lay on or over her,
sustained more by other cakes that rested on the rocks
than by the timbers of the vessel herself. These cakes
formed a sort of roof, and as they did not drip, they served
to make a shelter against the wind; for, at the point where
the wreck lay, the south-west gales came howling round
the base of the mountain, piercing the marrow itself in the
bones. At the hut it was very different. There the heights
made a lee that extended all over the cape, and for some
distance to the westward; while the whole power the sun
possessed in that high latitude was cast, very obliquely it
is true, but clearly, and without any other drawback than
its position in the ecliptic, fairly on the terrace, the hut
above, and the rocks around it. On the natural terrace,
indeed, it was still pleasant to walk and work, and even to
sit for a few hours in the middle of the day; for winter was
not yet come in earnest in that frozen world.
One of Roswell's first objects was to transport most of
the eatables from the wreck; for he foresaw the need there
would be for everything of the sort. Neither vessel had
laid in a stock of provisions for a longer period than about
twelve months, of which nearly half were now gone. This
allowance applied to salted meats and bread, which are
usually regarded as the base of a ship's stores. There were
several barrels of flour, a few potatoes, a large quantity of
onions, a few barrels of corn-meal, or `injin,' as it is usually
termed in American parlance, an entire barrel of pickled
cucumbers, another about half full of cabbage preserved in
the same way, and an entire barrel of molasses. In
addition
,
there was a cask of whiskey, a little wine and brandy
to be used medicinally, sugar, brown, whitey-brown and
browny-white, and a pretty fair allowance of tea and coffee;
the former being a Hyson-skin, and the latter San Domingo
of no very high quality. Most of these articles were
transported
from the wreck to the house, in the course of the
few days that succeeded, though Daggett insisted on a
certain
portion of the supplies being left in his stranded craft.
Not until this was done would Roswell listen to any
proposal
of Daggett's to transfer the skins. Twice during
these few days, indeed, did the Vineyard master come to a
pause in his proceedings, as the weather grew milder, and
gleams of a hope of being able yet to get away that season
crossed his mind. On the last of these occasions of
misgiving
,
Roswell was compelled to lead his brother master
up on the plain of the island, to an elevation of some three
hundred feet above the level of the ocean, and more than
half that distance higher than the house, and point out to
him a panorama of field-ice that the eye could not
command
.
Until that vast plain opened, or became riven by
the joint action of the agitated ocean and the warmth of a
sun from which the rays did not glance away from the
frozen surface, like light obliquely received, and as
obliquely
reflected from a mirror, it was useless to think of
releasing even the uninjured vessel; much less that which
lay riven and crushed on the rocks.
Were every cake of this ice melted into water,
Daggett
,
Roswell continued, it would not float off your
schooner. The best supplied ship-yard in America could
hardly furnish the materials for ways to launch her; and I
never knew of a vessel's being dropped into the water some
twenty feet nearly perpendicular.
I don't know that, answered Daggett, stoutly. See
what they're doing now-a-days, and think nothing of it.
I have seen a whole row of brick houses turned round by
the use of jack-screws; and one building actually taken
down a hill much higher than the distance you name.
Commodore Rodgers has just hauled a heavy frigate out
of the water, and means to put her back again, when he
has done with her. What has been done once can be done
twice. I do not like giving up 'till I'm forced to it.
That is plain enough, Captain Daggett, returned
Roswell
,
smiling. That you are game, no one can deny; but
it will all come to nothing. Neither
C
ommodore Rodgers
nor Commodore anybody else could put your craft into the
water again without something to do it with.
You think it would be asking too much to take your
schooner, and go across to the main next season a'ter timber
to make ways? put in Daggett, inquiringly. She stands
up like a church, and nothing would be easier than to lay
down ways under her bottom.
Or more difficult than to make them of any use, after
you had put them there. No, no, my good sir, you must
think no more of this; though it may be possible to make
a cover for the cargo, and return and recover it all, by
freighting a craft from Rio, on our way north.
Daggett gave a quick, inquisitive glance at his
companion
,
and Roswell's colour mounted to his cheeks; for,
while he really thought the plan just mentioned quite
feasible
,
he was conscious of foreseeing that it might be made
the means of throwing off his troublesome companion, as
he himself drew near to the West Indies and their keys.
This terminated the discussion for the time. Both of the
masters busied themselves in carrying on the duty which
had now fallen into a regular train. As much of the
interest
of what is to be related will depend on what was
done in these few days, it may be well to be a little more
explicit in stating the particulars.
The reader will understand that the house, of which so
much had already been made by our mariners, was nothing
but a shell. It had a close roof, one that effectually turned
water, and its siding, though rough, was tight and rather
thicker than is usual; being made of common inch boards,
roughly planed, and originally painted red. There were
four very tolerable windows, and a decent substantial floor
of planed plank. All this had been well put together, rather
more attention than is often bestowed on such structures
having been paid by the carpenter to the cracks and joints
on account of the known sharpness of the climate, even in
the warm months. Still, all this made a mere shell. The
marrow-freezing winds which would soon come  had
indeed
come  might be arrested by such a covering, it is
true; but the little needle-like particles of the frost would
penetrate such a shelter, as their counterparts of steel
pierce cloth. It was a matter of life and death, therefore,
to devise means to exclude the cold, in order that the vital
heat might be kept in circulation during the tremendous
season that was known to be approaching.
Stimson had much to say on the subject of the
arrangements
taken. He was the oldest man in the two crews,
and the most experienced sealer. It happened that he had
once passed a winter at Orange Harbour, in the immediate
vicinity of Cape Horn. It is true, that is an inhabited
country, if the poor degraded creatures who dwell there
can be termed inhabitants; and has its trees and
vegetation
,
such as they are. The difference between Orange
Harbour and Sealer's Land, in this respect, must be
something
like that which all the travelling world knows to exist
10*
between a winter's residence at the Hospital of the Great
St. Bernard, and a winter's residence at one of the villages
a few leagues lower down the mountain. At Sealer's Land,
if there was literally no vegetation, there was so little as
scarcely to deserve the name. Of fuel there was none, with
the exception of that which had been brought there.
Nevertheless
,
the experience of a winter passed at such a place
as Orange Harbour, must count for a great deal. Cape
Horn is in nearly 56, and Sealer's Landwe may as well
admit this much  is, by no means, 10 to the southward
of that. There must be a certain general resemblance in
the climates of the two places; and he who had gone
through a winter at one of them, must have had a very
tolerable foretaste of what was to be suffered at the
other. This particular experience, therefore, added to his
general knowledge, as well as to his character, contributed
largely to Stephen's influence in the consultations that took
place between the two masters, at which he was usually
present.
It's useless to be playing off, in an affair like this,
Captain Gar'ner, said Stephen, on one occasion. Away
from this spot all the navies of the 'arth could not now
carry us, until God's sun comes back in his course, to drive
the winter away afore it. I have my misgivin's, gentlemen,
touching this great floe that has got jammed in among these
islands, whether it will ever move ag'in; for I don't think
its coming in here is a common matter.
In which case, what would become of us,
Stephen
?
Why, sir, we should be at God's marcy, then, jist as
we be now; or would be, was we on the east eend itself.
I won't say that two resolute and strong arms might not cut
a way through for one little craft like ourn, if they had
summer fully afore 'em, and know'd they was a-workin'
towards
a fri'nd instead of towards an inimy. There's a
great deal in the last; every man is encouraged when he
thinks he's nearer to the eend of his journey a'ter a hard
day's work, than he was when he set out in the mornin'.
But to undertake sich an expedition at this season, would
be sartain destruction. No, sir; all we can do, now, is to
lay up for the winter, and that with great care and
prudence
.
We must turn ourselves into so many ants, and
show their forethought and care.
What would you recommend as our first step,
Stimson
?
asked Daggett, who had been an attentive listener.
I would advise, sir, to begin hardening the men as
soon as I could. We have too much fire in the stove, both
for our stock of wood and for the good of the people. Make
the men sleep under fewer clothes, and don't let any on 'em
hang about the galley fire, as some on 'em love to do, even
now, most desperately. Them 'ere men will be good for
nothin' ten weeks hence, unless they're taken off the fires,
as a body would take off a pot or a kettle, and are set out
to harden.
This is a process that may be easier advised than
performed
,
perhaps, Roswell quietly observed.
Don't you believe that, Captain Gar'ner. I've known
the most shiverin', smoke-dried hands in a large crew,
hardened and brought to an edge, a'ter a little trouble, as
a body would temper an axe with steel. The first thing to
be done is to make 'em scrub one another every mornin'
in cold water. This gives a life to the skin that acts much
the same as a suit of clothes. Yes, gentlemen; put a
fellow
in a tub for a minute or two of a mornin', and you may
do almost anything you please with him all day a'terwards.
One pail of water is as good as a pee-jacket. And above
all things, keep the stoves clear. The cooks should be told
not to drive their fires so hard; and we can do without the
stove in the sleeping-room a great deal better now than
most on us think. It will help to save much wood, if we
begin at once to caulk and thicken our siding, and make
the house warmer. Was the hut in a good state, we might
do without any other fire than that in the camboose for two
months yet.
Such was the general character of Stephen's counsel,
and very good advice it was. Not only did Roswell adopt
the scrubbing process, which enabled him to throw aside a
great many clothes in the course of a week, but he kept
aloof from the fires, to harden, as Stimson had called it.
That which was thus enforced by example was additionally
enjoined by precept. Several large, hulking, idle fellows,
who greatly loved the fire, were driven away from it by
shame; and the heat was allowed to diffuse itself more
equally through the building.
Any one who has ever had occasion to be a witness of
the effect of the water-cure process in enabling even
delicate
women to resist cold and damp, may form some notion
of the great improvement that was made among our sealers,
by adopting and rigidly adhering to Stimson's cold water
and no-fire system. Those who had shivered at the very
thoughts of ice-water, soon dabbled in it like young ducks;
and there was scarcely an hour in the day when the
half-hogshead
,
that was used as a bath, had not its tenant. This
tub was placed on the ice of the cove, with a tent over it;
and a well was made through which the water was drawn.
Of course, the axe was in great request, a new hole being
required each morning, and sometimes two or three times
in the course of the day. The effect of these ablutions was
very soon apparent. The men began to throw aside their
pee-jackets, and worked in their ordinary clothing, which
was warm and suited to a high latitude, with a spirit and
vigour at which they were themselves surprised. The fire
in the camboose sufficed as yet; and, at evening, the
pee-jacket
,
with the shelter of the building, the crowded rooms,
and the warm meals, for a long time enabled them to get
on without consuming anything in the largest stove.
Stimson's
plans for the protection of the hut, moreover, soon
began to tell. The skins, sails, and much of the rigging,
were brought over from the wreck; by means of the carts,
so long as there was no snow, and by means of sledges
when the snow fell and rendered wheeling difficult. Luckily,
the position of the road along the rocks caused the upper
snow to melt a little at noon-day, while it froze again,
firmer and firmer, each night. The crust soon bore, and
it was found that the sledges furnished even better means
of transportation than the wheels.
There was a little controversy about the use of the skins,
Daggett continuing to regard them as cargo. Necessity
and numbers prevailed in the end, and the whole building
was lined with them, four or five deep, by placing them
inside of beckets made of the smaller rigging. By stuffing
these skins compactly, within ropes so placed as to keep
all snug, a very material defence against the entrance of
cold was interposed. But this was not all. Inside of the
skins Stimson got up hangings of canvass, using the sails
of the wreck for that purpose. It was not necessary to cut
these sailsDaggett would not have suffered it  but they
were suspended, and crammed into openings, and
otherwise
so arranged as completely to conceal and shelter every
side, as well as the ceilings of both rooms. Portions were
fitted with such address as to fall before the windows, to
which they formed very warm if not very ornamental
curtains
.
Stephen, however, induced Roswell to order
outside
shutters to be made and hung; maintaining that one
such shutter would soon count as a dozen cords of wood.
Much of the wood, too, was brought over from the wreck;
and that which had been carelessly abandoned on the rocks
was all collected and piled carefully and conveniently near
the outer door of the hut; which door, by the way, looked
inward, or towards the rocks in the rear of the building,
where it opened on a sort of yard, that Roswell hoped to
be able to keep clear of ice and snow throughout the
winter
.
He might as well have expected to melt the glaciers
of Grindewald by lighting a fire on the meadows at their
base!
Stephen had another project to protect the house, and to
give facilities for moving outside, when the winter should
be at the hardest. In his experience at Orange Harbour,
he had found that great inconvenience was sustained in
consequence of the snow's melting around the building he
inhabited, which came from the warmth of the fire within
To avoid this, a very serious evil, he had spare sails of
heavy canvass laid across the roof of the warehouse, a
building of no great height, and secured them to the rocks
below by means of anchors, kedges, and various other
devices
;
in some instances, by lashings to projections in the
cliffs. Spare spars, leaning from the roof, supported this
tent-like covering, and props beneath sustained the spars.
This arrangement was made on only two sides of the
building
,
one end, and the side which looked to the north;
materials failing before the whole place was surrounded.
The necessity for admitting light, too, admonished the
sealers of the inexpediency of thus shrouding all their
windows
.
The bottom of this tent was only ten feet from the
side of the house, which gave it greater security than if it
had been more horizontal, while it made a species of
verandah in which exercise could be taken with greater
freedom than in the rooms. Everything was done to
strengthen the building in all its parts that the ingenuity
of seamen could suggest; and particularly to prevent the
tent-verandah from caving in.
Stephen intimated that their situation possessed one
great advantage, as well as disadvantage. In consequence
of standing on a shelf with a lower terrace so close as to
be within the cast of a shovel, the snow might be thrown
below, and the hut relieved. The melted snow, too, would
be apt to take the same direction, under the law that
governs
the course of all fluids. The disadvantage was in the
barrier of rock behind the hut, which, while it served
admirably
to break the piercing south winds, would very
naturally tend to make high snow-banks in drifting storms.
CHAPTER IX.
My foot on the ice-berg has lighted,
When hoarse the wild winds veer about;
My eye when the bark is benighted,
Sees the lamp of the light-house go out.
I'm the sea-bird, sea-bird, sea-bird,
Lone looker on despair;
The sea-bird, sea-bird, sea-bird,
The only witness there.
Brainard
.
Two months passed rapidly away in the excitement and
novelty of the situation and pursuits of the men. In that
time, all was done that the season would allow; the house
being considered as complete, and far from uncomfortable.
The days had rapidly lessened in length, and the nights
increased proportionably, until the sun was visible only for
a few hours at a time, and then merely passing low along
the northern horizon. The cold increased in proportion,
though the weather varied almost as much in that high
latitude as it does in our own. It had ceased to thaw much,
however; and the mean of the thermometer was not many
degrees above zero. Notwithstanding this low range of
the mercury, the men found that they were fast getting
acclimated, and that they could endure a much greater
intensity of cold than they had previously supposed
possible
.
As yet, there had been nothing to surprise natives of
New York and New England, there rarely occurring a
winter in which weather quite as cold as any they had yet
experienced in the antarctic sea, does not set in, and last
for some little time. Even while writing this very chapter
of our legend, here in the mountains of Otsego, one of these
Siberian visits has been paid to our valley. For the last
three days the thermometer has ranged, at sunrise, between
17 and 22 below zero; though there is every appearance
of a thaw, and we may have the mercury up to 40 above,
in the course of the next twenty-four hours. Men
accustomed
to such transitions, and such extreme cold, are not
easily laid up or intimidated.
A great deal of snow fell about this particular portion
of the year; more, indeed, than at a later period. This
snow produced the greatest inconvenience; for it soon
became
so deep as to form high banks around the house, and
to fill all the customary haunts of the men. Still, there
were places that were in a great measure exempt from this
white mantle. The terrace immediately below the hut,
which has so often been mentioned, was one of these bare
spots. It was so placed as to be swept by both the east and
the west winds, which generally cleared it of everything
like snow, as fast as it fell; and this more effectually than
could be done by a thousand brooms. The level of rock
usually travelled in going to or from the wreck, was
another
of these clear places. It was a sort of shelf, too
narrow to admit of the snow's banking, and too much
raked by the winds that commonly accompanied snow, to
suffer the last to lodge to any great depth. Snow there
was, with a hard crust, as has already been mentioned; but
it was not snow ten or fifteen feet deep, as occurred in many
other places. There were several points, however, where
banks had formed, even on this ledge, through which the
men were compelled to cut their way by the use of shovels;
an occupation that gave them exercise, and contributed to
keep them in health, if it was of no other service. It was
found that the human frame could not endure one-half the
toil, in that low state of the mercury, that it could bear in
one a few degrees higher.
Daggett had not, by any means, abandoned his craft, as
much as he had permitted her to be dismantled. Every
day or two he had some new expedient for getting the
schooner off in the spring; though all who heard them
were perfectly convinced of their impracticableness. This
feeling induced him to cause his own men to keep open
the communication; and scarce a day passed in which he
did not visit the poor unfortunate craft. Nor was the place
without an interest of a very peculiar sort. It has been
said that the fragments of ice, some of which were more
than a hundred feet in diameter, and all of which were
eight or ten feet in thickness, had been left on their edges,
inclining in a way to form caverns that extended a great
distance. Now, it so happened, that just around the wreck
the cakes were so distributed as to intercept the first snows
which filled the outer passages, got to be hardened, and
covered anew by fresh storms, thus interposed an effectual
barrier to the admission of any more of the frozen element
within the ice. The effect was to form a vast range of
natural galleries amid the cakes, that were quite clear of
any snow but that which had adhered to their surfaces, and
which offered little or no impediment to motion  nay,
which rather aided it, by rendering the walking less
slippery
.
As the deck of the schooner had been cleared,
leaving an easy access to all its entrances, cabin, hold, and
forecastle, this put the Vineyard Lion under cover, while
it admitted of all her accommodations being used. A
pontion
of her wood had been left in her, it will be remembered,
as well as her camboose. The last was got into the cabin,
and Daggett, attended by two or three of his hands, would
pass a good deal of his time there. One reason given for
this distribution of the forces, was the greater room it
allowed those who remained at the hut for motion. The
deck of this vessel being quite clear, it offered a very
favourable spot for exercise; better, in fact, than the
terrace
beneath the hut, being quite sheltered from the winds,
and much warmer than it had been originally, or ever since
the heavy fall of snows commenced. Daggett paced his
quarter-deck hour after hour, almost deluding himself with
the expectation of sailing for home as soon as the return
of summer would permit him to depart.
Around the hut the snow early made vast embankments.
Every one accustomed to the action of this particular
condition
of one of the great elements, will understand that a
bend in the rocks outward, or a curve inward, must
necessarily
affect the manner in which these banks were formed.
The wind did not, by any means, blow from any one point
of the compass; though the south-western cliffs might be
almost termed the weather-side of the island, so much more
frequently did the gales come from that quarter than from
any other. The cape where the cove lay, and where the
house had been set up, being at the north-eastern point,
and much protected by the high table-land in its rear, it
occupied the warmest situation in the whole region. The
winds that swept most of the north shore, but which, owing
to a curvature in its formation, did not often blow home to
the hut, even when they whistled along the terrace only a
hundred feet beneath and more salient, were ordinarily
from the south-west outside; though they got a more
westerly
inclination by following the land under the cliffs.
A bank of snow may be either a cause of destruction or
a source of comfort. Of course, a certain degree of cold
must exist wherever snow is to be found; but, unless in
absolute contact with the human body, it does not usually
affect the system beyond a certain point. On the other
hand, it often breaks the wind, and it has been known to
form a covering to flocks, houses, &c., that has contributed
essentially to their warmth. We incline to the opinion that
if one slept in a cavern formed in the snow, provided he
could keep himself dry, and did not come in absolute
contact
with the element, he would not find his quarters very
uncomfortable, so long as he had sufficient clothing to
confine
the animal warmth near his person. Now, our sealers
enjoyed some such advantage as this; though not literally
in the same degree. Their house was not covered with
snow, though a vast bank was already formed quite near it,
Vol. II.  11
and a good deal had begun to pile against the tent.
Singular
as it may seem, on the east end of the building, and
on the south front, which looked in towards the cliff next
the cove, there was scarcely any snow at all. This was in
part owing to the constant use of the shovel and broom,
but more so to the currents of air, which usually carried
everything of so light a nature as a flake to more quiet
spots, before it was suffered to settle on the ground.
Roswell early found, what his experience as an
American
might have taught him, that the
melting
of the snow,
in consequence of the warmth of the fires, caused much
more inconvenience than the snow itself. The latter, when
dry, was easily got along with; but, when melted in the
day, and converted into icicles at night, it became a most
unpleasant and not altogether a safe neighbour; inasmuch
as there was really danger from the sort of damp atmosphere
it produced.
The greatest ground of Roswell Gardiner's
apprehensions
,
however, was for the supply of fuel. Much of that
brought from home had been fairly used in the camboose,
and in the stove originally set up in the hut. Large as that
stock had been, a very sensible inroad had been made upon
it; and, according to a calculation he had made, the wood
regularly laid in would not hold out much more than half
the time that it would be indispensable to remain on the
island. This was a grave circumstance, and one that
demanded
very serious consideration. Without fuel it would
be impossible to survive; no hardening process being
sufficient
to fortify the human frame to a degree that would
resist the influence of an antarctic winter.
From the moment it was probable the party would be
obliged to pass the winter at Sealer's Land, therefore,
Roswell
had kept a vigilant eye on the wood. Stimson had,
more than once, spoken to him on the subject, and with
great prudence.
Warmth must be kept among us, said the old
boat-steerer
,
or there will be no hope for the stoutest man in
either crew. We've a pretty good stock of coffee, and
that is better, any day, than all the rum and whiskey that
was ever distilled. Good hot coffee of a morning will put
life into us the coldest day that ever come out of either
pole; and they do say the south is colder than the north,
though I never could understand why it should be so.
You surely understand the reason why it grows warmer
as we approach the equator, and colder as we go from it,
whether we go north or south?
Stimson assented; though had the truth been said, he
would have been obliged to confess that he knew no more
than the facts.
All sailors know sich things, Captain Gar'ner; though
they know it with very different degrees of exper'ence.
But few get as far south as I have been, to pass a winter.
A good pot of hot coffee of a morning will go as far as a
second pee-jacket, if a man has to go out into the open air
when the weather is at the hardest.
Luckily, our small stores are quite abundant, and we
are better off for coffee and sugar than for anything else.
I laid in of both liberally when we were at Rio.
Yes, Rio is a good place for the articles. But coffee
must be
hot
to do a fellow much good in one of these
high-latitude
winters; and to be hot there must be fuel to heat
it.
I am afraid the wood will not hold out much more
than half the time we shall be here. Fortunately, we had
a large supply; but the other schooner was by no means
as well furnished with fuel as she ought to have been for
such a voyage.
Well, sir, I suppose you know what must be done next
in such a case. Without
warm
food, men can no more live
through one of these winters, than they can live without
food at all. If the Vineyard craft has no proper fuel aboard
her, we must make fuel of her.
Roswell regarded Stephen with fixed attention for some
time. The idea was presented to his mind for the second
time, and he greatly liked it.
That might do, he said; though it will not be an
easy matter to make Captain Dagget consent to such a
thing.
Let him go two or three mornings without his warm
meal and hot coffee, answered Stimson, shaking his head,
and he will be glad enough to come into the scheme. A
man soon gets willing to set fire to anything that will burn
in such a climate. A notion has been floating about in my
mind, Captain Gar'ner, that I've several times thought I
would mention to you. D'ye think, sir, any benefit could
be made of that volcano over the bay, should the worst get
to the worst with us?
I have thought of the same thing, Stephen; though I
fear in vain. I suppose no useful heat can be given out
there, until one gets too near the bad air to breathe it.
What you say about breaking up the other schooner,
however
,
is worthy of consideration; and I will speak to
Captain
Daggett about it.
Roswell was as good as his word; and the Vineyard
mariner met the proposal as one repels an injury. Never
were our two masters so near a serious misunderstanding,
as when Roswell suggested to Daggett the expediency of
breaking up the wreck, now that the weather was
endurarable
,
and the men could work with reasonable comfort
and tolerable advantage.
The man who puts an axe or a saw into that
unfortunate
craft, said Daggett, firmly, I shall regard as an
enemy. It is a hard enough bed that she lies on, without
having her ribs and sides torn to pieces by hands.
This was the strange spirit in which Daggett continued
to look at the condition of the wreck! It was true that the
ice prevented his actually seeing the impossibility of his
ever getting his schooner into the water again; but no man
at all acquainted with mechanics, and who knew the paucity
of means that existed on the island, could for a moment
entertain the idle expectation that seemed to have got into
the Vineyard-master's mind, unless subject to a species of
one-idea infatuation. This infatuation, however, existed
not only in Daggett's mind, but in some degree in those
of his men. It is said that in a multitude of counsellors
there is wisdom; and the axiom comes from an authority
too venerable to be disputed. But it might, almost with
equal justice, be said, that in a multitude of counsellors
there is folly; for men are quite as apt to sustain each
other in the wrong as in the right. The individual who
would hesitate about advancing his fallacies and mistakes
with a single voice, does not scruple to proclaim them on
the hill-tops, when he finds other tongues to repeat his
errors. Divine wisdom, foreseeing this conseqence of
human weakness, has provided a church-catholic, and
proceeding
directly from its Great Head on earth, as the
repository
of those principles, facts, and laws, that it has deemed
essential to the furtherance of its own scheme of moral
government on earth; and yet we see audacious imitators
starting up on every side, presuming in their ignorance,
longing in their ambition, and envious in these longings,
who do not scruple to shout out upon the house-tops
crudities over which knowledge wonders as it smiles, and
humility weeps as it wonders. Such is man, when sustained
by his fellows, in every interest of life; from religion, the
highest of all, down to the most insignificant of his
temporal
concerns.
In this spirit did Daggett and his crew now feel and act.
Roswell had early seen, with regret, that something like a
feeling of party was getting up among the Vineyarders,
who had all along regarded the better fortune of their
neighbours with an ill-concealed jealousy. Ever since the
shipwreck, however, this rivalry had taken a new and even
less pleasant aspect. It was slightly hostile, and remarks
had been occasionally made that sounded equivocally; as
if the Vineyarders had an intention of separating from the
other crew, and of living by themselves. It is probable,
however, that all this was the fruit of disappointment; and
that, at the bottom, nothing very serious was in
contemplation
.
Daggett had permitted his people to aid in
transporting
most of the stores to the house; though a considerable
supply had been left in the wreck. This last arrangement
was made seemingly without any hostile design, but rather
in furtherance of a plan to pass as much time as
circumstances
would allow, on board the stranded vessel. There
was, in truth, a certain convenience in this scheme, that
commended it to the good sense of all. So long as any
portion of the Vineyarders could be made comfortable in
the wreck, it was best they should remain there; for it
saved the labour of transporting all the provisions, and
made more room to circulate in and about the house. The
necessity of putting so many casks, barrels and boxes
within
doors, had materially circumscribed the limits; and space
11*
was a great desideratum for several reasons, health in
particular
.
Roswell was glad, therefore, when any of the Vineyarders
expressed a wish to go to the wreck, and to pass a few days
there. With a view to encourage this disposition, as well
as to ascertain how those fared who chose that abode, he
paid Daggett a visit, and passed a night or two himself in
the cabin of the craft. This experiment told him that it
was very possible to exist there when the thermometer stood
at zero; but, how it would do when ranging a great deal
lower, he had his doubts. The cabin was small, and a very
moderate fire in the camboose served to keep it reasonably
warm; though Daggett, at all times a reasonable and
reasoning
man, when the root of all evil did not sorely
beset
him, came fully into his own views as to the necessity
of husbanding the fuel, and of hardening the men. None
of that close stewing over stoves, which is so common in
America, and which causes one-half of the winter diseases
of the climate, was tolerated in either gang. Daggett saw
the prudence of Roswell's, or rather of Stimson's system,
and fell into it freely, and with hearty good-will. It was
during Gardiner's visit to the wreck that our two masters
talked over their plans for the winter, while taking their
exercise on the schooner's deck, each well muffled up, to
prevent the frost from taking hold of the more exposed
parts. Every one had a seal-skin cap, made in a way to
protect the ears and most of the face; and our two masters
were thus provided, in common with their men.
I suppose that we are to consider this as pleasant
winter
weather, Roswell remarked, the thermometer being
down only at zero. Stimson tells me that even at Orange
Harbour, the season he was there, they paid out mercury
until it all got into the ball. A month or two hence, we
may look out for the season of frosts, as the Injins call it.
You will hardly think of staying out here, when the really
hard weather sets in.
I do not believe we shall feel the cold much more than
we do now. This daily washing is a capital stove; for I
find all hands say that, when it is once over, they feel like
new men. As for me, I shall stick by my craft while there
is a timber left in her to float!
Roswell thought how absurd it was to cling thus to a
useless mass of wood, and iron, and copper; but he said
nothing on that subject.
I am now sorry that we took over to the house so many
of our supplies, Daggett continued, after a short pause.
I am afraid that many of them will have to be brought
back again.
That would hardly quit cost, Daggett; it would be
better to come over and pass the heel of the winter with
us, when the supplies get to be short here. As we eat, we
make room in the hut, you know; and you will be so much
the more comfortable. An empty pork-barrel was broken
up for the camboose yesterday morning.
We shall see  we shall see, Gar'ner. My men have
got a notion that your people intend to break up this
schooner for fuel, should they not keep an anchor-watch
aboard her.
Anchor-watch! repeated Roswell, smiling. It is
well namedif there ever was an anchor-watch, you keep
it here; for no ground-tackle will ever hold like this.
We still think the schooner may be got off, Daggett
said, regarding his companion inquiringly.
While the Vineyard-man had a certain distrust of his
brother-master, he had also a high respect for his
fair-dealing
propensities, and a strong disposition to put confidence
in his good faith. The look that he now gave was, if
possible
,
to read the real opinion of the other, in a countenance
that seldom deceived.
I shall be grateful to God, Captain Daggett, returned
Roswell, after a short pause, if we get through the long
winter of this latitude, without burning too much of
both
craft, than will be for our good. Surely it were better to
begin on that which is in the least serviceable condition?
I have thought this matter over, Gar'ner, with all my
mindhave dreamt of itslept on ithad it before me at
all hours, and in all weathers; and, look at it as I will, it
is full of difficulties. Will you agree to take in a half-cargo
of my skins and iles next season, and make in all respects
a joint v'y'ge of it, from home, home ag'in, if we'll consent
to let this craft be burned?
It exceeds my power to make any such bargain. I
have an owner who looks sharply after his property, and
my crew are upon lays, like the people of all sealers. You
ask too much; and you forget that, should I assume the
same power over my own craft, as you still claim in this
wreck, you might never find the means of getting away
from the group at all. We are not obliged to receive you
on board our schooner.
I know you think, Gar'ner, that it will be impossible
for us ever to get our craft off; but you overlook one thing
that we may dowhat is there to prevent our breaking her
up, and of using the materials to make a smaller vessel;
one of sixty tons say  in which we might get home,
besides
taking most of our skins?
I will not say
that
will be impossible; but I do say it
will be very difficult. It would be wiser for you, in my
judgment, to leave your cargo in the house, under the
keeping of a few hands if you see fit, and go off with me.
I will land you at Rio, where you can almost always find
some small American craft to come south in, and pick up
your leavings. If you choose that the men left behind
should amuse themselves in your absence, by building a
small craft, I am certain they will meet with no opposition
from me. There is but one place where a vessel can be
launched, and that is the spot in the cove where we beached
your schooner. There it might possibly be done, though
I think not without a great deal of trouble, and possibly not
without more means than are to be picked up along shore
in this group. But there is a very important fact that you
overlook, Daggett, which it may be as well to mention
here, as to delay it.
Your
craft, or
mine
, must be used as
fuel this winter, or we shall freeze to death to a man. I
have made the calculations closely; and, certain as our
existence, there is no alternative between such a death and
the use of the fuel I have mentioned.
Not a timber of mine shall be touched. I do not
believe
one-half of these stories about the antarctic winter,
which cannot be much worse than what a body meets with
up in the Bay of Fundy.
A winter in the Bay of Fundy, without fuel, must be
bad enough; but it is a mere circumstance to one here. I
should think that a man who has tasted an antarctic
sum
mer
and
autumn
, must get a pretty lively notion of what is
to come after them.
The men can keep in their berths much of the time,
and save wood. There are many other ways of getting
through a winter than burning a vessel. I shall never
consent
to a stick of this good craft's going into the galley-fire
as long as I can see my way clear to prevent it. I would
burn
cargo
before I would burn my
craft
.
Roswell wondered at this pertinacity; but he trusted to
the pressure of the coming season, and changed the subject.
Certainly the thought of breaking up his own craft did not
cross his mind; though he could see no sufficient objection
to the other side of the proposition. As discussion was
useless
,
however, he continued to converse with Daggett on
various practical subjects, on which his companion was
rational and disposed to learn.
It had been ascertained by experiment that the water,
at a considerable depth, was essentially warmer beneath the
ice, than at its surface. A plan had been devised by which
the lower currents of the water could be pumped up for the
purposes of the bath; thus rendering the process far more
tolerable than it had previously been. Bathing in extremely
cold weather, however, is not as formidable a thing as is
generally supposed, the air being at a lower temperature
than the water. As the greatest importance was attached
to these daily ablutions, the subject was gone over between
the two masters in all its bearings. There were no
conveniences
for the operation at the wreck; and this was one
reason why Roswell suggested that a residence there ought
to be abandoned. Daggett dissented, and invited his
companion
to take a walk in his caverns.
A promenade in a succession of caves formed of ice,
with the thermometer at zero, would naturally strike one
as a somewhat chilling amusement. Gardiner did not find
it so. He was quite protected from the wind, which gives
so much pungency to bitter cold, rendering it
insupportable
.
Completely protected from this, and warmed by the
exertion of clambering among the cakes, Roswell's blood
was soon in a healthful glow; and, to own the truth, when
he left the wreck, it was with a much better opinion of it,
as a place of residence, than when he had arrived to pay
his visit.
As there was now nothing for the men to do in the way
of preparation, modes of amusement were devised that
might unite activity of body with that of the mind. The
snows ceased to fall as the season advanced; and there
were but few places on which heavy burthens might not
have been transported over their crusts. It was, indeed,
easier moving about on the surface of the frozen snow,
than it had been on the naked rocks; the latter offering
obstacles that no longer showed themselves. Sliding down
the declivities, and even skating, were practised; few
northern Americans being ignorant of the latter art.
Various
other sources of amusement were resorted to; but it
was found, generally, that very little exercise in the open
air exhausted the frame, and that a great difficulty of
breathing occurred. Still, it was thought necessary to
health that the men should remain as much as possible out
of the crowded house; and various projects were adopted
to keep up the vital warmth while exposed. Ere the month
of July had passed, which corresponds to our January, it
had been found expedient to make dresses of skins; for
which fortunately the materials abounded.
As the season advanced, the idea of preserving more
than the lives of his men was gradually abandoned by
Gardiner
;
though Daggett still clung to his wreck, and actually
had wood transported back to it, that he might stay as much
as possible near his property. There was no longer any
thawing, though there were very material gradations in the
intensity of the frosts. Occasionally, it was quite possible
to remain in the open air an hour or two at a time; then,
again, there were days in which it exceeded the powers of
human endurance to remain more than a few minutes
removed
to any distance from heat artificially procured. On
the whole, however, it was found that the comparatively
moderate weather predominated; and it was rare indeed
that all the people did not pursue their avocations and
amusements outside, at what was called the middle of the
day.
And what a meridian it was! The shortest day had
passed some time, when Roswell and Stimson were
walking
together on the terrace, then, as usual, as clear from
snow as if swept by a broom; but otherwise wearing the
aspect of interminable winter, in common with all around
it. They were conversing, as had been much their wont
of late, and were watching the passage of the sun as he
stole along the northern horizon; even at high noon rising
but a very few degrees above it!
It has a cold look, sir, but it does give out some heat,
said Stephen, as he faced the luminary, in one of his turns.
I can feel a little warmth from it just now, sheltered as
we are here under the cliffs, and with a back-ground of
naked rock to throw back what reaches us. To me, all
these changes in the movements of the sun seem very
strange, Captain Gar'ner; but I know I'm ignorant, and
that others may well know all about what I do not
understand
.
Here Gardiner undertook to explain the phenomena that
have been slightly treated on in our own pages. There are
few Americans so ignorant as not to be fully aware that the
sun has no sensible motion, or any motion that has an
apparent
influence on our own planet; but fewer still clearly
comprehend the reasons of those very changes that are
occurring
constantly before their eyes. We cannot say that
Captain Gardiner succeeded very well in his undertaking,
though he imprinted on the old boat-steerer's mind the
fact that the sun would not be seen at all were they only a
few degrees farther south than they actually were.
And now, sir, I suppose he'll get higher and higher
every day, put in Stephen, until he comes quite up above
our heads?
Not exactly that at noon; though abeam, as it might
be, mornings and evenings.
Still, the coldest of our weather is yet to come, or I
have no exper'ence in such things. Why does not the heat
come back with the sun  or what seems to be the sun
coming back? though, as you tell me, Captain Gar'ner,
it's only the'arth sheering this-a-way and that-a-way in her
course.
One may well ask such a questionbut cold produces
cold, and it takes time to wear it out. February is
commonly
the coldest month in the year, even in America;
though days occur in other months that may be colder than
any one in February. March, and even April, are months
I dread here; and that so much the more, Stephen, because
our fuel goes a good deal faster than I could wish.
What you say is very true, sir. Still, the people must
have fire. I turned out this morning, while all hands were
still in their berths, and looked to the stove, and it was as
much as human natur' could bear to be about without my
cap and skin-covering; though in-doors the whole time.
If the weather goes on as it has begun, we shall have to
keep a watch at the stove; nor do I think one stove will
answer us much longer. We shall want another in the
sleeping-room.
Heaven knows where the wood is to come from!
Unless
Captain Daggett gives up the wreck, we shall certainly
be out long before the mild season returns.
We must keep ourselves warm, sir, by reading the
bible, answered Stimson, smiling; though the glance he
cast at his officer was earnest and anxious. You must
not forget, Captain Gar'ner, that you've promised one who
is praying for you daily, to go through the chapters she has
marked, and give the matter a patient and attentive thought.
No sealin', sir, can be half as important as this reading of
the good book in the right spirit.
So you believe that Jesus was the Son of God!
exclaimed
Roswell, half inquiringly, and half in a modified
sort of levity.
As much as I believe that we are here, sir. I wish I
was half as certain of our ever getting away.
What has caused you to believe this, Stimson?
reason
,
or the talk of your mother and of the parson?
My mother died afore I could listen to her talk, sir:
and very little have I had to do with parsons, for the want
of being where they are to be found.
Faith
tells me to
believe this; and Faith comes from God.
And I could believe it, too, were Faith imparted to me
from the same source. As it is, I fear I shall never believe
in what appears to me to be an impossibility.
Then followed a long discussion, in which ingenuity,
considerable
command of language, human pride and worldly
sentiments, contended with that clear, intuitive, deep
conviction
,
which it is the pleasure of the Deity often to bestow
on those who would otherwise seem to be unfitted to
become
the repositories of so great a gift. As we shall have
to deal with this part of our subject more particularly
hereafter
,
we shall not enlarge on it here; but pursue the
narrative
as it is connected with the advance of the season,
and the influence the latter exerted over the whole party
of the lost sealers.
CHAPTER X.
Beyond the Jewish ruler, banded close;
A company full glorious, I saw
The twelve apostles stand. O, with what looks
Of ravishment and joy, what rapturous tears;
What hearts of eestacy, they gazed again
On their beloved Master_____
Hillhouse's Judgment
.
It
has become necessary to advance the season to the
beginning of the month of October, which corresponds to
our own April. In a temperate climate, this would mark
the opening of spring; and the reviving hopes of a new and
genial season would find a place in every bosom. Not so
at Sealer's Land. So long as the winter was at its height,
and the clear, steady cold continued, by falling into a
system
so prepared as to meet the wants of such a region,
matters had gone on regularly, if not with comfort; and,
as yet, the personal disasters were confined to a few frozen
cheeks and noses, the results of carelessness and wanton
exposure, rather than of absolute necessity. But one who
had seen the place in July, and who examined it now,
would find many marks of change, not to say of
deterioration
.
In the first place, a vast deal of snow had fallen; fallen,
indeed, to such a degree, as even to cover the terrace,
block up the path that communicated with the wreck, and
nearly to smother the house and all around it. The winds
were high and piercing, rendering the cold doubly
penetrating
.
Vol. II.  12
The thermometer now varied essentially,
sometimes
rising considerably above zero, though oftener falling
far below it. There had been many storms in September,
and October was opening with a most blustering and wintry
aspect. In one sense, however, the character of the season
had changed; the dry, equal cold, that was generally
supportable
,
having been succeeded by tempests that were
sometimes a little moist, but oftener of intense frigidity.
Of course the equinox was past, and there were more than
twelve hours of sun. The great luminary showed himself
well above the northern horizon; and though his circuit
described an arch that did not promise soon to bring him
near the zenith at meridian, it was a circuit that seemed
about to enclose Sealer's Land, by carrying the orb of day
so far south, morning and evening, as to give it an air of
travelling round the spot.
These changes had not occurred without suffering and
danger. Enormous icicles were suspended from the roof
of the house, reaching to the ground, the third and fourth
successions of these signs of heat and cold united, the
earlier formations having been knocked down and thrown
away. Mountains of drifted snow were to be seen in places,
all along the shore; and wreaths that threatened fearful
avalanches were suspended from the cliffs, waiting only for
the increase of the warmth, to come down upon the rocks
beneath. Once already had one of these masses fallen on
the wreck; and the Oyster Pond men had been busy for a
week digging into the pile, in order to go to the rescue of
the Vineyarders. There was much generosity and
charitable
feeling displayed in this act; for, owing to the obstinate
adherence of Daggett and his people to what they deemed
their rights, Roswell had finally been compelled to cut to
pieces the upper works of his own schooner to obtain fuel
that might prevent his own party from freezing to death.
The position of the Sea Lion of Oyster Pond was to be
traced only by a high mound of snow, which had been
arrested by the obstacle she presented to its drift; but her
bulwarks, planks, deck, top-timbers, stern-framein short,
nearly all of the vessel above water, had actually been taken
to pieces, and carried within the covering of the verandah
mentioned, in readiness for the stoves!
To render the obstinacy of the other crew more
apparent
,
Daggett had been obliged to do the same! Much of
his beloved craft had already disappeared in the camboose,
and more was likely to follow. This compelled destruction,
however, rather increased than lessened his pertinacity.
He clung to the last chip; and no terms of compromise
would he now listen to at all. The stranded wreck was
his, and his people's; while the other wreck belonged to
the men from Oyster Pond. Let each party act for itself,
and take care of its own. Such were his expressed opinions,
and on them he acted.
This state of things had not been brought about in a
day. Months had passed; Roswell had seen his last billet
of wood put in the camboose; had tried various experiments
for producing heat by means of oil, which so far succeeded
as to enable the ordinary boiling to be done, thereby saving
wood; but, when a cold turn set in, it was quickly found
that the schooner must go, or all hands perish. When this
decree went forth, every one understood that the final
preservation
of the party depended on that of the boats. For
one entire day the question had been up in general council,
whether or not the two whale-boats should be burnt, with
their oars and appurtenances, before the attack was made
on the schooner itself. Stimson settled this point, as he
did so many others, Roswell listening to all he said with a
constantly increasing attention.
If we burn the boats first, said the boat-steerer, and
then have to come to the schooner a'ter all, how are we
ever to get away from this group? Them boats wouldn't
last us a week, even in our best weather; but they may
answer to take us to some Christian land, when every rib
and splinter of the Sea Lion is turned into ashes. I would
begin on the upper works of the schooner first, Captain
Gar'ner, resarvin' the spars, though they would burn the
freest. Then I would saw away the top-timbers, beams,
decks, transoms, and everything down within a foot of the
water; but I wouldn't touch anything below the copper,
for this here reason: unless Captain Daggett sets to work
on his craft and burns her up altogether, we may find
mater'als enough in the spring to deck over ag'in the poor
thing down there in the cove, and fit her out a'ter a fashion,
and make much better weather of it in her than in our
boats. That's my opinion, sir.
It was decided that this line of conduct should be
pursued
.
The upper works of the schooner were all taken out
of her as soon as the weather permitted, and the wood was
carried up and stored in the house. Even with this supply;
it was soon seen that great economy was to be used, and
that there might be the necessity of getting at the vessel's
bottom. As for the schooner, as the people still
affectionately
called the hull, or what was left of the hull, everything
had been taken out of her. The frozen oil was carried up
to the house in chunks, and used for fuel and lights. A
good deal of heat was obtained by making large wicks of
canvass, and placing them in vessels that contained oil;
though it was very far from sufficing to keep life in the
men during the hardest of the weather. The utmost
economy in the use of the fuel that had been so dearly
obtained
,
was still deemed all-essential to eventual
preservation
.
Happily, the season advanced all this time, and the
month of October was reached. The intercourse between
the crews had by no means been great during the two
solemn
and critical months that were just past. A few visits
had been exchanged at noon-day, and when the
thermometer
was a little above zero; but the snow was filling the
path, and as yet there were no thaws to produce a crust on
which the men might walk.
About a month previously to the precise time to which
it is our intention now to advance the more regular action
of the legend, Macy had come over to the house, attended
by one man, with a proposal on the part of Daggett for the
two crews to occupy his craft, as he still persisted in calling
the wreck, and of using the house as fuel. This was
previously
to beginning to break up either vessel. Gardiner
had thought of this plan in connection with his own
schooner, a scheme that would have been much more
feasible
than that now proposed, on account of the difference
in distance; but it had soon been abandoned. All the
material of the building was of pine, and that well
seasoned
;
a wood that burns like tinder. No doubt there would
have been a tolerably comfortable fortnight or three weeks
by making these sacrifices; then would have come certain
destruction.
As to the proposal of Daggett, there were many
objections
to it. A want of room would be one; want of
provisions
another; and there would be the necessity of
transporting
stores, bedding, and a hundred things that were
almost as necessary to the people as warmth; and which
indeed contributed largely to their warmth. In addition
was the objection just mentioned, of the insufficiency of
the materials of the building; an objection which was just
as applicable to a residence in one vessel as a residence in
the other. Of course the proposition was declined.
Macy remained a night with the Oyster Ponders, and
left the house after breakfast next morning; knowing that
Daggett only waited for his return with a negative, to
commence
breaking up the wreck. The mate was attended by
the seaman, returning as he had arrived. Two days later;
there having been a slight yielding of the snow under the
warmth of the noon-day sun; and a consequent hardening
of its crust in the succeeding night, Roswell and Stimson
undertook to return this visit, with a view to make a last
effort to persuade Daggett to quit the wreck and come over
to the house altogether. When they had got about
half-way
between the two places, they found the body of the
seaman, stiff, frozen hard, and dead. A quarter of a mile
further on, the reckless Macy, who it was supposed greatly
sustained Daggett in his obstinacy, was found in precisely
the same state. Both had fallen in the path, and stiffened
under the terrible power of the climate. It was not
without
difficulty that Roswell reached the wreck, and reported
what he had seen. Even this terrible admonition did not
change Daggett's purpose. He had begun to burn his
vessel, for there was now no alternative; but he was doing
it on a system which, as he explained it to Roswell, was
not only to leave him materials with which to construct a
smaller craft in the spring, but which would allow of his
inhabiting the steerage and cabin as long as he pleased.
In some respects the wreck certainly had its advantages
over the house. There was more room for exercise, the
caverns of the ice being extensive, while they completely
excluded the wind, which was now the great danger of the
12*
season. It was doubtless owing to the wind that Macy and
his companion had perished. As the spring approached,
these winds increased in violence; though there had been
slight symptoms of their coming more blandly, even at the
time when their colder currents were really frightful.
A whole month succeeded this visit of Roswell's, during
which there was no intercourse. It was September, the
March of the antarctic circle, and the weather had been
terrific during most of the period. It was during these
terrible four weeks that Roswell completed his examination
of the all-important subject Mary had marked out for him,
and which Stimson had so earnestly and so often placed
before his mind. The sudden fate of Macy and his
companion
,
the condition of his crew, and all the serious
circumstances
with which he was surrounded, conspired to
predispose him to inquiry; and what was equally important
in such an investigation, to humility. Man is a very
different
being in high prosperity from what he becomes when
the blows of an evil fortune, or the visitations of Divine
Providence alight upon him. The skepticism of Roswell
was more the result of human pride, of confidence in
himself
,
than in any precept derived from others, or of any
deep reasoning process whatever. He conceived that the
theory of the incarnation of the Son of God was opposed
to philosophy and experience, it is true; and, thus far, he
may be said to have reasoned in the matter, though it was
in his own way, and with a very contracted view of the
subject; but pride had much more to do with even this
conclusion, than a knowledge of physics or philosophy. It
did not comport with the respect he entertained for his
own powers, to lend his faith to an account that conflicted
with so many of the opinions he had formed on evidence
and practice. Credulous women might have their
convictions
on the truth of this history, but it was not necessary
for men to be as easily duped. There was something even
amiable and attractive in this weakness of the other sex,
that would ill comport, however, with the greater sternness
of masculine judgment. Roswell, as he once told Stimson,
hesitated to believe in anything that he could not
comprehend
.
His God must be worshipped for the obvious truth
of his attributes and existence. He wished to speak with
respect of things that so many worthy people reverenced;
but he could not forget that Providence had made him a
reasoning creature; and his reason must be convinced.
Stephen was no great logician, as the reader will easily
understand; but Newton possessed no clearer
demonstration
of any of his problems than this simple, nay ignorant,
man enjoyed in his religious faith, through the divine
illumination
it had received in the visit of the Holy Spirit.
That gloomy month, however, had not been thrown away.
All the men were disposed to be serious; and the reading
of the bible, openly and aloud, soon became a favourite
occupation with every one of them. Although Roswell's
reading was directed by the marks of Mary, all of which
had reference to those passages that touched on the Divinity
of the Saviour, he made no comments that betrayed his
incredulity
.
There is a simple earnestness in the narrative
portions of the Gospel that commends its truth to every
mind, and it had its effect on that of Roswell Gardiner;
though it failed to remove doubts that had so long been
cherished, and which had their existence in pride of
reason
,
or what passes for such, with those who merely skim
the surface of things, as they seem to exist around them.
On the evening of that particular day in October, to
which we desire now to advance the time, and after the
most pleasant and cheerful afternoon and sunset that any
on the island had seen for many months, Roswell and
Stimson
ventured to continue their exercise on the terrace, then
again clear of impediments, even after the day had closed.
The night promised to be cold, but the weather was not
yet so keen as to drive them to a shelter. Both fancied
there was a feeling of spring in the wind, which was from
the north-east, a quarter that brought the blandest currents
of air into those seas, if any air of that region deserved
such a term at all.
It is high time we had some communications with the
Vineyarders, said Roswell, as they turned at that end of
the terrace which was nearest to the wreck. A full month
has passed since we have seen any of them, or have heard
a syllable of their doings or welfare.
It's a bad business this separation, Captain Gar'ner,
returned the boat-steerer; and every hour makes it worse.
Think how much good might have been done them young
men had they only been with us while we've been reading
the book of books, night and morning, sir!
That good book seems to fill most of your thoughts,
StephenI wish I could have your faith.
It will come in time, sir, if you will only strive for it.
I'm sure no heart could have been harder than mine was,
until within the last five years. I was far worse as a
Christian
,
Captain Gar'ner, than I consider you to be; for while
you have doubts consarning the Divinity of our Blessed
Lord, I had no thought of any one of the Trinity. My
only God was the world; and sich a world, too, as a poor
sailor knows. It was being but little better than the
brutes.
Of all the men with me, you seem to be the most
contented
and happy. I cannot say I have seen even a sign
of fear about you, when things have been at the worst.
It would be very ungrateful, sir, to mistrust a
Providence
that has done so much for me.
I devoutly wish I could believe with you that Jesus was
the Son of God!
Excuse me, Captain Gar'ner; it's jist because you do
not
devoutly
wish this, that you do not believe. I think I
understand the natur' of your feelin's, sir. I had some
sich once, myself; though it was only in a small way. I
was too ignorant to feel much pride in my own judgment,
and soon gave up every notion that went ag'in Scriptur'.
I own it is not accordin' to natur', as we know natur', to
believe in this doctrine; but we know too little of a
thousand
things to set up our weak judgments in the very face
of revelation.
I am quite willing to believe all I can understand,
Stephen; but I find it difficult to credit accounts that are
irreconcilable with all that my experience has taught me to
be true.
They who are of your way of thinkin', sir, do not deny
that Christ was a good man and a prophet; and that the
apostles were good men and prophets; and that they all
worked miracles.
This much I am willing enough to believe; but the
other doctrine seems contrary to what is possible.
Yet you have seen, sir, that these apostles believed
what you refuse. One thing has crossed my mind, Captain
Gar'ner, which I wish to say to you. I know I'm but an
ignorant man, and my idees may be hardly worth your
notice
;
but sich as they be, I want to lay 'em afore you. We
are told that these apostles were all men from a humble
class in life, with little l'arnin', chosen, as it might be, to
show men that faith stood in need of no riches, or
edication
,
or worldly greatness, of any sort. To me, sir, there
is a wholesome idee in that one thing.
It gives us all a useful lesson, Stephen, and has often
been mentioned, I believe, in connection with the doctrines
of Christianity.
Yes, sirso I should think; though I don't remember
ever to have heard it named from any pulpit. Well,
Captain
Gar'ner, it does not agree with our notions to suppose
that God himself, a part of the Ruler and Master of the
Universe, should be born of a woman, and come among
sinners in order to save 'em from his own just judgments.
That is just the difficulty that I have in believing what
are called the dogmas of Christianity on that one point.
To me, it has ever seemed the most improbable thing in
the world.
Just so, sir  I had some sort of feelin of that natur'
myself once. When God, in his goodness, put it into my
heart to believe, however, as he was pleased to do in a fit
of sickness from which I never expected to rise, and in
which I was led to pray to him for assistance, I began to
think over all these matters in my own foolish manner.
Among other things, I said to myself, `is it likely that any
mortal man would dream of calling Christ the Son of God,
unless it was put into
his
mind to say so?' Then comes
the characters of them men, who all admit were upright
and religious. How can we suppose that they would agree
in giving the same account of sich a thing, unless what
they said had been told to them by some tongue that they
believed?
Roswell smiled at Stephen's reasoning, which was not
without a certain point, but which an ingenious man might
find the means of answering in various ways.
There is another thing, sir, that I've read in a book,
resumed the boat-steerer, which goes a great way with
me. Jesus allowed others to call him the Son of God,
without rebuking them for doing so. It does really seem
that they who believe he was a good man, as I understand
is the case with you, Captain Gar'ner, must consider this
as a strong fact. We are to remember what a sin idolatry
is; how much all ra'al worshippers abhor it; and then set
that feelin' side by side with the fact that the Son did not
think it robbery to be called the equal of the Father. To
me, that looks like a proof that our belief has a solid
foundation
.
Roswell did not reply. He was aware that it would not
be just to hold any creed responsible for the manner in
which a person like Stimson defended it. Still, he was
struck with both of this man's facts. The last, he had often
met in books; but the first was new to him. Of the two,
this novel idea of the improbability of the apostles'
inventing
that which would seem to be opposed to all men's
notions
and prejudices, struck him more forcibly than the
argument adduced from the acquiescende of the Redeemer
in his own divinity. The last might be subject to verbal
criticism, and could possibly be explained away, as he
imagined; but the first appeared to be intimately
incorporated
with the entire history of Christ's ministrations on
earth. These were the declarations of John the Baptist,
the simple and unpretending histories of the Gospels, the
commentaries of St. Paul, and the venerable teachings of
the church through so many centuries of varying degrees
of faith and contention, each and all going to corroborate
a doctrine that, in his eyes, had appeared to be so
repugnant
to philosophy and reason. Wishing to be alone,
Roswell
gave an order to Stimson to execute some duty that
fell to his share, and continued walking up and down the
terrace alone for quite an hour longer.
The night was coming in cold and still. It was one of
those last efforts of winter in which all the terrible force
of the season was concentrated: and it really appeared as
if nature, wearied with its struggle to return to a more
genial temperature, yielded in despair, and was literally
returning backwards through the coldest of her months.
The moon was young, but the stars gave forth a brightness
that is rarely seen, except in the clear cold nights of a high
latitude. Each and all of these sublime emblems of the
power of God were twinkling like bright torches glowing
in space; and the mind had only to endow each with its
probable or known dimensions, its conjectural and
reasonable
uses, to form a picture of the truest sublimity in which
man is made to occupy his real position. In this world,
where, in a certain sense, he is master, where all things
are apparently under his influence, if not absolutely subject
to his control; where little that is distinctly visible is to be
met with that does seem to be created to meet his wants,
or to be wholly at his disposal, one gets a mistaken and
frequently a fatal notion of his true place in the scale of
the beings who are intended to throng around the footstool
of the Almighty. As the animalcul of the atmospheric
air bear a proportion to things visible, so would this throng
seem to bear a proportion to our vague estimates of the
spiritual hosts. All this Roswell was very capable of
feeling
,
and in some measure of appreciating; and never
before
had he been made so conscious of his own
insignificance
,
as he became while looking on the firmament that
night, glowing with its bright worlds and suns, doubtless
the centres of other systems in which distance swallowed
up the lesser orbs.
Almost every one has heard or read of that collection
of stars which goes by the name of the Southern Cross.
The resemblance to the tree on which Christ suffered is
not particularly striking, though all who navigate the
southern hemisphere know it, and recognize it by its
imputed
appellation. It now attracted Roswell's gaze; and
coming as it did after so much reading, so many
conversations
with Stephen, and addressing itself to one whose heart
was softened by the fearful circumstances that had so long
environed the sealers, it is not surprising that it brought
our young master to meditate seriously on his true
condition
in connection with the atonement that he was willing
to admit had been made for him, in common with all of
earth, at the very moment he hesitated to believe that the
sufferer was, in any other than a metaphorical sense, the
Son of God.
It is not our intention to describe more of the religious
feelings of Mary and her suitor, or to enter farther into
any disquisition on subjects of this nature, than may be
absolutely necessary to elucidate the facts of our history.
In order to do the last distinctly, however, we shall
endeavour
to make a very brief analysis of the process of
reasoning
,
and we may add of feeling too, that was at work in
Roswell Gardiner's mind and heart, as he paced the terrace
that night, after Stimson had left him.
We suppose that a sense of humility is the first healthful
symptom that shows itself in every man's moral
regeneration
.
A meek appreciation of his own station and character
disposes him to receive revelation with respect, and to have
faith in things that are not seen. Perhaps no one over
whom the sword of fate was not actually suspended by a
hair, was ever better placed to admit the lessons of humility
than was Roswell Gardiner at that very moment. Modest
he always was, in the ordinary acceptation of the term, and
this without professions or grimaces; but he had a high
idea of the human understanding, and revolted at believing
that which did violence to all his experience and
preconceived
opinions. This was the weak spot in his character,
which time, with an increasing knowledge of men and
things, or some merciful teaching of Divine Providence,
could alone remove.
Roswell certainly did not converse with Stimson in the
expectation of being much instructed; but the humble and
uneducated boat-steerer had been at a school that raises
the dullest intellect far above all the inferences of
philosophy
.
He had faith, without which no man is truly wise;
no man learned, in the highest interest of his being. Under
the guidance of this leader, Stephen occasionally threw out
an idea that struck the mind of his officer by its simplicity
and force, and helped to complete that change for which
circumstances, reading, and reflection had now been many
months preparing the way. The day preceding this walk
on the terrace, Roswell observed to Stimson that he had
difficulty in believing in a Deity he could not comprehend;
meaning merely that his reason must be satisfied in a
doctrine
like that of the incarnation.
Well, sir, that's not my feelin', answered Stephen,
earnestly. A Deity I could understand would be no God
for me. Where there is the same knowledge, there is too
much companionship, like, for worship and reverence.
But we are told that man was created after the image
of God.
In his likeness, Captain Gar'ner  with
some
of the
Divine Spirit, but not with all. That makes him different
from the brutes, and immortal. I have convarsed with a
clergyman who thinks that the angels, and archangels, and
other heavenly beings, are far before even the Saints in
Heaven, such as have been only men on 'arth.
The idea of not having a Deity that he could not
comprehend had long been one of Roswell Gardiner's
favourite rules of faith. He did not understand by this
pretending dogma, that he was, in any respect, of capacity
equal to comprehend with that of the Divine Being, but
simply that he was not to be expected or required to
believe
in any theory which manifestly conflicted with his
knowledge and experience, as both were controlled by the
powers of induction he had derived directly from his
Creator. In a word, his exception was one of the most
obvious of the suggestions of the pride of reason, and just
so much in direct opposition to the great law of
regeneration
,
which has its very gist in the converse of this feeling
Faith.
As our young master paced the terrace alone, that idea
of the necessity of the Creator's being incomprehensible to
the created, recurred to him. The hour that succeeded
was probably the most important in Roswell Gardiner's
life. So intense were his feelings, so active the workings
of his mind, that he was quite insensible to the intensity
of the cold; and his body keeping equal motion with his
thoughts, if one may so express it, his frame actually set at
defiance a temperature that might otherwise have chilled it,
warmly and carefully as it was clad.
Truly there were many causes existing at that time and
place, to bring any man to a just sense of his real position
in the scale of created beings. The vault above Roswell
was sparkling with orbs floating in space, most of them far
more vast than this earth, and each of them doubtless
having its present or destined use. What was that light,
so brilliant and pervading throughout space, that converted
Vol. II.  13
each of those masses of dark matter into globes clothed
with a glorious brightness? Roswell had seen chemical
experiments that produced wonderful illuminations; but
faint, indeed, were the most glowing of those artificial
torches, to the floods of light that came streaming out of
the void, on missions of millions and millions of miles.
Who, and what was the Dread Beingdread in his Majesty
and Justice, but inexhaustible in Love and Mercy  who
used these exceeding means as mere instruments of his
pleasure? and what was he himself, that he should presume
to set up his miserable pride of reason, in opposition to a
revelation supported by miracles that must be admitted to
come through men inspired by the Deity, or rejected
altogether
?
In this frame of mind Roswell was made to see that
Christianity admitted of no half-way belief; it was all true,
or it was wholly false.
And why should not Christ be the Son of God, as the
Fathers of the Church had perseveringly, but so simply
proclaimed, and as that church had continued to teach for
eighteen centuries? Roswell believed himself to have been
created in the image of God; and his much-prized reason
told him that he could perpetuate himself in successors;
and that which the Creator had given
him
the power to
achieve, could he not in his own person perform? For
the first time, an inference to the contrary seemed to be
illogical.
Then the necessity for the great expiation occurred to
his mind. This had always been a stumbling-block to
Roswell's faith. He could not see it; and that which he
could not see he was indisposed to believe. Here was the
besetting weakness of his character; a weakness which did
not suffer him to perceive that could he comprehend so
profound a mystery, he would be raised far above that very
nature in which he took so much pride. As he reflected
on this branch of the subject, a thousand mysteries,
physical
and moral, floated before his mind; and he became
aware of the little probability that he should have been
endowed with the faculties to comprehend this, the greatest
of them all. Had not science gradually discovered the
chemical processes by which gases could be concentrated
and disengaged, the formation of one of those glittering
orbs above his head would have been quite as unintelligible
a mystery to him, as the incarnation of the Saviour. The
fact was, that phenomena that were just as mysterious to
the human mind as any that the dogmas of Christianity
required to be believed, exist hourly before our eyes
without
awakening skepticism, or exciting discussion; finding
their impunity in their familiarity. Many of these
phenomena
were strictly incomprehensible to human
understandings
,
which could reason up to a fountain-head in each
case; and there it was obliged to abandon the inductive
process, purely for the want of power to grapple with the
premises which control the whole demonstration.
Could Mary Pratt have known what was going on in
Roswell Gardiner's soul that night, her happiness would
have been as boundless as her gratitude to God. She would
have seen the barrier that had so long interposed itself to
her wishes broken down; not by any rude hand, but by the
influence of those whisperings of the Divine Spirit, which
open the way to men to fit themselves for the presence of
God.
CHAPTER XI.
Let winter come! let polar spirits sweep
The darkening world, and tempest-troubled deep!
Campbell
.
While
the bosom of Roswell was thus warming with
the new-born faith, of which the germ was just opening in
his heart, Stimson came out upon the terrace to see what
had become of his officer. It was much past the hour when
the men got beneath the coverings of their mattresses; and
the honest boat-steerer, who had performed the duty on
which he had been sent, was anxious about Roswell's
remaining
so long in the open air, on this positively the
severest
night of the whole-season.
You stand the cold well, Captain Gar'ner, said
Stephen
,
as he joined his officer; but it might be prudent,
now, to get under cover.
I do not feel it cold, Stephen  returned Roswell
on the contrary, I'm in a pleasant glow. My mind has
been busy, while my frame has kept in motion. When such
are the facts, the body seldom suffers. But, hearkendoes
it not seem that some one is calling to us from the direction
of the wreck?
The great distance to which sounds are conveyed in
intensely
cold and clear weather, is a fact known to most
persons. Conversations in the ordinary tone had been
heard by the sealers when the speakers were nearly a mile
off; and, on several occasions, attempts had been made to
hold communications, by means of the voice, between the
wreck and the hut. Certain words
had
been understood;
but it was found impossible to hold anything that could be
termed conversation. Still, the voice had been often heard,
and a fancy had come over the mind of Roswell that he
heard a cry like a call for assistance, just as Stimson
joined
him.
It is so late, sir, that I should hardly think any of the
Vineyarders would be up, observed the boat-steerer, after
listening some little time in the desire to catch the sound
mentioned. Then it is so cold, that most men would like
to get beneath their blankets as soon as they could.
I do not find it so very cold, Stephen. Have you looked
at the thermometer lately?
I gave it a look in coming out, sir; and it tells a
terrible
story to-night! The marcury is all down in the bali,
which is like givin' the matter up, I do suppose, Captain
Gar'ner.
'Tis strange! I do not
feel
it so very cold! The wind
seems to be getting round to north-east, too; give us enough
of that, and we shall have a thaw. Hark! there is the cry
again.
This time there could be no mistake. A human voice
had certainly been raised amid the stillness of that almost
polar night, clearly appealing to human ears, for succour.
The only word heard or comprehended was that of help;
one well enough adapted to carry the sound far and
distinctly
.
There was a strain of agony in the cry, as if he
who made it uttered it in despair. Roswell's blood seemed
to flow back to his heart; never had he before felt so
appalling
a sense of the dependence of man on a Divine
Providence
,
as at that moment.
You heard it? he said, inquiringly, to Stephen, after
an instant of silent attention, to make sure that no more
was to reach his ears just then.
Sartain, sirno man could mistake
that
. It was the
voice of the nigger, Joe; him that Captain Daggett has for
a cook.
Think you so, Stephen? The fellow has good lungs,
and they may have set him to call upon us in their distress.
What can be the nature of the assistance they ask?
I've been thinking of that, Captain Gar'ner; and a
difficult p'int it is to answer. Food they must have still;
and was they in want of their rations, hands would have
been sent across to get 'em. They may have let their fire
go out, and be without the means to re-light it. I can
think of nothing else that is likely to happen to men so
sarcumstanced.
The last suggestion struck Roswell as possible. From
the instant he felt certain that he was called on for aid, he
had determined to proceed to the wreck, notwithstanding
the lateness of the hour, and the intense severity of the
weather. As he had intimated to Stephen, he was not at
all conscious how very cold it was; exercise and the active
workings of his mind having brought him to an excellent
condition to resist the sternness of the season. The appeal
had been so sudden and unexpected, however, that he was
at first somewhat at a loss how to proceed. This matter
was now discussed between him and Stimson, when the
following plan was adopted:
The mates were to be called, and made acquainted with
what had occurred, and put on their guard as to what might
possibly be required of them. It was not thought necessary
to call any of the rest of the men. There was always one
hand on the watch in the house, whose duty it was to look
to the fires, for the double purpose of security against a
conflagration, and to prevent the warmth within from
sinking
too near to the cold without. It had often occurred to
Roswell's mind that a conflagration would prove quick
destruction
13*
to his party. In the first place, most of the
provisions
would be lost; and it was certain that, without a
covering and the means of keeping warm within it, the
men could not resist the climate eight-and-forty hours.
The burning of the hut would be certain death.
Roswell took no one with him but Stimson. Two were
as good as a hundred, if all that was asked were merely
the means to re-light the fire. These means were provided,
and a loaded pistol was taken also, to enable a signal-shot
to be fired, should circumstances seem to require further
aid. One or two modes of communicating leading facts
were concerted, when our hero and his companion set forth
on their momentous journey.
Taking the hour, the weather, and the object before him
into the account, Roswell Gardiner felt that he was now
enlisted in the most important undertaking of his whole
life, as he and Stephen shook hands with the two mates,
and left the point. The drifts rendered a somewhat
circuitous
path necessary at first; but the moon and stars shed
so much of their radiance on the frozen covering of the
earth, that the night was quite as light as many a London
day. Excitement and motion kept the blood of our two
adventurers in a brisk circulation, and prevented their
becoming
immediately conscious of the chill intensity of the
cold to which they were exposed.
It is good to think of Almighty God, and of his many
marcies, said Stephen, when a short distance from the
house, as a body goes forth on an expedition as serious
as this. We may not live to reach the wrack, for it seems
to me to grow colder and colder!
I wonder we hear no more of the cries, remarked
Roswell, who was thinking of the distress he was bent on
relieving. One would think that a man who could call
so stoutly would give us another cry.
A body can never calcilate on a nigger, answered
Stephen, who had the popular American prejudice against
the caste that has so long been held in servitude in the
land. They call out easily, and shut up oncommon quick,
if there's nothin' gained by yelling. Black blood won't
stand cold like white blood, Captain Gar'ner, any more
than white blood will stand heat like black blood.
I have heard this before, Stephen; and it has surprised
me that Captain Daggett's cook should be the only one of
that party who seems to have had any voice to-night.
Stimson had a good deal to say now, as the two picked
their way across the field of snow, always walking on the
crust, which in most places would have upheld a loaded
vehicle; the subject of his remarks being the difference
between the two races as respects their ability to endure
hardships. The worthy boat-steerer had several tales to
relate of cases in which he had known negroes freeze
when whites have escaped. As the fact is one pretty well
established, Roswell listened complacently enough, being
much too earnest in pressing forward toward his object, to
debate any of his companion's theories just then. It was
while thus employed that Roswell fancied he heard one
more cry, resembling those which had brought him on this
dangerous undertaking, on a night so fearful. This time,
however, the cry was quite faint; and what was not so
easily explained, it did not appear to come from the precise
direction in which the wreck was known to lie, but from
one that diverged considerably from that particular quarter.
Of course, the officer mentioned this circumstance to the
boat-steerer; and the extraordinary part of the information
caused some particular discussion between them.
To me that last call seemed to come from up yonder,
nearer to the cliffs than the place where we are, and not at
all from down there, near to the sea, where the wrack is,
said Stimson, in the course of his remarks. So sartain
am I of this, that I feel anxious to change our course a
little, to see if it be not possible that one of the Vineyarders
has got into some difficulty in trying to come across to us.
Roswell had the same desire, for he had made the same
conjecture; though he did not believe the black would be
the person chosen to be the messenger on such an
occasion
.
I think Captain Daggett would have come himself, or
have sent one of his best men, he observed, in
preference
to trusting a negro with a duty so important.
We do not know, sir, that it was the nigger we heard.
Misery makes much the same cries, whether it comes from
the throat of white or black. Let us work upward, nearer
to the cliffs, sir; I see something dark on the snow,
hereaway
,
as it might be on our larboard bow.
Roswell caught a glimpse of the same object, and thither
our adventurers now bent their steps, walking on the crust
without any difficulty, so long as they kept out of the drifts.
One does not find it as easy to make any physical effort in
an intensely cold atmosphere, as he does when the weather
is more moderate. This prevented Roswell and his
companion
from moving as fast as they otherwise might have
done; but they got along with sufficient rapidity to reach
the dark spot on the snow in less than five minutes after
they had changed their course.
You are right, Stephen, said Gardiner, as he came
up to this speck, amid the immensity of the white mantle
that covered both sea and land, far as the eye could reach;
it is the cook! The poor fellow has given out here, about
half-way between the two stations.
There must be life in him yet, sir  nigger as he is.
It's not yet twenty minutes since he gave that last cry.
Help me to turn him over, Captain Gar'ner, and we will
rub him, and give him a swallow of brandy. A little hot
coffee, now, might bring the life back to his heart.
Roswell complied, first firing his pistol as a signal to
those left behind. The negro was not dead, but so near it,
that a very few more minutes would have sealed his fate.
The applications and frictions used by Gardiner and the
boat-steerer had an effect. A swallow of the brandy
probably
saved the poor fellow's life. While working on his
patient, Captain Gardiner found a piece of frozen pork,
which, on examination, he ascertained had never been
cooked. It at once explained the nature of the calamity
that had befallen the crew of the wreck.
So intent were the two on their benevolent duty, that a
party arrived from the house in obedience to the signal, in
much less time than they could have hoped for. It was led
by the mate, and came provided with a lamp burning
beneath
a tin vessel filled with sweetened coffee. This hot
drink answered an excellent purpose with both well and
sick. After a swallow or two, aided by a vigorous friction,
and closely surrounded by so many human bodies, the black
began to revive; and the sort of drowsy stupor which is
known to precede death in those who die by freezing,
having been in a degree shaken off, he was enabled to
stand alone, and by means of assistance to walk. The hot
coffee was of the greatest service, every swallow that he
got down appearing to set the engine of life into new
motion
.
The compelled exercise contributed its part; and by
the time the mate, to use his own expression, had run the
nigger into dock, which meant when he had got him safe
within the hut, his senses and faculties had so far revived
as to enable him to think and to speak. As Gardiner and
Stimson returned with him, everybody was up and
listening
,
when the black told his story.
It would seem that, during the terrible month which had
just passed, Daggett had compelled his crew to use more
exercise than had been their practice of late. Some new
apprehension had come over him on the subject of fuel, and
his orders to be saving in that article were most stringent,
and very rigidly enforced. The consequence was, that the
camboose was not as well attended to as it had been
previously
,
and as circumstances required, indeed, that it
should be. At night, the men were told to keep themselves
warm with bed-clothes, and by huddling together; and the
cabin being small, so many persons crowded together in it,
did not fail to produce an impression on its atmosphere.
Such was the state of things, when, on going to his
camboose
,
in order to cook the breakfast, this very black found
the fire totally extinguished! Not a spark could he
discover
,
even among the ashes; and, what was even worse,
the tinder-box had disappeared. As respects the last, it
may be well to state here, that it was afterwards discovered
carefully bestowed between two of the timbers of the wreck,
with a view to a particular safe-keeping; the person who
had made this disposition of it, forgetting what he had done.
The loss of the tinder-box, under the circumstances, was
almost as great a calamity as could have befallen men, in
the situation of the Vineyarders. As against the cold, by
means of bed-clothes, exercise, and other precautions, it
might have been possible to exist for some time, provided
warm food could be obtained; but the frost penetrated the
cabin, and every one soon became sensitively alive to the
awkwardness, not to say danger, of their condition. A
whole day was passed in fruitless attempts to obtain fire,
by various processes. Friction did not succeed; it
probably
never does with the thermometer at zero. Sparks
could be obtained, but by this time everything was stiff
with the frost. The food already cooked was soon as hard
as bullets, and it was found that, on the second night,
brandy that was exposed was converted into a lump of ice.
Not only did the intensity of the cold increase, but
everything
,
even to the human system, seemed to be gradually
congealing, and preparing to become converted into
receptacles
for frost. Several of the men began to suffer in their
ears, noses, feet and other extremities, and the bunks were
soon the only places in which it was found possible to exist
in anything like comfort. No less than three men had
been sent, at intervals of a few hours, across to the house,
with a view to obtain fire, or the means of lighting one,
along with other articles that were considered necessary to
the safety of the people. The cook had been the third
and last of these messengers. He had passed his two
shipmates
,
each lying dead on the snow,  or, as he supposed,
lifeless; for neither gave the smallest sign of vitality, on
an examination. It was in the agony of alarm produced
by these appalling spectacles, that the negro had cried
aloud for help, sending the sounds far enough to reach the
ears of Roswell. Still he had persevered; until chilled, as
much with terror, as with the cold and the want of warm
nourishment, the cook had sunk into what would have soon
proved to be his last long sleep, when the timely succour
arrived.
It was some two hours after the black had been got into
the hut, and was strengthened with a good hot supper, ere
he had communicated all the facts just related. Roswell
succeeded, however, in getting a little at a time from him;
and when no more remained to be related, the plan was
already arranged for future proceedings. It was quite clear
no unnecessary delay should be permitted to take place.
The cold continued to increase in intensity,
notwithstanding
it was the opinion of the most experienced among the
men that a thaw, and a great spring thaw, was approaching.
It often happens, in climates of an exaggerated character,
that these extremes almost touch each other, as they are
said to meet in man.
Roswell left the house, for the second time that eventful
night, just at the hour of twelve. He now went
accompanied
by the second mate and a foremast-hand, as well as
by his old companion, the boat-steerer. Each individual
drank a bowl of hot coffee before he set out, and a good
warm supper had also been taken in the interval between
the return and this new sortie. Experience shows that
there is no such protector against the effect of cold as a
full stomach, more especially if the food be warm and
nourishing
.
This was understood by Roswell; and not only
did he cause the whole party that set forth with him at that
late and menacing hour to receive this sustenance, but he
ordered the kettle of boiling coffee to be carried with them,
and kept two lamps burning, for the double purpose of
maintaining the heat, and of having a fire ready on
reaching
the wreck. The oil of the sea-elephant, together with
pieces of canvass prepared for the purpose, supplied the
necessary materials.
So intensely severe was the weather, that Roswell had
serious thoughts of returning when he reached the spot
where the black had been found. But the picture of
Daggett's
situation that occurred to his mind, urged him on,
and he proceeded. Every precaution had been taken to
exclude the cold, as it is usually termed, which, as it
respects
the body, means little else than keeping the vital
heat in, and very useful were these provisions found to be.
Skins formed the principal defence, though the men had
long adopted the very simple but excellent expedient of
wearing two shirts. Owing to this, and to the other
measures
taken, neither of the four was struck with a chill, and
they all continued on.
At the place mentioned by the black, the body of one of
Daggett's best men, a boat-steerer, was found. The man
was dead, of course, and the corpse was as rigid as a billet
of wood. Every particle of moisture in it had congealed,
until the whole of what had been a very fine and manly
frame, lay little more than a senseless lump of ice. A few
degrees to the southward of the spot where it was now seen,
it is probable that this relic of humanity would have
retained
its form and impression, until the trump sounded to
summon it to meet its former tenant, the spirit, in
judgment
.
No time was lost in useless lamentations over the body
of this man, who was much of a favourite among the
Oyster Ponders. Twenty minutes later, the second corpse
was found; both the bodies lying in what was the customary
track between the house and the wreck. It was the last
that had died; but, like that of the unfortunate man just
described, it was in a state to be preserved ten thousand
years, without the occurrence of a thaw. Merely glancing
at the rigid features of the face, in order to identify the
person, Roswell passed on, the chill feelings of every
individual
of his party now admonishing them all of the
necessity
of getting as soon as possible to some place where
they could feel the influence of a fire. In ten minutes
more, the whole were in the caverns of the ice, and,
presently
,
the cabin of the wreck was entered. Without
turning
to the right hand or to the left, without looking for one
of the inmates of the place, every man among the
new-comers
turned his attention instantly to getting the fire
lighted. The camboose had been filled with wood, and it
was evident that many efforts had been made to produce a
blaze, by those who had put it there. Splinters of pine
had been inserted among the oak of the vessel, and nothing
was wanting but the means of kindling. These, most
fortunately for themselves, the party of Roswell had, and
eagerly did they now have recourse to their use.
There was not a man among the Oyster Ponders who did
not, just at that moment, feel his whole being concentrated
in that one desire to obtain warmth. The cold had slowly,
but surely, insinuated itself among their garments, and
slight chills were now felt even by Roswell, whose frame
had been most wonderfully sustained that night, through
the force of moral feeling. Stimson was the individual
who was put forward at the camboose, others holding the
lamps, canvass saturated with oil, and some prepared
paper. It was found to be perceptibly warmer within the
cabin, with its doors closed, and the external coverings of
sails, &c., that had been made to exclude the air, than
without; nevertheless, when Roswell glanced at a
thermometer
that was hanging against the bulk-head, he saw
that all the mercury was still in the ball!
The interest with which our party now watched the
proceedings
of Stephen, had much of that intensity that is
known to attend any exhibition of vital importance. Life
and death were, however, to be dependent on the issue;
and the manner in which every eye was turned on the
wood, and Stephen's mode of dealing with it, denoted how
completely the dread of freezing had got possession of the
minds of even these robust and generous men. Roswell
alone ventured, for a single moment, to look around the
cabin. Three of the Vineyarders only were visible in it;
though it struck him that others lay in the berths, under
piles of clothes. Of the three who were up, one was so
near the lamp he held in his hand, that its light illumined
his face, and all that could be seen of a form enveloped in
skins. This man sat leaning against a transom. His eyes
were open, and glared on the party around the camboose;
the lips were slightly parted, and, at first, Roswell expected
to hear him speak. The immovable features, rigid
muscles
,
and wild expression of the eyeballs, however, soon
told him the melancholy truth. The man was dead. The
current of life had actually frozen at his heart.
Shuddering
,
as much with horror as with a sharp chill that just
then passed through his own stout frame, our young master
turned anxiously to note the success of Stimson, in getting
the wood of the camboose in a blaze.
Every one, in the least accustomed to a very severe
climate, must have had frequent occasions to observe the
reluctance with which all sorts of fuel burn, in exceedingly
cold weather. The billet of wood that shall blaze merrily,
on a mild day, moulders and simmers, and seems
indisposed
to give out any heat at all, with the thermometer at
zero. In a word, all inanimate substances that contain the
elements of caloric appear to sympathize with the
prevailing
state of the atmosphere, and to contribute to render
that which is already too cold for comfort, even colder.
So it was now; notwithstanding the preparations that had
been made. Baffled twice in his expectations of procuring
a blaze, Stephen stopped and took a drink of the hot coffee.
Vol. II.  14
As he swallowed the beverage, it struck him that it was
fast losing its warmth.
A considerable collection of canvass, saturated with oil,
was now put beneath the pile, in the midst of splinters of
pine, and one of the lamps was forced into the centre of
the combustibles. This expedient succeeded; the frosts
were slowly chased out of the kindling materials; a sickly
but gradually increasing flame strove through the kindling
stuff and soon began to play among the billets of the oak,
the only fuel that could be relied on for available heat.
Still there was great danger that the lighter wood would
all be consumed ere this main dependence could be aroused
from its dull inactivity. Frost appeared to be in possession
of the whole pile; and it was expelled so slowly, clung to
its dominion with so much power, as really to render the
result doubtful, for a moment or two. Fortunately, there
was found a pair of bellows; and by means of a judicious
use of this very useful implement, the oak wood was got
into a bright blaze, and warmth began to be given out
from the fire. Then came the shiverings and chills, with
which intense cold consents even to abandon the human
frame; and, by their number and force, Roswell was made
to understand how near he and his companions had been
to death. As the young man saw the fire slowly kindle to
a cheerful blaze, a glow of gratitude flowed towards his
heart, and mentally he returned thanks to God. The
cabin was so small, had been made so tight by artificial
means, and the camboose was so large, that a sensible
influence was produced on the temperature, as soon as the
wood began to burn a little freely. As none of the heat
was lost, the effect was not only apparent, but most grateful.
Roswell had looked into the vessels of the camboose while
the fire was gathering head. One, the largest, was filled,
or nearly so, with coffee frozen to a solid mass! In the
other, beef and pork had been set over to boil, and there
the pieces now were, embedded in ice, and frozen to
blocks. It was when these two distinct masses of ice
began to melt, that it was known the fire was beginning to
prevail, and hope revived in the bosoms of the Oyster
Ponders. On taking another look at the thermometer, it
was found that the mercury had so far expanded as to be
leaving the ball. It soon after ascended so high as to
denote
only forty degrees below zero!
Every thing, even to life, depending on maintaining and
increasing the power of the fire, the men now looked about
them for more fuel. There was an ample stock in the
cabin, however, the fire having become extinguished, not
for want of wood, but in the usual way. It were needless
to describe the manner in which those who stood around
the stove watched the flames, or how profound was their
satisfaction when they saw that Stimson had finally
succeeded
.
God be praised for this and for all his mercies!
exclaimed
Stephen, laying aside the bellows, at last. I can
feel warmth from the fire, and that will save such of us as
have not yet been taken away. He then lifted the lids,
and looked into the different vessels that were on. The
ice was melting fast, and the steams of coffee became
apparent
to the senses. It was at this instant that a feeble
voice was heard issuing from beneath the coverings of a
berth.
Gar'ner, it said, imploringly, if you have any feelin'
for a fellow-creatur' in distress, warm me up with one
swallow of that coffee! Oh! how pleasantly it smells, and
how good it must be for the stomach! For three days
have I tasted nothingnot even water.
This was Daggett, the long-tried sealer; the man of iron
nerves and golden longings; he who had so lately
concentrated
within himself all that was necessary to form a
pertinacious
,
resolute, and grasping seeker after gain. How
changed, now, in all this! He asked for the means of
preserving life, and thought no more of skins, and oils, and
treasures on desert keys.
Roswell was no sooner apprised of the situation of his
brother-master, than he bestowed the necessary care on his
wants. Fortunately, the coffee brought by the Oyster
Ponders, and which retained some of its original warmth,
had been set before the fire, and was now as hot as the
human stomach could bear it. Two or three swallows of
this grateful fluid were given to Daggett, and his voice
almost instantaneously showed the effect they produced.
I'm in a bad way, Gar'ner, resumed the
vineyard-master
;
I fear we're all in a bad way, that are here. I
held out ag'in the cold as long as human natur' could bear
it, but was forced to give in at last.
How many of your people still remain, Daggett? tell
us, that we may look for them, and attend to their wants.
I'm afraid, Gar'ner, they'll never want anything more
in this life! The second mate and two of the hands were
sitting in the cabin when I got into this berth, and I fear
't will be found that they're dead. I urged them to turn
in, too, as the berths were the only place where anything
like warmth was to be found; but drowsiness had come on
'em, and, when that is the case, freezin' soon follows.
The three men in the cabin are past our assistance,
being actually frozen into logs; but there must be several
more of you. I see the signs of two others in the berths
ah! what do you say to that poor fellow, Stephen?
The spirit is still in the body, sir, but about to depart.
If we can get him to swallow a little of the coffee, the
angel of death may yet loosen his hold on him.
The coffee was got down this man's throat, and he
instantly
revived. He was a young man named Lee, and
was one of the finest physical specimens of strength and
youth in the whole crew. On examining his limbs, none
were found absolutely frozen, though the circulation of the
blood was so near being checked that another hour of the
great cold which had reigned in the cabin, and which was
slowly increasing in intensity, must have destroyed him.
On applying a similar process to Daggett, Roswell was
startled at the discovery he made. The feet, legs, and
forearms of the unfortunate Vineyarder were all as stiff and
rigid as icicles. In these particulars there could be no
mistake, and men were immediately sent for snow, in order
to extract the frost by the only safe process known to the
sealers. The dead bodies were carried from the cabin,
and laid decently on the ice, outside, the increasing warmth
within rendering the removal advisable. On glancing
again at the thermometer, now suspended in a remote part
of the cabin, the mercury was found risen to two above
zero. This was a very tolerable degree of cold, and the
men began to lay aside some of their extra defences against
the weather, which would otherwise be of no service to
them when exposed outside.
The crew of the Vineyard Lion had consisted of fifteen
souls, one less than that of her consort. Of these men,
four had lost their lives between the wreck and the house;
two on a former, and two on the present occasion. Three
bodies were found sitting in the cabin, and two more were
taken out of the berths, dead. The captain, the cook and
Lee, added to these, made a dozen, leaving but three of
the crew to be accounted for. When questioned on the
subject, Lee said that one of those three had frozen to
death in the caverns, several days before, and the other two
had set out for the hut in the last snow-storm, unable to
endure the cold at the wreck any longer. As these two
men had not arrived at the house when Gardiner and his
companions left it, they had perished, out of all doubt.
Thus, of the fifteen human beings who had sailed together
from Martha's Vineyard, ready to encounter every hazard
in order to secure wealth, or what in their estimation was
wealth, but three remained; and of these, two might be
considered in a critical condition. Lee was the only man
of the entire crew who was sound and fit for service.
CHAPTER XII.
Bid
him
bow down to that which is above him,
The overruling Infinite,the Maker,
Who made him not for worship,let him kneel,
And we will kneel together.
Byron
.
When
the bodies had been removed from the cabin,
and the limbs of Daggett were covered with snow,
Roswell
Gardiner took another look at the thermometer. It
had risen already to twenty degrees above zero. This was
absolutely warmth, compared with the temperature from
which the men had just escaped, and it was felt to be so,
16*
in their persons. The fire, however, was not the only
cause of this most acceptable change. One of the men
who had been outside soon came back and reported a
decided improvement in the weather. The wind, which
had been coquetting with the north-east point of the
compass
for several hours, now blew steadily from that quarter.
An hour later it was found, on examination, that a second
thermometer, which was outside, actually indicated ten
above zero! This sudden and great change came
altogether
from the wind, which was now in the warm quarter.
The men stripped themselves of most of their skins, and
the fire was suffered to go down, though care was taken
that it should not again be totally extinguished.
We have little pleasure in exhibiting pictures of human
suffering; and shall say but little of the groans and pains
that Daggett uttered and endured, while undergoing that
most agonizing process of having the frost taken out of his
system by cold applications. It was the only safe way of
treating his case, however, and as he knew it, he bore his
sufferings as well as man could bear them. Long ere the
return of day he was released from his agony, and was put
back into his berth, which had been comfortably arranged
for him, having the almost unheard-of luxury of sheets,
with an additional mattress.
As Stephen remarked, when the men were told to try
and get a little sleep, There's plenty of berths empty,
and each on us can have as many clothes and as warm a
bed as he can ask for, now that so many have hastened
away to their great account, as it might be, in the pride
of their youth and strength.
Activity, the responsibility of command, and the great
necessity there had been for exertion, prevented Roswell
from reflecting much on what had happened, until he lay
down to catch a little sleep. Then, indeed, the whole of
the past came over him, in one sombre, terrible picture,
and he had the most lively perception of the dangers from
which he had escaped, as well as of the mercy of God's
Providence. Surrounded by the dead, as it might be, and
still uncertain of the fate of the living, his views of the past
and future became much lessened in confidence and hope.
The majesty and judgment of God assumed a higher place
than common in his thoughts, while his estimate of
himself
was fast getting to be humble and searching. In the
midst of all these changes of views and feelings, however,
there was one image unaltered in the young man's
imagination
.
Mary occupied the back-ground of every picture,
with her meek, gentle, but blooming countenance. If he
thought of God,
her
eyes were elevated in prayer; if the
voyage home was in his mind, and the chances of success
were calculated,
her
smiles and anxious watchfulness
stimulated
him to adventure; if arrived and safe, her downcast
but joyful looks betrayed the modest happiness of her
in-most
heart. It was in the midst of some such pictures
that Roswell now fell asleep.
When the party turned out in the morning, a still more
decided change had occurred in the weather. The wind
had increased to a gale, bringing with it torrents of rain
Coming from the warm quarter, a thaw had set in with a
character quite as decided as the previous frost. In that
region, the weather is usually exaggerated in its features,
and the change from winter to spring is quite as sudden as
that from autumn to winter. We use the terms spring
and autumn out of complaisance to the usages of men;
but, in fact, these two seasons have scarcely any existence
at all in the antarctic seas. The change, commonly, is
from winter to summer, such as summer is, and from
summer
back to winter.
Notwithstanding the favourable appearances of things,
when Roswell walked out into the open air next morning,
he well knew that summer had not yet come. Many weeks
must go by ere the ice could quit the bay, and even a boat
could put to sea. There were considerations of prudence,
therefore, that should not be neglected, connected with the
continuance of the supplies and the means of subsistence.
In one respect the party now on the island had been gainers
by the terrible losses it had sustained in Daggett's crew.
The provisions of the two vessels might now, virtually, be
appropriated to the crew of one; and Roswell, when he
came to reflect on the circumstances, saw that a
Providential
interference had probably saved the survivors from great
privations, if not from absolute want.
Still there was a thaw, and one of that decided character
which marks a climate of great extremes. The snows on
the mountain soon began to descend upon the plain, in
foaming torrents; and, increased by the tribute received
from the last, the whole came tumbling over the cliffs in
varions
places in rich water-falls. There was about a mile of
rock that was one continuous cataract, the sheet being nearly
unbroken for the whole distance. The effect of this deluge
from the plain above was as startling as it was grand. All
the snow along the rocky shore soon disappeared; and the
fragments of ice began rapidly to diminish in size, and to
crumble. At first, Roswell felt much concern on account
of the security of the wreck; his original apprehension
being that it would be washed away. This ground of fear
was soon succeeded by another of scarcely less serious
import
that of its being crushed by the enormous cakes of
ice that made the caverns in which it lay, and which now
began to settle and change their positions, as the water
washed away their bases. At one time Roswell thought
of setting the storm at defiance, and of carrying Daggett
across to the house by means of the hand-barrow; but
when he came to look at the torrents of water that were
crossing the rocks, so many raging rivulets, the idea was
abandoned as impracticable. Another night was therefore
passed in the midst of the tempest.
The north-east wind, the rain, and the thaw, were all at
work in concert, when our adventurers came abroad to
look upon the second day of their sojourn in the wreck.
By this time the caverns were dripping with a thousand
little streams, and every sign denoted a most rapid melting
of the ice. On carrying the thermometer into the open air
it stood at sixty-two; and the men found it necessary to lay
aside their second shirt, and all the extraordinary defences
of their attire. Nor was this all; the wind that crosses the
salt water is known to have more than the usual influence
on the snows and ice; and such was the effect now
produced
by it on Sealer's Land. The snow, indeed, had
mostly disappeared from all places but the drifts; while the
ice was much diminished in its size and outlines. So
grateful was the change from the extreme cold that they
had so lately endured, that the men thought nothing of the
rain at all; they went about in it just as if it did not stream
down upon them in little torrents. Some of them
clambered
up the cliffs, and reached a point whence it was known
that they could command a view of the house. The return
of this party, which Roswell did not accompany, was waited
for with a good deal of interest. When it got back, it
brought a report that was deemed important in several
particulars. The snow had gone from the plain, and from
the mountain, with the exception of a few spots where there
had been unusual accumulations of it. As respected the
house, it was standing, and the snow had entirely
disappeared
from its vicinity. The men could be seen walking
about on the bare rocks, and every symptom was that of
settled spring.
This was cheering news; and the torrents having much
diminished in size, some having disappeared altogether,
Roswell set out for the cape, leaving the second mate in
charge of the wreck. Lee, the young Vineyarder, who had
been rescued from freezing by the timely arrival of our
hero, accompanied the latter, having joined his fortunes to
those of the Oyster Ponders. The two reached the house
before dark, where they found Hazard and his companions
in a good deal of concern touching the fate of the party
that was out. A deep impression was made by the report
of what had befallen the other crew; and that night
Roswell
read prayers to as attentive a congregation as was
ever assembled around a domestic hearth. As for fire,
none was now needed, except for culinary purposes, though
all the preparations to meet cold weather were maintained,
it being well known that a shift of wind might bring back
the fury of the winter.
The following morning it was clear, though the wind
continued warm and balmy from the north. No such
weather
,
indeed, had been felt by the sealers since they
reached
the group; and the effect on them was highly cheering
and enlivening. Before he had breakfasted, Roswell was
down in the cove, examining into the condition of his
vessel, or what remained of her. A good deal of frozen
snow still lay heaped on the mass, and he set the hands at
work to shovel it off. Before noon the craft was clear, and
most of the snow was melted, it requiring little more than
exposure to the air in order to get rid of it.
As soon as the hulk was clear, Roswell directed his men
to take everything out of it; the remains of cargo,
water-casks
,
and some frozen provisions, in order that it might
float as light as possible. The ice was frozen close to every
part of the vessel's bottom to a depth of several feet,
following
her mould, a circumstance that would necessarily
prevent her settling in the water below her timbers; but,
as there was no telling when this ice might begin to recede
by melting, it was deemed prudent to use this precaution.
It was found that the experiment succeeded, the hulk
actually
rising, when relieved from the weight in it, no less
than four inches.
A consultation was held that night, between Gardiner,
his officers, and the oldest of the seamen. The question
presented was whether the party should attempt to quit the
group in the boats, or whether they should build a little on
the hulk, deck her over, and make use of this altered craft,
to return to the northward. There was a good deal to be
said on both sides. If the boats were used, the party might
leave as soon as the weather became settled, and the season
a little more advanced, by dragging the boats on sledges
across the ice to the open water, which was supposed to
be some ten or twenty miles to the northward, and a large
amount of provisions might thus be saved. On the other
hand, however, as it regarded the provisions, the boats
would hold so little, that no great gain would be made by
going early in them, and leaving a sufficient supply behind
to keep all hands two or three months. This was a
consideration
that presented itself, and it had its weight in the
decision. Then there was the chance of the winter's
returning
,
bringing with it the absolute necessity of using a
great deal more fuel. This was a matter of life and death.
Comparatively pleasant as the weather had become, there
was no security for its so continuing. One entire spring
month was before the sealers, and a shift of wind might
convert the weather into a wintry temperature. Should
such be the case, it might become indispensable to burn
the very materials that would be required to build up and
deck over the hulk. There were, therefore, many things
to be taken into the account; nor was the question settled
without a great deal of debate and reflection.
After discussing all these points, the decision was as
follows. It was at least a month too soon to think of
trusting
themselves in that stormy ocean, on the high seas and
in the open boats; and this so much the more because
nature
,
as if expressly to send back a reasonable amount of
warm air into the polar regions, with a view to preserve
the distinction of the seasons, caused the wind to blow
most of the time from the northward. As this month, in
all prudence, must be passed on the island, it might as well
be occupied with building upon the hulk, as in any other
occupation. Should the cold weather return, the materials
would still be there, and might be burned, in the last
extremity
,
just as well, or even with greater facility, after being
brought over to the cove, as if left where they then were,
or at the wreck. Should the winter not return, the work
done on the vessel would be so much gained, and they
would be ready for an earlier start, when the ice should
move.
On this last plan the duty was commenced, very little
interrupted by the weather. For quite three weeks the
wind held from points favourable to the progress of spring,
veering from east to west, but not once getting any
southing
in it. Occasionally it blew in gales, sending down
upon the group a swell that made great havoc with the
outer edges of the field-ice. Every day or two a couple of
hands were sent up the mountain to take a look-out, and
to report the state of matters in the adjacent seas. The
fleet of bergs had not yet come out of port, though it was
in motion to the southward, like three-deckers dropping
down to outer anchorages, in roadsteads and bays. As
Roswell intended to be off before these formidable cruisers
put to sea, their smallest movement or change was watched
and noted. As for the field-ice, it was broken up, miles at
at a time, until there remained very little of it, with the
exception of the portion that was wedged in and jammed
among the islands of the group. From some cause that
could not be ascertained, the waves of the ocean, which
came tumbling in before the northern gales, failed to roll
home upon this ice, which lost its margin, now it was
reduced to the limits of the group, slowly and with great
resistance. Some of the sealers ascribed this obstinacy in
the bay-ice to its greater thickness; believing that the
shallowness of the water had favoured a frozen formation
below, that did not so much prevail off soundings. This
theory may have been true, though there was quite as much
against it, as in its favour, for polar ice usually increases
above and not from below. The sea is much warmer than
the atmosphere, in the cold months, and the ice is made
by deposites of snow, moisture and sleet, on the surfaces of
the fields and bergs.
In those three weeks, which carried forward the season
to within ten days of summer, a great deal of useful work
was done. Daggett was brought over to the house, on a
handbarrow, for the second time, and made as comfortable
as circumstances would allow. From the first, Roswell
saw that his state was very precarious, the frozen legs, in
particular, being threatened with mortification. All the
expedients known to a sealer's
materia medica
were
resorted
to, in order to avert consequences so serious, but
without success. The circulation could not be restored,
as nature required it to be done, and, failing of the support
derived from a healthful condition of the vital current, the
fatal symptoms slowly supervened. This change, however,
was so gradual, that it scarce affected the regular course
of the duty.
It was a work of great labour to transport the remaining
timbers and plank of the wreck to the cove. Without the
wheels, indeed, it may be questioned whether it could have
been done at all, in a reasonable time. The breaking up of
the schooner was, in itself, no trifling job, for fully one half
of the frame remained to be pulled to pieces. In preparing
the materials for use, again, a good deal of embarrassment
was experienced in consequence of the portions of the two
vessels that were left being respectively their lower bodies,
all the upper works of each having been burned, with the
exception of the after part of Daggett's craft, which had
been preserved on account of the cabin. This occasioned
a good deal of trouble in moulding and fitting the new upper
works on the hulk in the cove. Roswell had no idea of
rebuilding his schooner strictly in her old form and
proportions
;
he did not, indeed, possess the materials for such
a reconstruction. His plan was, simply, to raise on the
hulk as much as was necessary to render her safe and
convenient
,
and then to get as good and secure a deck over all
as circumstances would allow.
Fortunately for the progress of the work, Lee, the
Vineyard
man, was a ship-carpenter, and his skill essentially
surpassed that of Smith, who filled the same station on
board the Oyster Pond craft. These two men were now
of the greatest service; for, though neither understood
drafting, each was skilful in the use of tools, and had a
certain readiness that enabled him to do a hundred things
that he had never found it necessary to attempt on any
former occasion. If the upper frame that was now got on
the Sea Lion was not of faultless mould, it was securely
fastened, and rendered the craft even stronger than it had
been originally. Some regard was had to resisting the
pressure of ice, and experience had taught all the sealers
where the principal defences against the effects of a nip
ought to be placed. The lines were not perfect, it is true;
but this was of less moment, as the bottom of the craft,
which alone had any material influence on her sailing, was
just as it had come from the hands of the artizan who had
originally moulded her.
By the end of a fortnight, the new top-timbers were all
in their places, and secured, while a complete set of bends
were brought to them, and were well bolted. The
caulking-irons
were put in requisition as soon as a streak was
on, the whole work advancing, as it might be,
pari passu
.
Planks for the decks were much wanted, for, in the terrible
strait for fuel which had caused the original assault on the
schooner, this portion of the vessel had been the first burned,
as of the most combustible materials. The quarter-deck
of the Vineyard craft, luckily, was entire, and its planks so
far answered an excellent purpose. They served to make
a new quarter-deck for the repairs, but the whole of the
main-deck and forecastle remained to be provided for.
Materials were gleaned from different parts of the two
vessels
,
until a reasonably convenient, and a perfectly safe
deck was laid over the whole craft, the coamings for the
hatches being taken from Daggett's schooner, which had
not been broken up in those parts. It is scarcely
necessary
to say that the ice had early melted from the rocks of
Vol. II.  15
the coast. The caverns all disappeared within the first
week of the thaw, the attitudes into which the cakes had
been thrown greatly favouring the melting process, by
exposing
so much surface to the joint action of wind, rain,
and sun. What was viewed as a favourable augury, the
seals began to reappear. There was a remote portion of
the coast, from which the ice had been driven by the
winds around the north-west cape, that was already alive
with them. Alas! these animals no longer awakened
cupidity
in the breasts of the sealers. The last no longer
thought of gain, but simply of saving their lives, and of
restoring themselves to the humble places they had held in
the world, previously to having come on this ill-fated voyage.
This re-appearance of the seals produced a deep
impression
on Roswell Gardiner. His mind had been much
inclined
of late to dwell more and more on religious subjects,
and his conversations with Stephen were still more
frequent
than formerly. Not that the boat-steerer could
enlighten him on the great subject, by any learned lore, for
in this Stimson was quite deficient; but his officer found
encouragement in the depth and heartiness of his
companion's
faith, which seemed to be raised above all doubts
and misgivings whatever. During the gloomiest moments
of that fearful winter, Stephen had been uniformly
confiding
and cheerful. Not once had he been seen to waver,
though all around him were desponding and anticipating
the worst. His heart was light exactly in proportion as
his faith was strong.
We shall neither freeze nor starve, he used to say,
unless it be God's will; and, when it is his pleasure,
depend on it, friends, it will be for our good. As for
Daggett, he had finally given up his hold on the wreck,
and it seemed no longer to fill his thoughts. When he
was told that the seals had come back, his eye brightened,
and his nature betrayed some of its ardent longings. But
it was no more than a gleaming of the former spirit of the
man, now becoming dim under the darkness that was fast
encircling all his views of this world.
It's a pity, Gar'ner, that we have no craft ready for the
work, he said, under the first impulse of the intelligence.
At this early time in the season, a large ship might be
filled!
We have other matters on our hands, Captain
Daggett
,
was the answer; they must be looked to first. If
we can get off the island at all and return safe to those
who, I much fear, are now mourning us as dead, we shall
have great reason to thank God.
A few skins would do no great harm, Gar'ner, even to
a craft cut down and reduced.
We have more cargo now than we shall be able to
take with us. Quite one half of all our skins must be left
behind us, and all of the oil. The hold of the schooner is
too shallow to carry enough of anything to make out a
voyage. I shall ballast with water and provisions, and fill
up all the spare room with the best of our skins. The rest
of the property must be abandoned.
Why abandoned? Leave a hand or two to take care
of it, and send a craft out to look for it, as soon as you get
home. Leave me, Gar'ner, I am willing to stay.
Roswell thought that the poor man would be left,
whether he wished to remain or not, for the symptoms that
are known to be so fatal in cases like that of Daggett's,
were making themselves so apparent as to leave little doubt
of the result. What rendered this display of the
master-passion
somewhat remarkable, was the fact that our hero
had, on several occasions, conversed with the invalid,
concealing
no material feature of his case, and the latter had
expressed his expectation of a fatal termination, if not an
absolute willingness to die. Stimson had frequently prayed
with Daggett, and Roswell had often read particular
chapters
of the bible to him, at his own request, creating an
impression that the Vineyarder was thinking more of his
end than of any interests connected with this life. Such
might have been, probably
was
, the case, until the seeming
return of what had once been deemed good luck awakened
old desires, and brought out traits of character that were
about to be lost in the near views of a future world. All
this Roswell saw and noted, and the reflections produced
by his own perilous condition, the certain loss of, so many
companions, the probable death of Daggett, and the
humble
but impressive example and sympathy of Stimson, were
such as would have delighted the tender spirit of Mary
Pratt, could she have known of their existence.
But the great consideration of the moment, the centre
of all the hopes and fears of our sealers, was the rebuilding
of the mutilated Sea Lion. Although the long thaw did
so much for them, the reader is not to regard it as such a
spell of warm weather as one enjoys in May within the
temperate zone. There were no flowers, no signs of
vegetation
,
and whenever the wind ceased to blow smartly from
the northward, there was frost. At two or three intervals
cold snaps set in that looked seriously like a return to
winter, and, at the end of the third week of pleasant
weather mentioned, it began to blow a gale from the
southward
,
to snow, and to freeze. The storm commenced
about ten in the forenoon; ere the sun went down, the
days then being of great length, every passage around the
dwelling was already blocked up with banks of snow.
Several times had the men asked permission to remove the
sails from the house, to admit air and light; but it was now
found that the tent-like verandah they formed was of as
much use as it had been at any time during the season.
Without it, indeed, it would not have been possible for the
people to quit their dwelling during three entire days.
Everything like work was, of course, suspended during this
tempest, which seriously menaced the unfortunate sealers
with the necessity of again breaking up their schooner,
now nearly completed, with a view again to keep
themselves
from freezing. The weather was not so intensely
cold as it had been, continuously, for months during the
past winter; but, coming as it did, after so long a spell of
what might be considered as a balmy atmosphere in that
region, it found the people unbraced and little prepared for
it. At no time was the thermometer lower than twenty
degrees below zero; this was near morning, after a sharp
and stinging night; nor was it for any succession of hours
much below zero. But zero was now hard to bear, and
fires, and good fires too, were absolutely necessary to keep
the men from suffering, as well as from despondency.
Perhaps
the spectacle of Daggett, dying from the effects of
frost before their eyes, served to increase the uneasiness of
the people, and to cause them to be less sparing of the fuel
than persons in their situation ought to have been. It is
certain that a report was brought to Roswell, in the height
of the tempest, and when the thermometer was at the lowest,
that there was not wood enough left from the plunder of
the two vessels, exclusively of that which had been worked
up in the repairs, to keep the fires going eight-and-forty
hours longer! It was true, a little wood, intended to be
used in the homeward passage, enough to last as far as Rio
possibly, had been used in stowing the hold; and that might
be got at first, if it ever ceased to snow. Without that
addition
to the stock in the house, it would not be within the
limits of probability to suppose the people could hold out
against the severity of such weather a great while longer.
Every expedient that could be devised to save wood, and
to obtain warmth from other sources, was resorted to, of
course, by Roswell's orders. Lamps were burned with great
freedom; not little vessels invented to give light, but such
torches as one sees at the lighting up of a princely
courtyard
on the occasion of a
fte
, in which wicks are made
by the pound, and unctuous matter is used by the gallon.
Old canvass and elephants' oil supplied the materials; and
the spare camboose, which had been brought over to the
house to be set up there, while the other galley was being
placed on board, very well answered the purpose of a lamp.
Some warmth was obtained by these means, but much more
of a glaring and unpleasant light.
It was during the height of this tempest that the soul of
Daggett took its flight towards the place of departed spirits,
in preparation for the hour when it was to be summoned
before the judgment-seat of God. Previously to his death,
the unfortunate Vineyarder held a frank and confidential
discourse with Roswell. As his last hour approached, his
errors and mistakes became more distinctly apparent, as is
usual with men, while his sins of omission seemed to crowd
the vista of by-gone days. Then it was that the whole
earth did not contain that which, in his dying eyes, would
prove an equivalent for one hour passed in a sincere,
devout
,
and humble service of the Deity!
I'm afraid that I've loved money most too well, he
said to Roswell, not an hour before he drew his last breath;
but I hope it was not so much for myself, as for others.
15*
A wife and children, Gar'ner, tie a man to 'arth in a most
unaccountable manner. Sealers' companions are used to
hearing of misfortunes, and the Vineyard women know
that few on 'em live to see a husband at their side in old
age. Still, it is hard on a mother and wife, to l'arn that
her chosen friend has been cut off in the pride of his days,
and in a distant land. Poor Betsey! It would have been
better for us both, had we been satisfied with the little we
had; for now the good woman will have to look to all
matters for herself.
Daggett now remained silent for some time, though his
lips moved, most probably in prayer. It was a melancholy
sight to see a man in the vigour of his manhood, whose
voice was strong, and whose heart was still beating with
vigour and vitality, standing, as it were, on the brink of a
precipice, down which all knew he was to be so speedily
hurled. But the decree had gone forth, and no human
skill could arrest it. Shortly after the confession and
lamentation we have recorded, the decay reached the
vitals, and the machine of clay stopped. To avoid the
unpleasant
consequences of keeping the body in so warm a
place, it was buried in the snow at a short distance from
the house, within an hour after it had ceased to breathe.
When Roswell Gardiner saw this man, who had so long
adhered to him, like a leech, in the pursuit of gold, laid a
senseless corpse among the frozen flakes of the antarctic
seas, he felt that a lively admonition of the vanity of the
world was administered to himself. How little had he
been able to foresee all that had happened, and how
mistaken
had been his own calculations and hopes! What,
then, was that intellect of which he had been so proud, and
what reason had he to rely on himself in those matters that
lay equally beyond the cradle and the grave  that
incomprehensible
past, and the unforeseen future, towards which
all those in existence were hastening! Roswell had received
many lessons in humility, the most useful of all the lessons
that man can receive in connection with the relation that
really exists between the Deity and himself. Often had he
wondered, while reading the Bible Mary Pratt had put into
his hand, at the stubborn manner in which the chosen
people of God had returned to their idols, and their
groves, and their high places; but he was now made
to understand that others still erred in this great particular,
and that of all the idols men worship, that of self was
perhaps
the most objectionable.
CHAPTER XIII.
Long swoln in drenching rains, seeds, germs, and buds
Start at the touch of vivifying beams.
Moved by their secret force, the vital lymph
Diffusive runs, and spreads o'er wood and field
A flood of verdure.
Wilcox
.
At
length it came to be rumoured among the sealers
that the fires must be permitted to go out, or that the
materials
used for making the berths, and various other fixtures
of the house, must be taken to supply the stove. It was
when it got to be known that the party was reduced to this
sad dilemma, that Roswell broke through the bank of snow
that almost covered the house, and got so far into the open
air as to be able to form some estimate of the probable
continuance
of the present cold weather. The thermometer,
within the bank of snow, but outside of the building, then
stood at twenty below zero; but it was much colder in the
unobstructed currents of as keen and biting a south wind
as ever came howling across the vast fields of ice that
covered the polar basin. The snow had long ceased, but
not until an immense quantity had fallen; nearly twice as
much, Roswell and Hazard thought, as they had seen on
the rocks at any time that winter.
I see no signs of a change, Mr. Hazard, Roswell
remarked
,
shivering with the intensity of the cold. We
had better go back into the house before we get chilled,
for we have no fire now to go to, to warm ourselves. It is
much warmer within doors, than it is in the open air, fire
or no fire.
There are many reasons for that, Captain Gar'ner,
answered the mate. So many bodies in so small a space,
the shelter from the wind and outer air, and the snow
banks, all help us. I think we shall find the thermometer
indoors at a pretty comfortable figure this morning.
On examining it, it was found to stand at only fifteen
below zero, making a difference of five degrees in favour
of the house, as compared with the sort of covered gallery
under the tent, and probably of five more, as compared with
the open air.
On a consultation, it was decided that all hands should
eat a hearty meal, remove most of their clothes, and get
within the coverings of their berths, to see if it would not
be possible to wear out the cold spell, in some tolerable
comfort, beneath rugs and blankets. On the whole, it was
thought that the berths might be made more serviceable
by this expedient, than by putting their materials into the
stoves. Accordingly, within an hour after Roswell and his
mate had returned from their brief out-door excursion, the
whole party was snugly bestowed under piles of rugs,
clothes, sails, and whatever else might be used to retain
the animal heat near the body, and exclude cold. In this
manner, six-and-thirty hours were passed, not a man of
them all having the courage to rise from his lair, and
encounter
the severity of the climate, now unrelieved by
anything
like a fire.
Roswell had slept most of the time, during the last ten
hours, and in this he was much like all around him. A
general feeling of drowsiness had come over the men, and
the legs and feet of many among them, notwithstanding
the quantity of bed-clothes that were, in particular, piled
on that part of their person, were sensitively alive to the
cold. No one ever knew how low the thermometer went
that fearful night; but a sort of common consciousness
prevailed
,
that nothing the men had yet seen, or felt, equalled
its chill horrors. The cold had got into the house,
converting
every article it contained into a mass of frost. The
berths ceased to be warm, and the smallest exposure of a
shoulder, hand, or ears, soon produced pain. The heads
of very many of the party were affected, and breathing
became
difficult and troubled. A numbness began to steal
over the lower limbs; and this was the last unpleasant
sensation
remembered by Roswell, when he fell into another
short and disturbed slumber. The propensity to sleep was
very general now, though many struggled against it,
knowing
it was the usual precursor of death by freezing.
Our hero never knew how long he slept in the last nap
he took on that memorable occasion. When he awoke, he
found a bright light blazing in the hut, and heard some one
moving about the camboose. Then his thoughts reverted
to himself, and to the condition of his limbs. On trying to
rub his feet together, he found them so nearly without
sensation
as to make the consciousness of their touching each
other almost out of the question. Taking the alarm at once,
he commenced a violent friction, until by slow degrees he
could feel that the nearly stagnant blood was getting again
into motion. So great had been Roswell's alarm, and so
intent his occupation, that he took no heed of the person
who was busy at the camboose, until the man appeared at
the side of his berth, holding a tin pot in his hand. It was
Stimson, up and dressed, without his skins, and seemingly
in perfect preservation.
Here's some hot coffee, Captain Gar'ner, said the
provident boat-steerer, and then turn out. The wind has
shifted, by the marcy of God, and it has begun to rain.
Now
, I think we may have summer in 'arnest, as summer
comes among these sealin' islands.
Roswell took six or eight swallows of the coffee, which
was smoking hot, and instantly felt the genial influence
diffused over his whole frame. Sending Stephen to the
other berths with this timely beverage, he now sat up in his
berth, and rubbed his feet and legs with his hands. The
exercise, friction, and hot coffee, soon brought him round;
and he sprang out of his berth, and was quickly dressed.
Stimson had lighted a fire in the camboose, using the very
last of the wood, and the warmth was beginning to diffuse
itself through the building. But the change in the wind,
and the consequent melioration of the temperature,
probably
alone saved the whole of the Oyster Pond crew from
experiencing the dire fate of that of the Vineyard craft.
Stephen got man after man out of his berth, by doses of
the steaming coffee; and the blood being thus stimulated,
by the aid of friction, everybody was soon up and stirring.
It was found, on inquiry, that all three of the blacks had
toes or ears frozen, and with them the usual application of
snow became necessary; but the temperature of the house
soon got to be so high as to render the place quite
comfortable
.
Warm food being deemed very essential, Stephen
had put a supply of beans and pork into his coppers; and
the frost having been extracted from a quantity of the
bread by soaking it in cold water, a hearty meal of good,
hot, and most nourishing food, was made by all hands.
This set our sealers up, no more complaints of the frost
being heard.
It was, indeed, no longer very cold. The thermometer
was up to twenty-six above zero in the house when Roswell
turned out; and the cooking process, together with
Stephen's
fires and the shift of wind, soon brought the
mercury
up to forty. This was a cheering temperature for
those who had been breathing the polar air; and the
influence
of the north-east gale continued to increase. The
rain and thaw produced another deluge; and the cliffs
presented
,
for several hours, a sight that might have caused
Niagara to hide her head in mortification. These sublime
scenes are of frequent occurrence amid the solitudes of the
earth; the occasional phenomena of nature often
surpassing
in sublimity and beauty her rarest continued efforts.
The succeeding day the rain ceased, and summer
appeared
to have come in reality. It is true that at mid-day
the thermometer in the shade stood at only forty-eight; but
in the sun it actually rose to seventy. Let those who have
ever experienced the extremes of heat and cold imagine
the delight with which our sealers moved about under such
a sun! All excess of clothing was thrown aside; and
many of the men actually pursued their work in their
shirt-sleeves
.
As the snow had vanished quite as suddenly as it came,
everything and everybody was now in active motion. Not
a man of the crew was disposed to run the risk of
encountering
any more cold on Sealer's Land. Roswell himself
was of opinion that the late severe weather was the dying
effort of the winter, and that no more cold was to be
expected
;
and Stimson agreed with him in this notion. The
sails were taken down from around the house, and those
articles it was intended to carry away were transferred to
the schooner as fast as the difficulties of the road would
allow. While his mates were carrying on this duty, our
young master took an early occasion to examine the state
of matters generally on the island. With this view he
ascended to the plain, and went half-way up the mountain,
desiring to get a good look into the offing.
It was soon ascertained that the recent deluge had swept
all the ice and every trace of the dead into the sea. The
body of Daggett had disappeared, with the snow-bank in
which it had been buried; and all the carcases of the seals
had been washed away. In a word, the rocks were as
naked and as clean as if man's foot had never passed over
them. From the facts that skeletons of seals had been
found strewed along the north shore, and the present void,
Roswell was led to infer that the late storm had been one
of unusual intensity, and most probably of a character to
occur only at long intervals.
But the state of the ice was the point of greatest interest.
The schooner could now be got ready for sea in a week,
and that easily; but there she lay, imbedded in a field of
ice that still covered nearly the whole of the waters within
the group. As Roswell stood on the cliffs which overlooked
the cove, he calculated the distance it would be necessary
to take the schooner through the ice by sawing and cutting,
and that through a field known to be some four feet thick,
at five good miles at least. So Herculean did this task
appear
to be, that he even thought of abandoning his vessel
altogether, and of setting out in the boats, as soon as the
summer was fairly commenced. On reflection, however,
this last plan was reserved as a
dernier ressort
, the danger
of encountering the tempests of those seas in a whale-boat,
without covering or fire, being much too great to be thought
of, so long as any reasonable alternative offered.
The bergs to the southward were in motion, and a large
fleet of them was putting to sea, as it might be, coming in
from those remote and then unknown regions in which
they were formed. From the mountain, our hero counted
at least a hundred, all regularly shaped, with tops like that
of table-land, and with even, regular sides, and upright
attitudes
.
It was very desirable to get ahead of these new
maritime Alps, for the ocean to the northward was
unusually
clear of ice of all kinds, that lodged between the
islands excepted.
So long as it was safe to calculate on the regular changes
of the seasons, Roswell knew that patience and vigilance
would serve his turn, by bringing everything round in its
proper time and place. But it was by no means certain
that it was a usual occurrence for the Great Bay to be
crammed with field-ice, as had happened the past winter;
if the actual state of the surrounding waters were an
exception
instead of the rule. On examining the shores,
however, it was found that the rain and melted snow had
created a sort of margin, and that the strong winds which
had been blowing, and which in fact were still blowing,
had produced a gradually increasing attrition, until a space
existed between the weather-side of the field and the rocks
that was some thirty fathoms wide. This was an important
discovery, and brought up a most grave question for
decision
.
Owing to the shape of the surrounding land, it would not
be possible for the ice to float out in a body, for two or
three months to come; or until so much had melted as to
leave room for the field to pass the capes and head-lands.
It never could have entered the bay for the same reason,
but for the resistless power of a field that extended leagues
out into the ocean, where, acted on jointly by wind and
tide, it came down with a momentum that was resistless,
ripping and tearing the edges of the field as if they had
been so much freshly turned up mould. It was, then, a
question how to get the schooner out of her present bed
and into clear water.
The reader will probably remember that, on her first
arrival at the group, the Sea Lion had entered the Great
Bay from the southward; while, in her subsequent effort to
get north, she had gone out by the opposite passage. Now,
it occurred to Roswell that he might escape by the former
of these routes more readily than by the latter, and for the
following reasons:  No field-ice had ever blocked up the
southern passage, which was now quite clear, though the
approach to it just then was choked by the manner in
which the north-east gale that was still blowing, pressed
home against the rocks the field that so nearly filled the
bay. A shift of wind, however, must soon come; and
when that change occurred, it was certain that this field
would move in an opposite direction, leaving the margin
of open water, that has already been mentioned, all along
the rocks. The distance was considerable, it is truenot
less than fifteen milesand the whole of it was to be made
quite close to sharp angular rocks that would penetrate the
schooner's sides almost as readily as an axe, in the event
of a nip; but this danger might be avoided by foresight,
and a timely attention to the necessities of the case.
Seeing
no more available plan to get the vessel out of her
present
duresse, the mates came readily into this scheme, and
preparations were made to carry it out. As the cove was
so near the north-east end of Sealer's Land, it may be well
to explain that the reason this same mode of proceeding
could not be carried out in a northern direction, was the
breadth of the field seaward, and the danger of following
the north shore when the solid ice did leave it, on account
of the quantities of broken fragments that were tossing and
churning in its front, far as the eye could reach from the
cliffs themselves.
The third day after the commencement of the thaw, the
wind came round again from the south-west, blowing
heavily
.
As was expected, this soon began to set the field in
motion, driving it over towards the volcano, and at the
same time northerly. About six in the morning, Hazard
brought a report to Roswell that a margin of open water
was beginning to form all along under the cliffs, while
there was great danger that the channel which had been
cut from the schooner to the nearest point beneath the
rocks, in readiness for this very contingency, might be
closed by the pressure of the ice without, on that within
the cove. No time was to be lost, therefore, if it was
intended
to move the craft on this shift of wind. The
distance
that had been sawed through to make the channel
just named, did not exceed a hundred yards. The passage
was not much wider than the schooner's breadth; and it
will be easily understood that it was to the last degree
important
to carry her through this strait as soon as possible.
Although many useful articles were scattered about on the
Vol. II.  16
ice, and several remained to be brought over the rocks
from the house, the order was given to get out lines, and
to move the vessel at once, the men set to work with hearty
good will, another glimpse of home rising before their
imaginations
;
and, in five minutes after Hazard had made his
communication, the Sea Lion had gone six or eight times
her length towards the cliffs. Then came the pinch! Had
not the ice been solid between the cape and the berth just
before occupied by the schooner, she would have been
hopelessly nipped by the closing of the artificial channel.
As it was, she was caught, and her progress was arrested;
but the field took a cant, in consequence of the resistance
of the solid ice that filled the whole cove to the eastward
of the channel; and, before any damage was done, the
latter began to open even faster than it had come together.
The instant the craft was released the sealers manned their
hauling lines again, and ran her up to the rocks with a
hurrah! The margin of water was just opening, but so
prompt had been the movement of the men that it was not
yet wide enough to permit the vessel to go any further;
and it was found necessary to wait until the passage was
sufficiently wide to enable her to move ahead. The
intervening
time was occupied in bringing to the craft the
articles
left behind.
By nine o'clock everything was on board; the winding
channel that followed the sinuosities of the coast could be
traced far as the eye could see; the lines were manned;
and the word was again given to move. Roswell now felt
that he was engaged in much the most delicate of all his
duties. The desperate run through the fleet of bergs, and
the second attempt to get to sea, were not in certain
particulars
as hazardous as this. The field had been setting
back and forth now, for several weeks; the margin of clear
water increasing by the attrition at each return to the
rocks; and it was known by observation that these changes
often occurred at very short notices. Should the wind haul
round with the sun, or one of the unaccountable currents
of those seas intervene before the south-east cape was
reached, the schooner would probably be broken into
splinters
,
or ground into powder, in the course of some two or
three hours. It was all-important, therefore, to lose not a
moment.
Several times in the course of the first hour, the
movement
of the schooner was arrested by the want of sufficient
room to pass between projecting points in the cliffs and the
edge of the ice. On two of these occasions passages were
cut with the saw, the movement of the field not answering
to the impatience of the sealers. At the end of that most
momentous hour, however, the craft had been hauled ahead
a mile and a half, and had reached a curvature in the coast
where the margin of open water was more than fifty fathoms
wide, and the tracking of the vessel became easy and rapid.
By two o'clock the Sea Lion was at what might be called
the bottom of the Great Bay, some three or four leagues
from the cove, and at the place where the long low cape
began to run out in a south-easterly direction. As the
wind could now be felt over the rocks, the foretopsail was
set, as well as the lower sails, the latter being mainly
becalmed
,
however, by the land; when the people were all
taken on board, the craft moving faster under her canvass
than by means of the hauling lines. The wind was very
fresh, and in half an hour more the south-east cape came
in sight, close as were the navigators to the rocks. Ten
minutes later, the Sea Lion was under reefed sails,
stretching
off to the southward and eastward, in perfectly clear
water!
At first, Roswell Gardiner was disposed to rejoice, under
the impression that his greatest labour had been achieved.
A better look at the state of things around him, however,
taught the disheartening lesson of humility, by
demonstrating
that they had in truth but just commenced.
Although there was scarcely any field-ice to the
southward
of the group, and in its immediate neighbourhood,
there was a countless number of bergs. It is true, these
floating mountains did not come very near the passage, for
the depth of water just there usually brought them up ere
they could get into it; nevertheless, a large fleet of them
was blockading the entire group, far as the eye could reach,
looking east, west and south, or along the whole line of the
southern coast. It was at first questionable whether, and
soon after it became certain, that the schooner could never
beat through such dangers. Had the wind been fair, the
difficulty would have been insurmountable; but ahead, and
blowing a little gale, the matter was out of the question.
Some other course must be adopted.
There was a choice of alternatives. One was to go
entirely
round the whole group, passing to the eastward of
the volcano, where no one of the party had ever been; and
the other was to follow the eastern margin of the bay,
keeping
inside of it, and trusting to finding some opening by
which the schooner could force her way into clear water
to the northward. After a very brief consultation with his
mates, Roswell decided on attempting the last.
As the course now to be steered was almost dead before
the wind, the little craft, lightened of so much of her upper
works, almost flew through the water. The great source
of apprehension felt by our young men in attempting this
new expedient, was in the probability that the field would
drift home to the rocks in the north-east quarter of the
bay, which, with a south-west wind, was necessarily a
quarter
to leeward. Should this prove to be the case, it might
be found impossible to pass ahead, and the schooner would
be caught in a
cul de sac;
since it would not be in the
power of her people to track her back again in the teeth of
so strong a wind. Notwithstanding these probabilities, on
Roswell went; for he saw plain enough that at such a
moment
almost anything was better than indecision.
The rate at which the little craft was flying before a
fresh gale, in perfectly smooth water, soon put our sealers
in a better condition to form closer estimates of their
chances. The look-outs aloft, one of whom was Hazard,
the first officer, sent down on deck constant reports of what
they could see.
How does it look ahead, now, Mr. Hazard? demanded
Roswell, about five in the afternoon, just as his schooner
was coming close under the smoking sides of the volcano,
which had always been an object of interest to him, though
he had never found time to visit it before. Is there no
danger of our touching the ground, close in as we are to
this island?
I think not, sir; when I landed here, we kept the lead
going the whole time, and we got two fathoms quite up to
the shore. In my judgment, Captain Gar'ner, we may run
down along this land as bold as lions.
And how does it look ahead? I've no wish to get
jammed here, close aboard of a volcano, which may be
choking us all with its smoke before we know where we
are.
Not much danger of that, sir, with this wind. These
volcanoes are nothin' but playthings, a'ter all. The vapour
is driving off towards the north-east_____That was a crack,
with a vengeance!
Just as Hazard was boasting of the innocuous character
of a volcano, that near them fired a gun, as the men
afterwards
called it, casting into the air a large flight of cinders
and stones, accompanied by a sharp flash of flame. All
the lighter materials drove away to leeward, but the
heavier
followed the law of projectiles, and scattered in all
directions. Several stones of some size fell quite close to
the schooner, and a few smaller actually came down on her
decks.
It will never do to stop here to boil our pot, cried
Roswell to the mate. We must get away from this, Mr.
Hazard, as fast as the good craft can travel!
Get away it is, sir. There is nothing very near ahead
to stop us; though it does look more toward the east cape
as if the field was jammed in that quarter.
Keep all your eyes about you, sir; and look out
especially
for any opening among the smaller islands ahead. I
am not without hope that the currents which run among
them may give us a clear passage in that quarter.
These words explain precisely that which did actually
occur. On went the schooner, almost brushing the base of
the volcano, causing Roswell many a bound of the heart,
when he fancied she must strike; but she went clear. All
this time, it was crack, crack, crack, from the crater,
rumbling
sounds and heavy explosions; the last attended by
flames, and smoke of a pitchy darkness. A dozen times the
Sea Lion had very narrow escapes when nearest to the
danger, stones of a weight to pass through her decks and
bottom falling even on the ice outside of her; but that hand
which had so benevolently stayed various other evils, was
stretched forth to save, and nothing touched the schooner
16*
of a size to do any injury. These escapes made a deep
impression on Roswell. Until the past winter he had been
accustomed to look upon things and events as matters of
course. This vacant indifference, so common to men in
prosperity, was extended even to the sublimest exhibition
of the Almighty power; our hero seeing nothing in the
firmament of heaven, of a clear night, but the twinkling
lights that seemed to him to be placed there merely to
garnish
and illumine the darkness of this globe. Now, how
differently did he look upon natural objects, and their
origin! If it were only an insect, his mind presented its
wonderful mechanism, its beauty, its uses. No star seemed
less than what science has taught us that it is; and the
power of the Dread Being who had created all, who
governed
all, and who was judge of all, became an
inseparable
subject of contemplation, as he looked upon the least
of his works. Feelings thus softened and tempered by
humility, easily led their subject to the reception of those
leading articles of the Christian faith which have been
consecrated
by the belief of the church catholic since the ages
of miraculous guidance, and which are now venerable by
time. Bold and presuming is he who fancies that his
intellect
can rectify errors of this magnitude and antiquity,
and that the church of God has been permitted to wallow
on in a most fatal idolatry for centuries, to be extricated
by the pretending syllogisms of his one-sided and narrow
philosophy!
The people of the Sea Lion were less affected by what
they saw than their young commander. Their hearts were
light with the prospect of a speedy release from the
hardships
and dangers they had undergone; and, at each
explosion
of the volcano, as soon as out of reach of the falling
stones, they laughed, and asserted that the mountain was
firing a salute in honour of their departure. Such is the
difference between men whose hearts and spirits have
submitted
to the law of faith, and those who live on in the
recklessness of the passing events of life!
The schooner was racing past a rocky islet, beginning
to haul more on a wind, as she made the circuit of the
bay, just as Hazard came to the conclusion that the field
had drifted home on the outer island of the group, and
that it would be impossible to pass into clear water by
going on. Turning his head in quest of some bay, or other
secure place in which the craft might wait for a favourable
change, he saw a narrow opening to leeward of the islet he
had passed but a minute before; and, so far as he could
perceive, one that led directly out to sea.
It was too late to keep away for the entrance of the
passage, the ice being too close at hand to leeward; but,
most fortunately, there was room to tack. A call to
Roswell
soon caused the schooner to be close on a wind; down
went her helm, and round she came like a top. Sail was
shortened in stays, and by the time the little craft was
ready to fall off for the passage, she had nothing on her
but a foretopsail, jib, and a close-reefed mainsail. Under
this canvass she glided along, almost brushing the rocks
of the islet, but without touching. In twenty minutes
more she was clear of the group altogether, and in open
water!
That night some embarrassment was encountered from
broken field-ice, of which the ocean was pretty full; but
by exercising great vigilance, no serious thump occurred.
Fortunately the period of darkness was quite short, the
twilight being of great length both mornings and evenings;
and the re-appearance of the sun cast a cheerful glow on
the face of the troubled waters.
The wind held at south-west for three days, blowing
heavily the whole time. By the second night-fall the sea
was clear of ice, and everything was carried on the schooner
that she could bear. About nine o'clock on the morning
of the fourth day out, a speck was seen rising above the
ragged outline of the rolling waves; and each minute it
became higher and more distinct. An hour or two later,
the Sea Lion was staggering along before a westerly gale,
with the Hermit of Cape Horn on her larboard beam,
distant
three leagues. How many trying scenes and bitter
moments crowded on the mind of young Roswell
Gardiner
,
as he recalled all that had passed in the ten months
which intervened since he had come out from behind the
shelter of those wild rocks! Stormy as was that sea, and
terrible as was its name among mariners, coming, as he
did, from one still more stormy and terrible, he now
regarded
it as a sort of place of refuge. A winter there, he
well knew, would be no trifling undertaking; but he had
just passed a winter in a region where even fuel was not
to be found, unless carried there. Twenty days later the
Sea Lion sailed again from Rio, having sold all the
sea-elephant
oil that remained, and bought stores; of which,
by this time, the vessel was much in want. Most of the
portions of the provisions that were left had been damaged
by the thawing process; and food was getting to be
absolutely
necessary to her people, when the schooner went
again into the noble harbour of the capital of Brazil.
Then succeeded the lassitude and calms that reign about
the imaginary line that marks the circuit of the earth, at
that point which is ever central as regards the sun, and
where the days and nights are always equal. No
inclination
of the earth's axis to the plane of its orbit affected the
climate there, which knew not the distinctions of summer
and winter; or which, if they did exist at all, were so
faintly marked as to be nearly imperceptible.
Twenty days later the schooner was standing among
some low sandy keys, under short canvass, and in the
south-east trades. By her movements an anchorage was
sought; and one was found at last, where the craft was
brought up, boats were hoisted out, and Roswell Gardiner
landed.
CHAPTER XIV.
`If every ducat in six thousand ducats
Were in six parts, and every part a ducat,
I would not draw them; I would have my bond.
Shakspeare
.
The
earth had not stopped in its swift race round the
sun at Oyster Pond, while all these events were in the
course of occurrence in the antarctic seas. The summer
had passed, that summer which was to have brought back
the sealers; and autumn had come to chill the hopes as
well as the body. Winter did not bring any change.
Nothing
was heard of Roswell and his companions, nor
could
anything have been heard of them short of the intervention
of a miracle.
Mary Pratt no longer mentioned Roswell in her prayers.
She fully believed him to be dead; and her puritanical
creed taught her that this, the sweetest and most endearing
of all the rites of Christianity, was allied to a belief that it
was sacrilege to entertain. We pretend not to any distinct
impressions on this subject ourselves, beyond a sturdy
protestant
disinclination to put any faith in the abuses of
purgatory
at least; but, most devoutly do we wish that such
petitions
could
have the efficacy that so large a portion of
the Christian world impute to them. But Mary Pratt, so
much better than we can lay any claim to be in all
essentials
,
was less liberal than ourselves on this great point of
doctrine. Roswell Gardiner's name now never passed her
lips in prayer, therefore; though scarce a minute went by
without his manly person being present to her
imagination
.
He still lived in her heart, a shrine from which she
made no effort to expel him.
As for the deacon, age, disease, and distress of mind,
had brought him to his last hours. The passions which had
so engrossed him when in health, now turned upon his
nature
,
and preyed upon his vitals, like an ill-omened bird.
It is more than probable that he would have lived some
months, possibly some years longer, had not the evil spirit
of covetousness conspired to heighten the malady that
wasted his physical frame. As it was, the sands of life
were running low; and the skilful Dr. Sage, himself, had
admitted to Mary the improbability that her uncle and
protector
could long survive.
It is wonderful how the interest in a rich man suddenly
revives among his relatives and possible heirs, as his last
hour draws near. Deacon Pratt was known to be wealthy
in a small way; was thought to possess his thirty or forty
thousand dollars, which was regarded as wealth among the
east-enders thirty years since; and every human being in
Old Suffolk, whether of its overwhelming majority or of its
more select and wiser minority, who could by legal
possibility
claim any right to be remembered by the dying man,
crowded around his bed-side. At that moment, Mary Pratt,
who had so long nursed his diseases and mitigated his
sufferings
,
was compelled to appear as a very insignificant and
secondary person. Others who stood in the same degree
of consanguinity to the dying man, and two, a brother and
sister, who were even one degree closer, had
their
claims,
and were by no means disposed to suffer them to be
forgotten
.
Gladly would poor Mary have prayed by her uncle's
bed-side; but Parson Whittle had assumed this solemn
duty, it being deemed proper that one who had so long
filled the office of deacon, should depart with a proper
attention
to the usages of his meeting. Some of the relatives
who had lately appeared, and who were not so conversant
with the state of things between the deacon and his divine,
complained among themselves that the latter made too
many ill-timed allusions to the pecuniary wants of the
congregation
;
and that he had, in particular, almost as much
as asked the deacon to make a legacy that would enable
those who were to stay behind, to paint the meeting-house,
erect a new horse-shed, purchase some improved stoves,
and reseat the body of the building. These modest
requests
,
it was whisperedfor all passed in whispers then
would consume not less than a thousand dollars of the
deacon's
hard earnings; and the thing was mentioned as a
wrong done him who was about to descend into the grave,
where nought of earth could avail him in any way.
Close was the siege that was laid to Deacon Pratt, during
the last week of his life. Many were the hints given of the
necessity of his making a will, though the brother and
sister, estimating their rights as the law established them,
said but little on the subject, and that little was rather
against the propriety of annoying a man, in their brother's
condition, with business of so perplexing a nature. The
fact that these important personages set their faces against
the scheme had due weight, and most of the relatives began
to calculate the probable amount of their respective shares
under the law of distribution, as it stood in that day. This
excellent and surpassingly wise community of New York
had not then reached the pass of exceeding liberality
towards
which it is now so rapidly tending. In that day, the
debtor was not yet thought of, as the creditor's next heir,
and that plausible and impracticable desire of a false
philanthropy
,
which is termed the Homestead Exemption Law
impracticable as to anything like a just and equitable
exemption of equal amount in all cases of indebtedness
was not yet dreamed of. New York was then a sound and
healthful community; making its mistakes, doubtless, as
men ever will err; but the control of things had not yet
passed into the hands of sheer political empirics, whose
ignorance and quackery were stimulated by the lowest
passion
for majorities. Among other things that were then
respected, were wills; but it was not known to a single
individual, among all those who thronged the dwelling of
Deacon Pratt, that the dying man had ever mustered the
self-command necessary to make such an instrument. He
was free to act, but did not choose to avail himself of his
freedom. Had he survived a few years, he would have
found himself in the enjoyment of a liberty so sublimated,
that he could not lease, or rent a farm, or collect a common
debt, without coming under the harrow of the tiller of the
political soil.
The season had advanced to the early part of April, and
that is usually a soft and balmy month on the sea-shore,
though liable to considerable and sudden changes of
temperature
.
On the day to which we now desire to transfer
the scene, the windows of the deacon's bed-room were
open, and the soft south wind fanned his hollow and pallid
cheek. Death was near, though the principle of life
struggled
hard with the King of Terrors. It was now that that
bewildered and Pharasaical faith which had so long held
this professor of religion in a bondage even more oppressive
than open and announced sins, most felt the insufficiency
of the creed in which he had rather been speculating than
trusting all his life, to render the passing hour composed
and secure. There had always been too much of self in
Deacon Pratt's moral temperament, to render his belief as
humble and devout as it should be. It availed him not a
hair, now, that he was a deacon, or that he had made long
prayers in the market-places, where men could see him, or
that he had done so much, as he was wont to proclaim, for
example's sake. All had not sufficed to cleanse his heart
of worldly-mindedness, and he now groped about him, in
the darkness of a faith obscured, for the true light that was
to illumine his path to another world.
The doctor had ordered the room cleared of all, but two
or three of the dying man's nearest relatives. Among
these last, however, was the gentle and tender-hearted
Mary, who loved to be near her uncle, in this his greatest
need. She no longer thought of his covetousness, of his
griping usury, of his living so much for self and so little
for God. While hovering about the bed, a message reached
her that Baiting Joe wished to see her, in the passage that
led to the bed-room. She went to this old fisherman, and
found him standing near a window that looked towards the
east, and which consequently faced the waters of Gardiner's
Bay.
There she is, Miss Mary, said Joe, pointing out of
the window, his whole face in a glow, between joy and
whiskey. It should be told to the deacon at once, that
his last hours might be happier than some that he has
passed lately. That's she  though, at first, I did not
know her.
Mary saw a vessel standing in towards Oyster Pond, and
her familiarity with objects of that nature was such, as to
tell her at once that it was a schooner; but so completely
had she given up the Sea Lion, that it did not occur to her
that this could be the long-missing craft.
At what are you pointing, Joe? the wondering girl
asked, with perfect innocence.
At that craftat the Sea Lion of Sterling, which has
been so long set down as missing, but which has turned
up, just as her owner is about to cast off from this 'arth,
altogether.
Joe might have talked for an hour: he did chatter away
for two or three minutes, with his head and half his body
out of the window, uninterrupted by Mary, who sank into
a chair, to prevent falling on the floor. At length the dear
girl commanded herself, and spoke.
You cannot possibly be certain, Joe, she said; that
schooner does not look, to me, like the Sea Lion.
Nor to me, in some things, while in other some she
does. Her upper works seem strangely out of shape, and
there's precious little on 'em. But no other fore-taw-sail
schooner ever comes in this-a-way, and I know of none
likely to do it. Ay, by Jupiter, there goes the very blue
peter I helped to make with my own hands, and it was
agreed to set it, as the deacon's signal. There's no
mistake
,
now!
Joe might have talked half an hour longer without any
fear of interruption, for Mary had vanished to her own
room, leaving him with his head and body still out of the
window, making his strictures and conjectures for some
time longer; while the person to whom he fancied he was
speaking, was, in truth, on her knees, rendering thanks to
God! An hour later, all doubt was removed, the schooner
coming in between Oyster Pond and Shelter Island, and
making the best of her way to the well-known wharf.
Is n't it wonderful, Mary, exclaimed the deacon, in a
hollow voice, it is true, but with an animation and force
that did not appear to have any immediate connection with
deathis n't it wonderful that Gar'ner should come back,
after all! If he has only done his duty by me, this will
be the greatest ventur' of my whole life; it will make the
evening of my days comfortable. I hope I've always been
grateful for blessings, and I'm sure I'm grateful, from the
bottom of my heart, for this. Give me prosperity, and I'm
not apt to forget it. They've been asking me to make a
will, but I told 'em I was too poor to think of any such
thing; and, now my schooner has got back, I s'pose I shall
get more hints of the same sort. Should anything happen
to me, Mary, you can bring out the sealed paper I gave
you to keep, and that must satisfy 'em all. You'll
remember
,
it is addressed to Gar'ner. There is n't much in it,
and it won't be much thought of, I fancy; but, such as it
is, 'tis the last instrument I sign, unless I get better. To
think of Gar'ner's coming back, after all! It has put new
life in me, and I shall be about, ag'in, in a week, if he has
only not forgotten the key, and the hidden treasure!
Mary Pratt's heart had not been so light for many a
weary day, but it grieved her to be a witness of this
lingering
longing after the things of the world. She knew that
not only her uncle's days, but that his very hours, were
numbered; and that, notwithstanding this momentary
flickering of the lamp, in consequence of fresh oil being
Vol. II.  17
poured into it, the wick was nearly consumed, and that it
must shortly go out, let Roswell's success be what it might.
The news of the sudden and unlooked-for return of a vessel
so long believed to be lost, spread like wildfire over the
whole point, and greatly did it increase the interest of the
relatives in the condition of the dying man. If he was a
subject of great concern before, doubly did he become so
now. A vessel freighted with furs would have caused
much excitement of itself; but, by some means or other,
the deacon's great secret of the buried treasure had leaked
out, most probably by means of some of his lamentations
during his illness, and, though but imperfectly known, it
added largely to the expectations connected with the
unlooked-for
return of the schooner. In short, it would not
have been easy to devise a circumstance that should serve
to increase the liveliness of feeling that, just then, prevailed
on the subject of Deacon Pratt and his assets, than the
arrival of the Sea Lion, at that precise moment.
And arrive she did, that tempest-tossed, crippled,
ice-bound
,
and half-burned little craft, after roaming over an
extent of ocean that would have made up half a dozen
ordinary
sea voyages. It was, in truth, the schooner so well
known to the reader, that was now settling away her
mainsail
and jib, as she kept off, under her fore-topsail alone,
towards the wharf, on which every human being who could,
with any show of propriety, be there at such a moment,
was now collected, in a curious and excited crowd.
Altogether
,
including boys and females, there must have been
not less than a hundred persons on that wharf; and among
them were most of the anxious relatives who were in
attendance
on the vessel's owner, in his last hours. By a
transition that was natural enough, perhaps, under the
circumstances
,
they had transferred their interest in the
deacon
to this schooner, which they looked upon as an
inanimate
portion of an investment that would soon have little
that was animate about it.
Baiting Joe was a sort of oracle, in such circumstances.
He had passed his youth at sea, having often doubled the
Horn, and was known to possess a very respectable amount
of knowledge on the subject of vessels of all sorts and sizes,
rig and qualities. He was now consulted by all who could
get near him, as a matter of course, and his opinions were
received as
res adjudicata
, as the lawyers have it.
That's the boat, said Joe, affecting to call the Sea
Lion by a diminutive, as a proof of regard; yes, that's
the craft, herself; but she is wonderfully deep in the water!
I never seed a schooner of her tonnage, come in from a
v'y'ge, with her scuppers so near awash. Don't you think,
Jim, there must be suthin' heavier than skins, in her hold,
to bring her down so low in the water?
Jim was another loafer, who lived by taking clams,
oysters
,
fish, and the other treasures of the surrounding bays.
He was by no means as high authority as Baiting Joe;
still he was always authority on a wharf.
I never seed the like on't, answered Jim. That
schooner must ha' made most of her passage under water.
She's as deep as one of our coasters comin' in with a load
o'brick!
She's deep; but not as deep as a craft I once made a
cruise in. I was aboard of the first of Uncle Sam's
gun-boats
,
that crossed the pond to Gibraltar. When we got
in, it made the Mediterranean stare, I can tell you! We
had furrin officers aboard us, the whull time, lookin' about,
and wonderin', as they called it, if we wasn't amphibbies.
What's that? demanded Jim, rather hastily. There's
no sich rope in the ship.
I know that well enough; but an amphibby, as I
understand
it, is a new sort of whale, that comes up to breathe,
like all of that family, as old Dr. Mitchell, of Cow Neck,
calls the critturs. So the furrin officers thought we must
be of the amphibby family, to live so much under water,
as it seemed to them. It was wet work, I can tell you,
boys; I don't think I got a good breath more than once an
hour, the whull of the first day we was out. One of the
furrin officers asked our captain how the gun-boat steered.
He wasn't a captain, at allonly a master, you see, and
we all called him Jumpin' Billy. So Jumpin' Billy says,
`Don't know, sir.' `What! crossed the Atlantic in her,
and don't know how your craft steers!' says the furrin
officer
,
says heand well he might, Jim, since nothin' that
ever lived could go from Norfolk to Gibraltar, without
some
attention to the helmbut Jumpin' Billy had another
story to tell. `No, sir; don't know,' he answered. `You
see, sir, a nor-wester took us right aft, as we cleared the
capes, and down she dove, with her nose under and her
starn out, and she come across without having a chance to
try the rudder.'
This story, which Joe had told at least a hundred times
before, and which, by the way, is said to be true, produced
the usual admiration, especially among the crowd of
legatees-expectant
,
to most of whom it was quite new. When
the laugh went out, which it soon did of itself, Joe pursued
a subject that was of more interest to most of his auditors,
or rather to the principal personages among them.
Skins never brought a craft so low, that you may be
sartain of! he resumed. I've seed all sorts of vessels
stowed, but a hundred press-screws couldn't cram in furs
enough to bring a craft so low! To my eye, Jim, there's
suthin' unnat'ral about that schooner, a'ter all.
The study is scarce worthy of a diploma, but we will
take this occasion to say, for the benefit of certain foreign
writers, principally of the female sex, who fancy they
represent
Americanisms, that the vulgar of the great republic,
and it is admitted there are enough of the class, never say
summat or somethink, which are low English, but
not low American, dialect. The in-and-in Yankee says
suth-in. In a hundred other words have these
ambitious
ladies done injustice to our vulgar, who are not
vulgar
,
according to the laws of Cockayne, in the smallest
degree.
The
Broadway, for instance, is no more used
by an American than
the
Congress, or the United
States of
North
America.
Perhaps, answered Jim, 'tisn't the Sea Lion, a'ter
all. There's a family look about all the craft some men
build, and this may be a sort of relation of our missin'
schooner.
I'll not answer for the craft, though that's her blue
peter, and them's her mast-heads, and I turned in that
taw-sail halyard-block with my own hands.I'll tell you
what, Jim, there's been a wrack, or a nip, up yonder,
among the ice, and this schooner has been built anew out
of that there schooner. You see if it don't turn out as I
tell you. Ay, and there's Captain Gar'ner, himself, alive
and well, just comin' forrard.
A little girl started with this news, and was soon
pouring
it into the willing ears and open heart of the weeping
and grateful Mary. An hour later, Roswell held the latter in
his arms; for at such a moment, it was not possible for the
most scrupulous of the sex to affect coldness and reserve,
where there was so much real tenderness and love. While
folding Mary to his heart, Roswell whispered in her ears
the blessed words that announced his own humble
submission
to the faith which accepted Christ as the Son of God.
Too well did the gentle and ingenuous girl understand the
sincerity and frankness of her lover's nature, to doubt what
he said, or in any manner to distrust the motive. That
moment was the happiest of her short and innocent life!
But the welcome tidings had reached the deacon, and
ere Roswell had an opportunity of making any other
explanations
but those which assured Mary that he had come
back all that she wished him to be, both of them were
summoned to the bed-side of the dying man. The effect
of the excitement on the deacon was so very great as
almost
to persuade the expectant legatees that their visit
was premature, and that they might return home, to
renew
it at some future day. It is painful to find it our
duty to draw sketches that shall contain such pictures of
human nature; but with what justice could we represent
the loathsome likeness of covetousness, hovering over a
grave, and omit the resemblances of those who surrounded
it? Mary Pratt, alone, of all that extensive family
connection
,
felt and thought as Christianity, and womanly
affection, and reason, dictated. All the rest saw nothing
but the possessor of a considerable property, who was
about to depart for that unknown world, into which nothing
could be taken from this, but the divine and abused spirit
which had been fashioned in the likeness of God.
Welcome, Gar'nerwelcome home, ag'in! exclaimed
the deacon, so heartily as quite to deceive the young man
as to the real condition of his owner; a mistake that was,
perhaps, a little unfortunate, as it induced him to be more
frank than might otherwise have been the case. I
couldn't find it in my heart to give you up, and have, all
17*
along, believed that we should yet have good news from
you. The Gar'ners are a reliable family, and that was one
reason why I chose you to command my schooner. Them
Daggetts are a torment, but we never should have known
anything about the islands, or the key, hadn't it been for
one one 'em!
As the deacon stopped to breathe, Mary turned away
from the bed, grieved at heart to see the longings of the
world thus clinging to the spirit of one who probably had
not another hour to live. The glazed but animated eye,
a cheek which resembled a faded leaf of the maple laid on
a cold and whitish stone, and lips that had already begun
to recede from the teeth, made a sad, sad picture, truly,
to look upon at such a moment; yet, of all present, Mary
Pratt alone felt the fullness of the incongruity, and alone
bethought her of the unreasonableness of encouraging
feelings
like those which were now uppermost in the deacon's
breast. Even minister Whittle had a curiosity to know
how much was added to the sum-total of Deacon Pratt's
assets, by the return of a craft that had so long been set
down among the missing. When all eyes, therefore, were
turned in curiosity on the handsome face of the fine manly
youth who now stood at the bed-side of the deacon,
including
those of brother and sister, of nephews and nieces, of
cousins and friends, those of this servant of the most high
God was of the number, and not the least expressive of
solicitude and expectation. As soon as the deacon had
caught a little breath, and had swallowed a restorative that
the hired nurse had handed to him, his eager thoughts
reverted
to the one engrossing theme of his whole life.
These are all friends, Gar'ner, he said; come to
visit me in a little sickness that I've been somewhat
subject
to, of late, and who will all be glad to hear of our
good fortune. So you've brought the schooner back, a'ter
all, Gar'ner, and will disapp'int the Sag Harbour
ship-owners
,
who have been all along foretelling that we should
never see her ag'in:brought her backha! Gar'ner?
Only in part, Deacon Pratt. We have had good luck
and bad luck since we left you, and have only brought
home the best part of the craft.
The best part said the deacon, gulping his words,
in a way that compelled him to pause; The best part!
What, in the name of property, has become of the rest?
The rest was burned, sir, to keep us from freezing to
death. Roswell then gave a brief, but very clear and
intelligible
account of what had happened, and of the manner
in which he had caused the hulk of the deacon's Sea Lion
to be raised upon by the materials furnished by the Sea
Lion of the Vineyard. The narrative brought Mary Pratt
back to the side of the bed, and caused her calm eyes to
become riveted intently on the speaker's face. As for the
deacon, he might have said, with Shakspeare's Wolsey,
Had I but served my God with half the zeal
I served my king, he would not, in mine age,
Have left me naked to mine enemies.
His fall was not that of a loss of power, it is true, but it
was that of a still more ignoble passion, covetousness. As
Roswell proceeded, his mind represented one source of
wealth after another released from his clutch, until it was
with a tremulous voice, and a countenance from which all
traces of animation had fled, that he ventured again to
speak.
Then I may look upon my ventur' as worse than
nothing? he said. The insurers will raise a question
about paying for a craft that has been rebuilt in this way,
and the Vineyard folks will be sartain to put in a claim of
salvage, both on account of two of their hands helping you
with the work, and on account of the materials  and we
with no cargo, as an offset to it all!
No, deacon, it is not quite as bad as that, resumed
Roswell. We have brought home a good lot of skins;
enough to pay the people full wages and to return you
every cent of outfit, with a handsome advance on the
venture
.
A sealer usually makes a good business of it, if she
falls in with seals. Our cargo, in skins, can't be worth
less than $20,000; besides half a freight left on the island,
for which another craft may be sent.
That is suthin', the Lord be praised! ejaculated the
deacon. Though the schooner is as bad as gone, and
the outlays have been awfully heavy, I'm almost afraid to
go any further. Gar'ner,  did you  I grow weak very
fast  did you stop  Mary, I wish
you
would put the
question.
I am afraid that my uncle means to ask if you stopped
at the Key, in the West Indies, according to your
instructions
,
Roswell? the niece said, and most reluctantly, for
she plainly saw it was fully time her uncle ceased to think
of the things of this life, and to begin to turn all his
thoughts on the blessed mediation, and another state of
being.
I forgot no part of your orders, sir, rejoined Roswell.
It was my duty to obey them, and I believe I have done
so to the letter
Stop, Gar'ner, interrupted the dying man  one
question, while I think of it. Will the Vineyard men have
any claim of salvage on account of them skins?
Certainly not, sir. These skins are all our ownwere
taken, cured, stowed, and brought home altogether by
ourselves
.
There is a lot of skins belonging to the
Vineyarders
,
stowed away in the house, which is yours, deacon,
and which it would well pay any small craft to go and
bring away. If anybody is to claim salvage, it will be
ourselves. No salvage was demanded for the loss off Cape
Henlopen, I trust?
No, noneDaggett behaved what I call
liberal
in that
affair,half the critics of the day would use the adjective
instead of the adverb here, and why should Deacon Pratt's
English be any better than his neighbours?and so I've
admitted to his friends over on the Vineyard. But, Gar'ner,
our great affair still remains to be accounted for. Do you
wish to have the room cleared before you speak of that
shall we turn the
key
on all these folks, and then settle
accountshe! he! he!
The deacon's facetiousness sounded strangely out of
place to Roswell; still, he did not exactly know how to
gainsay his wishes. There might be an indiscretion in
pursuing his narrative before so many witnesses, and the
young man paused until the room was cleared, leaving no
one in it but the sick man, Mary, himself, and the nurse.
The last could not well be gotten rid of on Oyster Pond,
where her office gave her an assumed right to know all
family secrets; or, what was the same thing to her, to
fancy
that she knew them. Among all the sayings which
the experience of mankind has reduced to axioms, there is
not one more just than that which says, There are secrets
in all families. These secrets the world commonly affects
to know all about, but we think few will have reached the
age of threescore without becoming convinced of how
much pretending ignorance there is in this assumption of
the world.
Tot ou tard tout se scait
, is a significant
saying of our old friends, the French, who know as much
of things in practice as any other people on the face of the
earth; but
tot ou tard tout ne se scait pas
.
Is the door shut? asked the deacon, tremulously, for
eagerness, united to debility, was sadly shaking his whole
frame. See that the door is shut tight, Mary; this is our
own secret, and nurse must remember that.
Mary assured him that they were alone, and turned away
in sorrow from the bed.
Now, Gar'ner, resumed the deacon, open your whole
heart, and let us know all about it.
Roswell hesitated to reply; for he, too, was shocked at
witnessing this instance of a soul's clinging to mammon,
when on the very eve of departing for the unknown world.
There was a look in the glazed and sunken eyes of the old
man, that reminded him unpleasantly of that snapping of
the eyes which he had so often seen in Daggett.
You did n't forget the key, surely, Gar'ner? asked the
deacon, anxiously.
No, sir; we did our whole duty by that part of the
voyage.
Did you find itwas the place accurately described?
No chart could have made it better. We lost a month
in looking for the principal land-mark, which had been
altered by the weather; but, that once found, the rest was
easy. The difficulty we met with in starting, has brought
us home so late in the spring.
Never mind the spring, Gar'ner; the part that is past
is sartain to come round ag'in, in due time. And so you
found the very key that was described by Daggett?
We did, sir; and just where he described it to be.
And how about the tree, and the little hillock of sand,
at its foot?
Both were there, deacon. The hillock must have
grown a good deal, by reason of the shifting sand; but, all
things considered, the place was well enough described.
Well  well  well  you opened the hillock, of
course?
We did, sir; and found the box mentioned by the
pirate.
A good large box, I'll warrant ye! Them pirates
seldom do things by halveshe! he! he!
I can't say much for the size of the box, deacon  it
looked to me as if it had once held window-glass, and that
of rather small dimensions.
But, the contentsyou do not mention the contents.
They are here, sir, taking a small bag from his pocket,
and laying it on the bed, by the deacon's side. The
pieces are all of gold, and there are just one hundred and
forty-three of them.  Heavy doubloons, it is true, and I
dare say well worth their 16 dollars each.
The deacon gave a gulp, as if gasping for breath, at the
same time that he clutched the bag. The next instant he
was dead; and there is much reason to believe that the
demons who had watched him, and encouraged him in his
besetting sin, laughed at this consummation of their
malignant
arts! If angels in heaven did not mourn at this
characteristic
departure of a frail spirit from its earthly
tenement
,
one who had many of their qualities did. Heavy
had been the load on Mary Pratt's heart, at the previous
display of her uncle's weakness, and profound was now her
grief at his having made such an end.
CHAPTER XV.
4
Cit.
We'll hear the will: Read it, Mark Antony.
Cit.
The will, the will; we will hear Csar's will.
Ant.
Have patience, gentle friends, I must not read it;
It is not meet you know how Csar loved you.
Julius Csar
.
There
is usually great haste, in this country, in getting
rid of the dead. In no other part of the world, with
which we are acquainted, are funerals so simple, or so
touching; placing the judgment and sins which lead to it,
in a far more conspicuous light than rank, or riches, or
personal merits. Scarfs and gloves are given in town, and
gloves in the country, though scarfs are rare; but, beyond
these, and the pall, and the hearse, and the weeping friends,
an American funeral is a very unpretending procession of
persons in their best attire; on foot, when the distance is
short; in carriages, in wagons, and on horseback, when
the grave is far from the dwelling. There is, however,
one feature connected with a death in this country, that
we could gladly see altered. It is the almost indecent
haste, which so generally prevails, to get rid of the dead.
Doubtless the climate has had an effect in establishing this
custom; but the climate, by no means, exacts the
precipitancy
that is usually practised.
As there were so many friends from a distance present,
some of whom took the control of affairs, Mary shrinking
back into herself, with a timidity natural to her sex and
years, the moment her care could no longer serve her
uncle, the funeral of the deacon took place the day after
that of his death. It was the solemn and simple ceremony
of the country. The Rev. Mr. Whittle conceived that he
ought to preach a sermon on the occasion of the
extinguishment
of this bright and shining light, and the body
was carried to the meeting-house, where the whole
congre-gation
assembled, it being the Sabbath. We cannot say
much for the discourse, which had already served as eulo
giums on two or three other deacons, with a simple substi
tution of names. In few things are the credulous more
imposed on than in this article of sermons. A clergyman
shall preach the workings of other men's brains for years,
and not one of his hearers detect the imposition, purely on
account of the confiding credit it is customary to yield to
the pulpit. In this respect, preaching is very much like
reviewing
,the
listener, or the reader, being too complaisant
to see through the great standing mystifications of either.
Yet preaching is a work of high importance to men, and
one that doubtless accomplishes great good, more
especially
when the life of the preacher corresponds with his
doctrine; and even reviewing, though infinitely of less
moment, might be made a very useful art, in the hands of
upright, independent, intelligent, and learned men. But
nothing in this world is as it should be, and centuries will
probably roll over it ere the good time shall really
come!
The day of the funeral being the Sabbath, nothing that
touched on business was referred to. On the following
morning, however, the friends assembled early in the
parlour, and an excuse for being a little pressing was
made, on the ground that so many present had so far to
go. The deacon had probably made a remove much more
distant than any that awaited his relatives.
It is right to look a little into the deacon's matters
before we separate, said Mr. Job Pratt, who, if he had the
name, had not the patience of him of old, in order to
save trouble and hard feelings. Among relatives and
friends there should be nothing but confidence and
affection
,
and I am sure I have no other sentiments toward any
here. I supposeall Mr. Job Pratt knew, was ever on a
suppositionI suppose I am the proper person to
administer
to the deacon's property, though I don't wish to
do it, if there's the least objection.
Every one assented that he was the most proper person,
for all knew he was the individual the surrogate would be
the most likely to appoint.
I have never set down the deacon's property as
anything
like what common report makes it, resumed Mr.
Job Pratt; though I do suppose it will fully reach ten
thousand dollars.
La! exclaimed a female cousin, and a widow, who
had expectations of her own, I'd always thought Deacon
Pratt worth forty or fifty thousand dollars! Ten thousand
dollars won't make much for each of us, divided up among
so many folks!
The division will not be so very great, Mrs. Martin,
returned Mr. Job, as it will be confined to the next of
kin and their representatives. Unless a will should be
found  and, by all I can learn, there is
none
emphasizing
the last word with point  unless a will be found,
the whole estate, real and personal, must be divided into
just five shares; which, accordin' to my calculation, would
make about two thousand dollars a share. No great fortin,
to be sure; though a comfortable addition to small means.
The deacon was cluss (Anglice, close); yes, he was cluss
all the Pratts are a little given to be cluss; but I don't
know that they are any the worse for it. It is well to be
curful (careful) of one's means, which are a trust given to
us by Divine Providence.
In this manner did Mr. Job Pratt often quiet his
conscience
for being as curful of his own as of other
person's
assets. Divine Providence, according to his morality,
made it as much a duty to transfer the dollar that was in
his neighbour's pocket to his own, as to watch it vigilantly
after the transposition has been effected.
A body should be curful, as you say, sir, returned
the Widow Martin; and for that reason I should like to
know if there isn't a will. I
know
the deacon set store by
me, and I can hardly think he has departed for another
world without bethinking him of his cousin Jenny, and of
her widowhood.
I'm afraid he has, Mrs. Martin  really afraid he has.
I can hear of no will. The doctor says he doubts if the
deacon could ever muster courage to write anything about
his own death, and that he has never heard of any will.
I understand Mary, that she has no knowledge of any will;
and I do not know where else to turn, in order to inquire.
Rev. Mr. Whittle thinks there
is
a will, I ought to say.
There
must
be a will, returned the parson, who was
on the ground again early, and on this very errand; I
feel certain of that from the many conversations I have
Vol. II.  18
held with the deceased. It is not a month since I spoke to
him of divers repairs that were necessary to each and all
of the parish buildings, including the parsonage. He agreed
to every word I said  admitted that we could not get on
another winter without a new horse-shed; and that the east
end of the parsonage ought to be shingled this coming
summer.
All of which may be very true, parson, without the
deacon's making a will, quietly, and we may now add
patiently
, observed Mr. Job.
I don't think so, returned the minister, with a warmth
that might have been deemed indiscreet, did it not relate
to the horse-shed, the parsonage, and the meeting-house,
all of which were public property, rather than to anything
in which he had a more direct legal interest. A pious
member of the church would hardly hold out the hopes that
Deacon Pratt has held out to me, for more than two years,
without meaning to make his words good in the end. I
think all will agree with me in that opinion.
Did the deacon, then, go so far as to promise to do any
thing? asked Mr. Job, a little timidly; for he was by no
means sure the answer might not be in the affirmative, in
which case he anticipated the worst.
Perhaps not, answered Minister Whittle, too
conscientious
to tell a downright lie, though sorely tempted so
to do. But a man may promise indirectly, as well as
directly. When I have a thing much at heart, and
converse
often about it with a person who can grant all I wish,
and that person listens as attentively as I could wish him
to do, I regard that as a promise; and, in church matters,
one of a very solemn nature.
All the Jesuits in the world do not get their educations
at Rome, or acknowledge Ignatius Loyola as the great
founder of their order. Some are to be found who have
never made a public profession of their faith and zeal, have
never assumed the tonsure, or taken the vows.
That's as folks think, quietly returned Mr. Job Pratt,
though he smiled in a manner so significant as to cause
Mrs. Martin a new qualm, as she grew more and more
apprehensive
that the property was, after all, to go by the
distribution law. Some folks think a promise ought to
be expressed, while others think it may be understood.
The law, I believe, commonly looks for the direct
expression
of any binding promise; and, in matters of this sort,
one made in writing, too, and that under a seal, and before
three responsible witnesses.
I wish a full inquiry might be made, to ascertain if
there be no will; put in the minister, anxiously.
I'm quite willing so to do, returned Mr. Job, whose
confidence and moral courage increased each instant.
Quite willing; and am rather anxious for it, if I could
only see where to go to inquire.
Does no one present know of any will made by the
deceased
?
demanded Minister Whittle, authoritatively.
A dead silence succeeded to the question. Eye met eye,
and there was great disappointment among the numerous
collaterals present, including all those who did not come in
as next of kin, or as their direct representatives. But the
Rev. Mr. Whittle had been too long and too keenly on the
scent of a legacy, to be thrown out of the hunt, just as he
believed the game was coming in sight.
It might be well to question each near relative
directly
,
he added. Mr. Job Pratt, do
you
know nothing of
any will?
Nothing whatever. At one time I did think the
deacon
meant to make his testament; but I conclude that he
must have changed his mind.
And you, Mrs. Thomas, turning to the sister  as
next of kin, I make the same inquiry of you!
I once talked with brother about it, answered this
relative
,
who was working away in a rocking-chair as if she
thought the earth might stop in its orbit, if she herself
ceased to keep in motion; but he gave me no satisfactory
answer  that is, nothin' that I call satisfactory. Had he
told me he
had
made a will, and given me a full shear,
(share), I should have been content; or, had he told me
that he had
not
made a will, and that the law would give
me a full shear, I should have been content. I look upon
myself as a person easily satisfied.
This was being explicit, and left little more to be
obtained
from the deacon's beloved and only surviving sister.
And you, Mary; do you know anything of a will made
by your uncle?
Mary shook her head; but there was no smile on her
features, for the scene was unpleasant to her.
Then no one present knows of any paper that the
deacon
left specially to be opened after his death? demanded
Rev. Mr. Whittle, putting the general question pretty much
at random.
A paper! cried Mary, hastily. Yes, I know
something
of a
paper
I thought you spoke of a will.
A will is commonly written on paper, now-a-days, Miss
Marybut, you have a
paper?
Uncle gave me a
paper
, and told me to keep till
Roswell
Gardiner came back; and, if he himself should not
then be living, to give it to himThe colour now
mounted
to the very temples of the pretty girl, and she seemed to
speak with greater deliberation and care. As I was to
give the paper to Roswell, I have always thought it related
to him. My uncle spoke of it to me as lately as the day
of his death.
That's the will, beyond a doubt! cried Rev. Mr.
Whittle, with more exultation than became his profession
and professions  Do you not think this may be Deacon
Pratt's will, Miss Mary?
Now Mary had never thought any such thing. She knew
that her uncle much wished her to marry Roswell, and had
all along fancied that the paper she held, which indeed was
contained in an envelop addressed to her lover, contained
some expression of his wishes on this to her the most
interesting
of all subjects, and nothing else. Mary Pratt
thought very little of her uncle's property, and still less of
its future disposition, while she thought a great deal of
Roswell Gardiner and of his suit. It was, consequently,
the most natural thing in the world that she should have
fallen into some such error as this. But, now that the
subject was brought to her mind in this new light, she
arose, went to her own room, and soon re-appeared with
the paper in her hand. Both Mr. Job Pratt and Rev. Mr.
Whittle offered to relieve her of the burthen; and the
former
,
by a pretty decided movement, did actually succeed
in getting possession of the documents. The papers were
done up in the form of a large business letter, was duly
sealed with wax, and was addressed to Mr. Roswell
Gardiner
,
Master of the Schooner Sea Lion, now absent on a
voyage. The superscription was read aloud, a little under
the influence of surprise; notwithstanding which, Mr. Job
Pratt was very coolly proceeding to open the packet,
precisely
as if it had been addressed to himself. In this
decided
step, Mrs. Martin, and Mrs. Thomas, and Rev. Mr.
Whittle, might be set down as accessories before the act;
for each approached; and so eager were the two women,
that they actually assisted in breaking the seal.
If that letter is addressed to me, said Roswell
Gardiner
,
with firmness and authority, I claim the right to
open it myself. It is unusual for those to whom a letter is
not
addressed to assume this office.
But, it comes
from
Deacon Pratt, cried the widow
Martin, and may contain his will.
In which case, a body would think I have some rights
concerned, said Mr. Job Pratt, a little more coolly, but
with manifest doubts.
Sartain! put in Mrs. Thomas. Brothers and sisters,
and even cousins, come before strangers, any day. Here
we are, a brother and sister of the deacon, and we ought
to have a right to read his letters.
All this time Roswell had stood with an extended arm,
and an eye that caused Mr. Job Pratt to control his
impatience
.
Mary advanced close to his side, as if to sustain
him, but she said nothing.
There is a law, with severe penalties, against
knowingly
opening a letter addressed to another, resumed
Roswell
,
steadily; and it shall be enforced against any one
who shall presume to open one of mine. If that letter has
my address, sir, I demand it; and I will have it, at every
hazard.
Roswell advanced a step nearer Mr. Job Pratt, and the
letter was reluctantly yielded; though not until the widow
Martin had made a nervous but abortive snatch at it.
At any rate, it ought to be opened in our presence,
put in this woman, that we may see what is in it.
And by what right, ma'am? Have I not the privilege
of others, to read my own letters when and where I please?
18*
If the contents of this, however, do really relate to the late
Deacon Pratt's property, I am quite willing they should
be made known. There is nothing on this superscription
to tell me to open the packet in the presence of witnesses;
but, under all the circumstances, I prefer it should be
done.
Hereupon Roswell proceeded deliberately to look into
the package. The seal was already broken, and he
exhibited
it in that state to all in the room, with a meaning
smile, after which he brought to light and opened some
written instrument, that was engrossed on a single sheet
of foolscap, and had the names of several witnesses at its
bottom.
Ay, ay, that's it, said Baiting Joe, for the room was
crowded with all sorts of people; that's the dockerment.
I know'd it as soon as I laid eyes on it!
And what do
you
know about it, Josy? demanded the
widow, eagerly. Cousin Job, this man may turn out a
most important and considerable witness!
What do I know, Mrs. Martin? Why I seed the
deacon sign for the seals, and exercute. As soon as I
heard Squire Craft, who was down here from Riverhead
on that 'ere very business, talk so much about seals, I
know'd Captain Gar'ner must have suthin' to do with the
matter. The deacon's very heart was in the schooner and
her v'y'ge, and I think it was the craft that finished him,
in the end.
Won't that set aside a codicil, cousin Job, if so be the
deacon has r'ally codicilled off Captain Gar'ner and Mary?
We shall see, we shall see. So you was present, Josy,
at the making of a will?
Sartainand was a witness to the insterment, as the
squire called it. I s'pose he sent for me to be a witness,
as I am some acquainted with the sealin' business, having
made two v'y'ges out of Stunnin'tun, many years since.
Ay, ay; that's the insterment, and pretty well frightened
was the deacon when he put his name to it, I can tell
you!
Frightened! echoed the brotherthat's ag'in law,
at any rate. The instrument that a man signs because
he's frightened, is no instrument at all, in law. As respects
a will, it is what we justices of the peace call `dies non,'
or, don't die; that is, in law.
Can that be so, squire Job? asked the sister, who
had said but little hitherto, but had thought all the more.
Yes, that's Latin, I s'pose, and good Latin, too, they
tell me. A man may be dead in the flesh, but living in
law.
La! how cur'ous! Law is a wonderful thing, to them
that understands it.
The worthy Mrs. Thomas expressed a much more
profound
sentiment than that of which she was probably aware,
herself. Law
is
a wonderful thing, and most wonderful is
he who can tell what it is to-day, or is likely to be
to-morrow
.
The law of testamentary devises, in particular, has
more than the usual uncertainty, the great interest that is
taken by the community in the large estates of certain
individuals
who are placed without the ordinary social
categories
by the magnitude of their fortunes, preventing
anything
from becoming absolutely settled, as respects
them
.
In Turkey, and in America, the possession of great wealth
is very apt to ruin their possessors; proscription, in some
form or other, being pretty certain to be the consequences.
In Turkey, such has long and openly been the fact, the
bow-string usually lying at the side of the strong box; but,
in this country, the system is in its infancy, though
advancing
towards maturity with giant strides. Twenty years
more, resembling the twenty that are just past, in which
the seed recently sown broadcast shall have time to reach
maturity, and, in our poor opinion, the great work of
demoralization
,
in this important particular, will be achieved.
We are much afraid that the boasted progress, of which
we hear so much, will resemble the act of the man who
fancied he could teach his horse to live without foodjust
as he believed the poor beast was perfect, it died of
inanition!
Roswell read Baiting Joe's `insterment' twice, and then
he placed it, with manly tenderness, in the hands of Mary.
The girl read the document, too, tears starting to her eyes;
but, a bright blush suffused her face, as she returned the
will to her lover.
Ah! do not read it now, Roswell, she said, in an
under tone; but the stillness and expectation were so
profound
,
that every syllable she uttered was heard by all in
the room.
And why not read it now, Miss Mary! cried the
Widow Martin. Methinks
now
is the proper time to read
it. If I'm to be codicilled out of that will, I want to know
it.
It is better, in every respect, that the company present
should know all that is to be known, at once, observed
Mr. Job Pratt. Before the will is read, if that be the
will, Captain Gar'ner
It is the will of the late Deacon Pratt, duly signed,
sealed, and witnessed, I believe, sir.
One word more, then, before it is read. I think you
said, Josy, that the deceased was
frightened
when he signed
that will? I do not express any opinion until I hear the
will; perhaps a'ter it is read, I shall think or say nothin'
about this fright; though the instrument that a man signs
because he is frightened, if the fright be what I call a legal
fright, is no instrument at all.
But such was not the deacon's case, Squire Job, put
in Baiting Joe, at once. He did not sign the insterment
because he was frightened, but was frightened because he
signed the insterment. Let the boat go right eend
foremost
,
squire.
Read the will, Captain Gar'ner, if you have it, said
Mr. Job Pratt, with decision. It is proper that we should
know who is executor. Friends, will you be silent for a
moment?
Amid a death-like stillness, Roswell Gardiner now read
as follows:
In the name of God, amen. I, Ichabod Pratt, of the
town of Southold, and county of Suffolk, and state of New
York, being of failing bodily health, but of sound mind, do
make and declare this to be my last will and testament.
I bequeath to my niece, Mary Pratt, only child of my
late brother, Israel Pratt, all my real estate, whatsoever it
may be, and wheresoever situate, to be held by her, her heirs
and assigns, for ever, in fee.
I bequeath to my brother, Job Pratt, any horse of
which I shall die possessed, to be chosen by himself, as a
compensation for the injury inflicted on a horse of his,
while in my use.
I bequeath to my sister, Jane Thomas, the large
looking-glass
that is hanging up in the east bed-room of my
house, and which was once the property of our beloved
mother.
I bequeath to the widow Catherine Martin, my cousin,
the big pin-cushion in the said east chamber, which she
used so much to praise and admire.
I bequeath to my said niece, Mary Pratt, the only child
of my late brother, Israel Pratt, aforesaid, all of my
personal
estate, whether in possession or existing in equity,
including money at use, vessels, stock on farm, all other
sorts of stock, furniture, wearing apparel, book-debts,
money in hand, and all sorts of personal property
whatever
.
I nominate and appoint Roswell Gardiner, now absent
on a sealing voyage, in my employment, as the sole executor
of this my last will, provided he return home within six
months of my decease; and should he not return home
within the said six months, then I appoint my
above-mentioned
niece and heiress, Mary Pratt, the sole executrix of
this my will.
I earnestly advise my said niece, Mary Pratt, to marry
the said Roswell Gardiner; but I annex no conditions
whatever
to this advice, wishing to leave my adopted daughter
free to do as she may think best.
The instrument was, in all respects, duly executed, and
there could not be a doubt of its entire validity. Mary felt
a little bewildered, as well as greatly embarrassed. So
perfectly disinterested had been all her care of her uncle,
and so humble her wishes, that she did not for some time
regard herself as the owner of a property that she had all
her life been accustomed to consider as a part of her late
uncle. The heirs expectant, a'ter reading the
insterment
,
as Baiting Joe told his cronies, when he related
the circumstances over a mug of cider that evening, fore
and aft, and overhauling it from truck to keelson, give the
matter up, as a bad job. They couldn't make nawthin' out
of oppersition, continued Joe, and so they tuck the
horse, and the looking-glass, and the pin-cushion, and
cleared out with their cargo. You could n't get one of
that breed to leave as much as a pin behind, to which he
thought the law would give him a right. Squire Job went
off very unwillingly; for so strong was his belief in his
claim, that he had made up his mind, as he told me
himself
,
to break up the north meadow, and put it in corn this
coming season.
They say that Minister Whittle took it very hard that
nawthin' was said about him, or about meetin', in the
deacon's
will, observed Jake Davis, one of Baiting Joe's
cronies.
That he did; and he tuck it so hard that everybody
allows the two sermons he preached the next Sabba' day to
be the very two worst he ever
did
preach.
They must have been pretty bad, then, quaintly
observed
Davis; I've long set down Minister Whittle's
discourses
as being a
leetle
the worst going, when you give
him a chance.
It is unnecessary to relate any more of this dialogue, nor
should we have given the little we have, did it not virtually
explain what actually occurred on the publication of the
contents of the will. Roswell met with no opposition in
proving the instrument, and the day after he was admitted
to act as executor he was married to Mary Pratt, and
became
tenant, by the courtesy, to all her real estate; such
being the law
then
, though it is so no longer.
Now
, a man
and his wife may have a very pretty family quarrel about
the ownership of a dozen tea-spoons, and the last, so far
as we can see, may order the first out of one of her
rocking
chairs, if she see fit! Surely domestic peace is not so
trifling a matter that the law should seek to add new
subjects
of strife to the many that seem to be nearly
inseparable
from the married state.
Let this be as it may, no such law existed when Roswell
Gardiner and Mary Pratt became man and wife. One of
the first acts of the happy young couple, after they were
united, was to make a suitable disposition of the money
found buried at the foot of the tree, on the
so-much-talked-of
key. Its amount was a little more than 2000 dollars,
the pirate who made the revelation to Daggett having, in
all probability, been ignorant himself of the real sum that
had been thus secreted. By a specific bargain with the
crew, all this money belonged to the deacon; and,
consequently
,
it had descended to his niece, and through her
was now legally the property of Roswell. The young man
was not altogether free from scruples about using money
that had been originally taken as booty by pirates, and his
conscientious wife had still greater objections. After
conferring
together on the subject, however, and seeing the
impossibility of restoring the gold to those from whom it
had been forced in the first place, the doubloons were
distributed
among the families of those who had lost their
lives at Sealer's Land. The shares did not amount to
much, it is true; but they did good, and cheered the hearts
of two or three widows and dependent sisters.
Nor did Roswell Gardiner's care for their welfare stop
here. He had the Sea Lion put in good order, removed
her decks, raised upon her, and put her in her original
condition, and sent her to Sealer's Land, again, under the
orders of Hazard, who was instructed to take in all the oil
and skins that had been left behind, and to fill up, if he
could, without risking too much by delay. All this was
successfully done, the schooner coming back, after a very
short voyage, and quite full. The money made by this
highly successful adventure, had the effect to console
several of those who had great cause to regret their
previous
losses.
As to Roswell and Mary, they had much reason to be
content-with their lot. The deacon's means were found
to be much more considerable than had been supposed.
When all was brought into a snug state, Roswell found
that his wife was worth more than thirty thousand dollars,
a sum which constituted wealth on Oyster Pond, in that
day. We have, however, already hinted that the simplicity,
and we fear with it the happiness, of the place has
departed
.
A railroad terminates within a short distance of
the deacon's old residence, bringing with it the clatter,
ambition, and rivalry, of such a mode of travelling. What
is even worse, the venerable and expressive name of
Oys-ter
Pond, one that conveys in its very sound the idea of
savoury dishes, and an abundance of a certain and a very
agreeable sort, has been changed to Orient, Heaven
save the mark! Long Island has, hitherto, been famous,
in the history of New York, for the homely piquancy of
its names, which usually conveyed a graphic idea of the
place indicated. It is true, Jerusalem cannot boast of
its Solomon's Temple, nor Babylon of its Hanging
Gardens
;
but, by common consent, it is understood that these
two names, and some half-a-dozen more of the same
quality, are to be taken by their opposites.
Roswell Gardiner did not let Stimson pass out of his
sight, as is customary with seamen when they quit a vessel.
He made him master of a sloop that plied between New
York and Southold, in which employment the good old
man fulfilled his time, leaving to a widowed sister who
dwelt with him, the means of a comfortable livelihood, for
life.
The only bit of management of which Mary could be
accused, was practised by her shortly after Stimson's death,
and some six or eight years after her own marriage. One
of her school friends, and a relative, had married a person
who dwelt `west of the bridge,' as it is the custom to say
of all the counties that lie west of Cayuga Lake. This
person, whose name was Hight, had mills, and made large
quantities of that excellent flour, that is getting to enjoy
its merited reputation even in the old world. He was
disposed
to form a partnership with Roswell, who sold his
property, and migrated to the great west, as the country
`west of the bridge' was then termed, though it is now
necessary to go a thousand miles farther, in order to reach
what is termed the western country. Mary had an
important
agency in bringing about this migration. She had
seen certain longings after the ocean, and seals, and whales,
in her husband; and did not consider him safe, as long as
he could scent the odours of a salt marsh. There is a
delight
in this fragrance that none can appreciate as
thoroughly
as those who have enjoyed it in youth; it remains
as long as human senses retain their faculties. An
increasing family, however, and el dorado of the west,
which, in that day, produced wheat, were inducements for
a removal there, and, aided by Mary's gentle management,
produced the desired effect; and for more than twenty years
Roswell Gardiner has been a very successful miller, on a
large scale, in one of the western counties of what is called
the Empire State. We do not think the
sobriquets
of
this country very happy, in general, but shall quarrel less
with this, than with the phrase of commercial emporium,
which is much as if one should say a townish town.
Roswell Gardiner has never wavered in his faith, from
the time when his feelings were awakened by the just view
of his own insignificance, as compared to the power of
God! He then learned the first, great lesson in religious
belief, that of humility; without which no man can be truly
penitent, or truly a Christian. He no longer thought of
measuring the Deity with his narrow faculties, or of setting
up his blind conclusions, in the face of positive revelations.
He saw that all must be accepted, or none; and there was
too much evidence, too much inherent truth, a morality
too divine, to allow a mind like his to reject the gospel
altogether. With Mary at his side, he has continued to
worship the Trinity, accepting its mysteries in an humble
reliance on the words of inspired men.
THE END
.